Write a story based on this line : "By evening, she was running a high fever ... "

 

Far up in the mountains of Canada, there is an old abandoned log cabin. Once it was occupied by a young couple who wanted to distance themselves from the chaos of this modern world. Here they were miles away from the nearest town. Bob, the husband, made the occasional trip into town to buy supplies whereas Jan, his wife, spent her free time by the fire, sewing. Their life was simply idyllic.
Then, one midwinter's day, Jan woke up from bed with a strange ache in her bones. Putting it down to overwork, Bob shooed her to bed and made sure she rested. Though Jan was impatient to get to her chores, Bob soothed her, "Relax, Sugar. You're overdoing things. All these chores will be here when you recover."

However, Jan seemed to be getting worse instead of recovering. By evening, she was running a high fever and in greater pain. In spite of his best efforts, Bob could not manage to ease her suffering. And then suddenly, she started to lapse into unconsciousness.

It was then obvious that she was seriously ill. What could Bob do? He had no experience in treating the sick and Jan was getting worse by the minute. He knew that there was an old doctor in town but he lived three miles away, downhill. Pot-bellied and obese, there was no way the doctor could make it up to their cabin.

Something had to be done quickly! Bob racked his brains but to no avail. The only thing left to do was to go to the doctor. In Jan's condition, she could never walk that far in the waist-deep snow. Bob would have to carry her!

Bob searched his mind for a way to move poor, sick Jan. Then, he remembered. He had once made a sledge so that they could ride together over the mountain. They never got around to using it though, because the whole mountain was thickly covered with rocks and trees. He had never found a safe way down, not even once.

"Well," he thought, "looks like I'm going to have to try it anyhow," as he dug out the sledge from the storeroom. "Jan may die unless I get her to the doctor, and life means nothing to me without her." With this thought in mind, Bob gently tucked Jan into the sledge, got in the front, and with a short prayer for safety, pushed off.

How they got through that ride alive, Bob has never figured out. As trees loomed up in front of him and just as quickly whizzed by his side, close enough to touch, he felt relieved that Jan was not awake to experience the ride. It was all he could do not to scream as collision seemed imminent, time and again, with only inches to spare.

At last, bursting from the mountainside, the town came into view. Barely slowing down, they sped through the icy streets, only losing speed as they neared the doctor's house. The sledge, battered through the journey, collapsed in the left ski as it came to a halt, spilling out its occupants. Bob picked up his Jan and made his way into the doctor's house.

After what seemed to be a long winter, Jan recovered fully from her illness but Bob never recovered from his fright. They moved into the little town so as to be near help in times of crisis, and have lived there ever since.
The title of this essay suggests a series of contrasts, perhaps between rocket-firing Hunter and the weekend pilot's Chipmunk, or the Bomber photographing enemy installations from 30,000 feet and the Comet or Boeing long-distance jet airliner. yet the two are inextricably merged; the development of one has always depended on that of the other. Out of the hostile uses of the jet-engine, invented by the Englishman Sir Frank Whittle during the last war, has com the peaceful use of the jet transport and passenger plane. Out of the latest pre-1939 monoplanes came the early wartime fighter, the Hurricane.
Man has always longed to fly like the birds and in the 20th Century his dream has come true. It is said that Michaelangelo invented a quite practicable heavier-than-air flying machine which, had he had aluminium to play with instead of iron, would have worked. Ballooning was quite common-place well before 1900, particularly in France; so were 'gliders' of a sort, which sometimes amounted to 'wings' of bamboo and cloth which served to carry a man a few yards off the ground in a high wind. But true aviation, that is powered 'heavier-than-air' flying, only came about with the development of the petrol engine which, by about 1896, had brought about the prototype motorcar. Primitive aircraft had come into being on both sides of the Atlantic by 1900; Orville and Wilbur Wright built a powered plane a Kitty Hawk which flew for 3 1/2 seconds and traveled 105 feet. Later Bleriot, a Frenchman made history by flying 22 miles across the English Channel in a biplane. Between 1900 and 1914 several countries had made serviceable aircraft, mostly biplanes, gradually overcoming design problems, increasing wing-lift and power, reducing weight and thereby increasing fuel capacity, ironing out facets of maneuverability, and adding both height and speed potential. But pre-1941 aircraft were scarcely more than toys; nobody trusted them for travel purposes, range was severely limited, and as freighters they were not worth considering.

It was the outbreak of first World War which gave a tremendous impetus of flying, and the potential of aircraft as weapons were swiftly realized. Money was spent by both sides on design-research and eventually primitive war planes were mass-produced by both sides. At first, the Handley-Pages and the Camels were visualized only as aerial observation-posts on the Western Front, but this swiftly led to overhead engagements, the pilots shooting it out with revolvers. Later, machine-guns, with a limited are of fire, were fitted, but a great advance came with the Synchronized Machine-gun, capable of firing through a propeller. These aircraft certainly had a nuisance value, as had the dirigibles with their bombs, such as the German Zeppelins, and the early bombers used in open country against concentrated forces, as in T.E. Lawrence's desert campaign, but nobody could portend they were crucial. it is an irony, however, that their development laid the foundation for the 'growing-up' of Civil Aviation between the wars.

In most countries their period was a sad story of governmental indifference and brave efforts by individuals to put flying 'on the map'. The whole world applauded Charles Lindbergh who flew the Atlantic in 1926, and Amy Johnson, who flew alone in a series of short 'hops' to Australia. But flying really grew up in the '30s when metal monoplanes of long range and high reliability standards were produced. The early passenger and freight lines were produced. The early passenger and freight lines were established; seaplanes were invented -- even ski-planes for polar exploration. But Hitler had realized the war-potential of the aircraft, and his early panzer-attacks in Europe and Egypt move on with ruthless efficiency, supported by the high-level saturation bomber and the Stuka dive-bomber. Britain and America had to catch up fast. Hurricanes and Spitfires saved Britain from invasion, and the American Boeings and British Whitleys and Wellingtons virtually destroyed the Ruhr towns in preparation for the Second Front. Airpower was crucial in the allied victory in the East as well as the West. Hiroshima and Nagasaki reversed Pearl Harbor and Singapore.

The nuclear bomb had made the aircraft a terrifying weapon in modern times, and humanity prays that it may be outlawed. But out of war came advance, and the jet aircraft, scarcely in use until 1945, had established international passenger and freight airlines; all countries today recognize the importance of flying as a potential money-earner and a means of cementing international relationship by today's incredibly quick and easy exchange of visitors.Much to his housekeeper's disgust, the great fictional detective Sherlock Holmes carried out scientific experiments in his Baker street rooms in the cause of solving crimes. Since his day, science had played an increasingly important part in both the detection and the proof of crime. Technology, the derivative of science, is used by most countries' police forces today and is responsible for bringing many criminals to justice. Dr Crippen escaped by liner to the Unites States, but an early ship to shore radio telephone enabled the police to arrest him when the line docked.
Footprint casts and fingerprints are traditional methods of detection. Fingerprinting was invented in Great Britain by Francis Galton and has been of fundamental importance in detection for decades. Some countries fingerprint their whole populations, though others, Britain included, regard this as an infringement of personal freedom, and restrict fingerprinting to those accused of a criminal offence, or to those who are screened for certain security categories. science has greatly enhanced the efficiency of this system. Fingerprints are now held on computer, and much time and cost is saved by the fact that information can be exchanged instantaneously throughout the country. Co-operation with the National Crime Information center in the US and with Interpol in the continent of Europe greatly enhances this facility.

Records of convicted criminals are now held on microfilm in conjunction with fingerprints, photographs and personal profiles and stores as computer data. These, again, are capable of instant retrieval countrywide and can also be made available overseas. In the UK this data cannot be disclosed to a jury during a criminal trial, but should the verdict be guilty a previous criminal record becomes available in the matter of sentencing.

The polygraph, or lie detector, is not university sanctioned. Its supporters claim that its ability to record nervous tensions is infallible. Others disagree.

Very recently, DNA printing has revolutionized the process of bringing the criminal to justice, and in civil actions establishing paternity. The minutes quantities of blood, skin, hair or nail-parings can positively identify or eliminate the individual concerned. No two individuals have identical sets of genes. This scientific advance is particularly important in the examination of cars and rooms where crimes have been committed.

Interrogation has always been an important part of criminal investigation. in uncivilized counties, drugs, psychological pressure and often physical torture have been, and still are used. these methods are banned in civilized countries. However, even in the latter, the police occasionally enforce signatures to false statements or to statements which are subsequently mutilated. Taped interviews today now go some way to overcome this abuse, though even tapes can be falsified.

A good deal of crime detection and prevention has been privatized in recent years. some countries allow firearms to security guards, others, such as the UK, do not. Various pieces of technology are in common use. Closed-circuit TV cameras allow centralized observation of customers in large stores. Flood-lighting around buildings can be triggered electronically when anybody approaches in the dark. Foot patrols are issued with light intensifiers, a military development, enabling them to see without being seen. 'Electric eye' burglar alarms have been in use both in public buildings and in private homes for many years.

Observation by police 'on the beat' who know their own areas intimately has always been a recognized and valuable means of crime detection and prevention, bolstering the citizen's sense of security. Unfortunately, this is being replaced by police car patrols. And although the latter are in radio communication with officers on foot and with police headquarters, the general public see this development as retrograde.

Despite all the above, crime is on the increase in many countries. Its detection is no doubt becoming more efficient, due to scientific advance. this is related to an entirely different factor; the decline in religious faith and observance, which instills moral standards into children."Life is short, experience treacherous, judgment difficult," said Hypocrates, the Father of Medicine. two thousand years ago, no less than now, judgment was difficult, life short; the barber was the surgeon and major operations were equivalent to death warrants ! The physician, when he did not refer to the ancients, was still looking to chance experience for his knowledge; while 'Asiatic cholera' stalked the land.
then it was that experience which began to be supplemented by experiment. Vesalius introduces dissection; Harvey discovered the circulation of the blood; Jenner banished the terrors of small-pox; Pasteur, experimental-chemist, turning to the study of micro-organisms, laid the foundation of Modern Medicine. Listen, applying the new knowledge to his work with the scalpel, founded modern aseptic surgery -- all in three hundred years and simply because men began to observe closely and with open minds, while they caused things to happen, instead of observing casually, with closed minds and when things chanced to happen.

What of the method by which men are thus creating or helping Nature to create a better physical environment for us all ? If the desire is for something intrinsically new, whether an alloy steel, a synthetic dyestuff, a radio tube, or a spineless cactus, it must be obtained, if at all, in Nature's prescribed way. it must be created, and nobody who is in a hurry to get something, has ever been very successful in learning what way Nature prescribes. On the other hand, certain intellectually honest, enthusiastically persevering individuals, endowed with insatiable curiosity, keen power of observation, ingenuity, originality, patience, commonsense and the urge to take infinite pains, have been notably successful in inducing Nature to reveal her secret ways of working. Besides, to such, it is the best of all sports.

So, when 'Curiosity' began to learn from Nature, he began to observe her closely and to record faithfully what he observed. as an experimenter, he is like any good general, man must have a well-thought-out plan of attack, but must also be an opportunist and change his plan to meet unexpected situations as they arise. He must be open-minded, must seek facts regardless of whether they may lead him.

If he is not open-minded, is not intellectually honest, he will be inclined to explain away an unexpected result; he may even refrain from recording it. In such a case, he is not playing the game, but he overlooks the fact that some of the greatest discoveries have come out of irregular results which were not rejected, but were further investigated. it was only a slight irregularity found in the orbit of Uranus that led Adams and Le Verrier, independently to discover Neptune. There was less tan one per cent of a residue of inert gas that persistently remained when Cavendish tried by electric sparking, to combine atmospheric nitrogen and oxygen. But he recorded and reported the fact and a hundred years later. Rayleigh, repeating the experiment found the residue to be a new gaseous element - Argon - which is used in gas-filled electric lamps. This was to all. Ramsay was thus led to discover in our atmosphere, a whole series of inert elementary gases, among them Neon, employed in the orange-red lights seen in the business streets. it was from the detection of otherwise unexplained lines in the solar spectrum that Helium was discovered, though no one felt sure at the time, that it was peculiar to the sun. Later, Rayleigh discovered traces of it in the air. All these came about because painstaking experimenters observed closely and recorded faithfully what they saw. As Joseph Henry, contemporary of Faraday, put it, "The seeds of great discoveries are constantly floating around us, but they only take root in minds well prepared to receive them"

Experiment conducted for the discovery of new facts and their relation to other facts is Scientific Research. Behind it all is the well-founded conviction that there is order in all natural phenomena. For every determined rise above failure, while experimenting, there is in waiting the more than compensating joy of having created something. None is better qualified to bear testimony to this than Pasteur. Listen to his appraisal of the lot of the researcher : "It is indeed a hard task when you believe you have found an important scientific fact and are feverishly anxious to publish it, to constrain yourself for days, weeks, years, sometimes to fight with yourself, to try to ruin your own experiments and only to proclaim your discovery after having exhausted all contrary hypotheses. But when after so many efforts, you have at last arrived at a certainty, your joy is one of the greatest which can be felt by a human soul, an the thought that you will have contributed to the honor of your country, renders that joy still deeper."

In has been truly said that the great events of history are its great scientific discoveries. "In our century, science is the soul of the prosperity of nations and the living source of all progress. Undoubtedly, the tiring daily discussions of politics seem to be our guide. Employ appearances ! -- What really lead us forward a a few scientific discoveries and their applications" - says Pasteur !
Men have preserved their foods from ancient times in order to keep the results of harvesting for winter months, for resale, for storage, and for transporting from sea to inland, overseas, or cross-country. To do so, they generally used nature's methods, which are drying, parching and fermenting. Parching is the most natural method, but for many thousands of years, others have also been used. Direct fermentation of liquids, usually by the introduction of yeast, has not only preserved liquids but also enhanced their quality, the same of course applying to salting. Smoking has preserved, and sometimes improved both fish and meat. Hickory wood is generally used for the fires, and natural juices are contained by a slight coating of wood creosote.
It was not until recently that the causes of rottenness were understood, these being the reactions of bacteria, moulds, yeasts and micro-organisms. Some fermentation and moulds are, of course, necessary in the production of food and drink; moulds, for example, being used in cheese-making. But the real 'breakthrough' in preservation against the causes of rottenness came, when it was learnt how to deal with the micro-organisms present in all foods and drinks, and which react chemically over a period to produce unpalatable or poisonous food or drink. There are three basic methods.

Firstly, food may be preserved by cooling or freezing, to a very low temperature when long-term preservation is required. This was originally done by packing in a mixture of salt and ice; today, cold storage is big business and refrigeration is a highly-developed science. 'Dehydration' may be bracketed with this method, as the principle involved is the same, namely to suspend the operation of bacteria which requires normal temperatures for chemical reaction. This is why reconstituted eggs cannot against dehydrated, and melted ice-cream refrozen. the second method of destruction is by heat-processes, which destroy all the bacteria present in food and drink. This process is used before canning foods in hermetically-sealed containers, great care being taken not to allow the foods or drink s to become re-infested after cooling and before canning. the third method is to preserve by the addition of chemicals, which control or destroy bacteria. this is merely a follow-up of the old systems of salting, smoking and candling.

Eventually, the method of 'cold sterilization' is expected to supersede most of the others; this amounts to exposing the food-stuffs to ionizing radiation.

Today more than mere food-preservation is sought by the consumer, and for this reason, processes are becoming more and more sophisticated. Quality, economy and convenience are sought by modern man -- especially modern woman -- convenience is important, the 'ready-cooked' meal is popular, while, in Western, or 'Westernized' communities, goods do not sell easily if they lack color, a good appearance, natural flavor, the right texture, and are free from defects.
In 1887, rubber seeds which grow naturally in Brazil and South America were shipped to England by a man called Wickham. Two months later, tiny rubber plants grown from these seeds in London's famous Kew Gardens, were dispatched to Sri Lanka and Singapore. There, the plants flourished and so not only was wealth and prosperity brought to Malaysia, for the production of rubber is now Malaysia's greatest industry; but also the world's rubber manufacturers are able to cope with the phenomenal demands for rubber in practically every department of life. Synthetic and man-made rubber, which is now being produced on a a very large scale is helping to cope with these demands and may possibly in the future usurp the position of the world's natural rubber.
Today, rubber is indeed man's versatile servant. It serves you in your home. It is found on your radio and television, on telephones, electric irons, toasters, coffee percolators and sewing machines. It is found in the kitchen for the vacuum cleaner and refrigerator. Where is the house without its electric fan containing rubber or the desk that does not show an eraser, elastic band or vulcanized fountain pen ? There are mattresses made of foam rubber and in colder climates, where is the house without its rubber hot water bottle ? In the garden, rubber has a variety of uses from hose-pipes to footwear. Rice and biscuits -- these on the  surface, would seem to have nothing to do with rubber. But, it is because of rubber that the high polish on grains of rice can be obtained. the machine to polish rice consists of an emery cone and rubber blocks. the rice revolves between these two and it is the combination between rubber and emery board that achieves the polished surface. we often eat biscuits with the 'brand' or maker's name printed on the surface. 'Glaxo' or 'Peakfrean' are examples of this. A printed metal stamp would be impracticable on the sticky surface of the dough of which biscuits are made. It would stick ! Therefore, to stamp the biscuits, a thin sheet of rubber is inserted between the stamp and the dough. thus, the biscuit is stamped through the rubber rather like a carbon copy of a letter. Rubber is used to make our raincoats or mackintoshed as they are called after a Manchester firm 'Machintosh' who, in 1846, bought a patent for vulcanizing rubber, invented by a man called 'Parkes' in Birmingham. Since Christopher Columbus first saw natives of Haiti playing games with balls made from the gum of rubber tree, thousands of different balls from the rubber, beach ball to the golf ball, have been made out. Further a field from home, rubber is used for furniture and gymnastic equipment. In the cinema, it is used for projectors and cinematograph equipment of all kinds. Even down on the farm, it appears in tractor tyres, milking machines and combine harvesters.

Rubber is used when you travel. Pavements and roads are sometimes made of it, as are the steps of buses and trams. There would be little comfort in motor vehicles without the pneumatic tyre first patented by J.B. Dunlop in Belfast, Ireland in 1888.

Nowadays, with the increasing number of cars, pneumatic tyres take 90% of the world's rubber. Rubber bearing springs and rubber sealing systems in rake mechanisms of airplanes, ships and cars add considerably to our comfort.

Rubber is there when illness lands us in hospital. Because it absorbs shock, it is used for sound proof flooring, tyres on wheel chairs and rubber rollers on beds and trolleys. Rubber is water-proof

The evils of war
 

Responsible citizens of all countries today, have learnt to hate and mistrust warfare as a means of resolving international disputes through the bitter experience of two world conflagrations in this century. Between the wars, the major powers established the 'League of Nations'. Its dual role was to attempt to substitute negotiation for warfare and to press for multi and unilateral disarmament, but certain ambitious powers treated it with cynical contempt, and it was powerless in the face of German, Italian and Japanese empire building. Since 1945, a somewhat more realistic organization, the U.N.O., has come into being, and by means of its international 'police' forces has successfully quenched many 'bushfires' which would otherwise have become conflagrations. yet, it is doubtful whether even U.N.O., could halt a major power, and it is a sinister fact that certain of them ether ignore its decisions or absent themselves from its councils Most sane individuals condemn warfare absolutely, but not all governments. History has taught us that there will always be warfare, because a government may display the lowest common denominator of human characteristics, and act upon it. Accepting war was a periodic fact, therefore, peace-loving nations usually feel compelled to arm themselves with the most powerful and effective weapons of defense, including nuclear weapons, and refuse to part with them, unless their competitors do the same we thus reach the position of an armed truce, based on parity of weapons, and the paradoxical situation of having to avoid the evils of war, by manufacturing the very weapons and training the very armies which alone can bring them about. The alternative is pacifism. The disarmers, the 'Ban the Bomb' movement in Britain would have the Commonwealth abolish arms and armies, believing that non-resistance to aggression, even the acceptance of invasion, is the only sure way to peace. But is it ? it was certainly not so in Britain in 1939, when the declaration of war called a halt to German expansion, and when, without an all-out arms effort, Britain would have been overrun and her people enslaved, even exterminated. In 1939, the true evil of war, deprivation of freedom, was avoided by the very act of going to war. It cannot be over-emphasized that, while every sane person must condemn warfare 'in vaccuo', the same person, realistically viewing the world in which we live, must distinguish between the greater evil of losing his freedom and the lesser, of both suffering and inflicting the evils of warfare. In certain clearly defined circumstances, it is right to inflict the evils of war.
But nobody doubts the miseries which are inevitably caused. Psychologically, the effects are disastrous. A people at war ceases to think of the enemy as 'people' like themselves. Propaganda, the one-sided or even lying, reporting inflammatory incidents, creates hatred of the enemy. The 'other side' become targets at the end of a gun, vermin to be exterminated by the napalm fire-thrower, or the nuclear bomb. This, and the actual horrors of experiencing warfare, cause frequent mental breakdowns, feelings of self-reproach, psychological scarring which are often indelible. Fear, both experienced and imposed, has its shattering effects. Brutality is at a premium, in the prisoner-of-war and concentration camps. Racial hatred is stirred up; it is believed that the whole Jewish population of Europe would have been wiped out, had the war gone on for another year. Greed, of course, becomes paramount. War always means food and luxury rationing. 'Black Market' operations begin, and the unscrupulous grow far at the expense of the poor. Personal freedom is inevitably lost. All fit men are expected to join the forces or be branded as cowards; all civilians exist in a welter of government controls which completely regulate their lives. Overwork, fatigue and irritability are only minor by products. Much more important is the fact that everything is geared to the war-effort, and cultural and humane discoveries and developments come to an abrupt halt.

Physically and materially, the evils of war are catastrophic. Enemy control of the seas and skies may reduce countries which rely on imports to famine. It is the poor and the children who suffer most. Cities and countryside are laid waste. Hospitals are filled with those who are injured, or blinded, or crippled, or poisoned by gas or radioactivity. wealth ad resources are wasted, fine men and women squandered, buildings, art-treasures, historic places obliterated.

Countries may be forced to resort to the evils of war, but humanity will always condemn warfare because it is humanity which suffers.
'Education' in the broad sense is the drawing out of the individual's personality and intellectual ability, and travel has always been considered an important part of this process. Yet, the functions assigned to travel as part of education have varied curiously. Before modern times, the greatest travelers were the Dutch, the onwards, the motives behind travel were exploration, military conquest leading to ownership of foreign territories, trade and commerce, and diplomacy. Clive of India, Sir Stamford Raffles of Singapore, are among the great names associated with the old-fashioned object of travel -- colonization and, in the opinion of some people, 'exploitation'. So far from learning about their travels, which, in a sense, they were bound to do, whether they liked it or not, early travelers considered themselves teachers -- of an outlook, a religion, and a way of life, which they assumed was superior to what they found, just because in certain respects, it was more materially advanced. The early travelers were explorers, 'empire-builders' and adventurers, despite the incidental benefits they were able to confer on undeveloped countries. Countries which bred travelers believed quite firmly that foreigners were 'lesser breeds without the law', and that the only justification for travel was national or personal gain. The object was to make money abroad, then come home and live 'as gentleman'. Typical of this spirit was the 'remittance man' -- the 'black sheep' of the family who was paid to live overseas. "Deportation" -- was the sentence imposed in 19th century Britain as an alternative to execution for certain serious crimes. Botany bay in Australia was peopled by such criminals. An important factor in the early days was time; travel, by sailing-ship or 'safari' meant months to an from a destination. Going overseas meant being away a long time - perhaps for good. European travel was the exception, and here, we look at a new consideration, that of 'culture'; Italy and Greece are living reflections of ancient classical lore. The 'educated' young man, rich and sophisticated, was not considered completely 'finished', until his classical education had culminated in a 'Grand Tour' of Europe. During this period, he used the languages learned in the schoolroom, and saw for himself the places which had figured so prominently in his earlier studies. with this new background, he became fit for the Army and Navy, or the Colonial and Diplomatic Services. But, he always 'looked down' on the foreigner -- even the European -- as a second-rate person.
The theory of travel in the modern age is totally different, and this is because the attitude of the older countries to foreigners had undergone ad radical change in the last 50 years. As nations draw closer to one another, and we all progress to the ultimate goal of a world-community, we tend to look upon all men as of equal value, and we are prepared to learn from them all, however undeveloped their way of life may be. Today, every intelligent person regards travel as an intellectual venture, and goes abroad prepared to learn rather than teach. Not only his means of getting abroad, but also his occasions of wishing to go abroad have undergone radical change within recent years.

Today, distance means little in terms of time. The European executive will soon be able to make the return journey to the USA within the day; already the Singapore businessman can reach England within 18 hours. The jet plane, the fast car, the ship, and the railway have made travel for diplomatic, business or military reasons virtually an immediate thing. Travel is, of course expensive but is much easier if the government or the firm pays the bill. But all the same, it is far from being limited to the rich, or to officials. Today, travel is a function spread throughout the community. Paid holidays help the worker to travel beyond his own country. Perhaps the most important change is that, nowadays, people at every level of the community are meeting overseas. This tends to spread an international outlook and makes for world peace. It result sin a certain amount of resettlement and admixture of populations, which has  actual benefit from the education point of view.

Nowadays, few travel primarily to gain education, but education, though incidental, is the inevitable result. Travel teaches climatic conditions, racial customs, religions languages and the social and political outlooks of other nationalities. It helps in racial and national understanding through exchange of ideas; it provides interesting conversation. Inevitable certainly when the mind is tuned and receptive, but not so to the dull and narrow person, who gains to benefit wherever he goes, and therefore might as well stay at home.
 	
Science in everyday life
 

In its broadest meaning of 'knowledge', science enters the life of even the most primitive human being, who knows the safe from the poisonous berry, who has stored up some rudimentary ideas about building a hut, sharpening a spear, and fishing in the river. this knowledge, or accumulation of experience, distinguishes man from the animal which has to rely on instinct.
Yet, for most people 'science' means a number of abstract subject such as physics, chemistry, biology and mechanics, to quote a few, which have to be learnt as part of 'education', yet which seem to have little bearing on everyday living. How wrong this is. Our way o life is completely dependent on science and its fruits surround us on all sides.

The Renaissance first taught man to realize the value of scientific progress, but it was not until the 18th century that the Industrial Revolution in the West really showed the impact science could have on living through developments in land-tillage, commercial production, transportation, and the beginning of the supply of mass-produced consumer goods. Until about 1920, progress was steady but in the last 45 years, the process of applying of science to the needs of living has accelerated enormously. This has been proportionate to the rate of scientific discovery itself.

Today, there is available an enormous range of consumer goods from the simple frying-pan to the jet plane, from the alarm-clock to the computer. All these things serve to make life easier and more pleasant, yet in themselves do not constitute civilization -- merely its comfortable adjuncts. Progress in real living is achieved less through 'things' than through education, the arts and the love of beauty. Science has nothing to say to us in these categories, merely providing aids and short-cuts. Without them, life would be no more than the struggle for survival; there would be no time or incentive to pursue higher things.

Science gives us safe food, free from harmful bacteria, in clean containers or hygienic tins. It also teaches us to eat properly, indicating a diet balanced in protein and carbohydrate and containing vitamins. The results is freedom from disease and prolonged life. In pre-scientific days, food was monotonous and sometimes dangerous; today it is safe and varied. It is varied because through improved sea, land and air transport food can now be freely imported and exported. Science has also improved clothing and made it more appropriate for climatic and working conditions. Man-made fibers and versatile spinning machines, today enable us to dress in clothes both comfortable and smart without being expensive.

Home, school and office all bear witness to the progress and application of science. Nowadays, most homes possess electric lighting and cooking, but many also have washing machines, vacuum cleaners and kitchen appliances, all designed to increase comfort and cleanliness and reduce drudgery. Science produces the fan which cools the air, the machinery which makes the furniture and fabrics, and hundred and one other features for good living. The books and papers are at school, and again everything from the piece of chalk to the closed-circuit television of instruction are the direct or indirect results of scientific progress. Learning is therefore easier. And clerical work is made far more speedy and efficient by the office typewriter, quite apart from the hundreds of different machines which relieve the manual worker of so much slow and monotonous toil in the factories.

In the old days, the idea of travel or taking a holiday was the monopoly of the privileged few. Today, science has given us the steamer, the aircraft and the motor-car. New horizons are opened to us and the increase of wealth brought about by science has given us the means to enjoy the new leisure we have been given. But to enjoy life at all, we must be healthy and it is perhaps in the sphere of medicine that some of the greatest advances have been made. Today, because of the use of antibiotic and isotopes, many diseases are speedily cured and man has become, on the whole, a healthier being, set free from pain and illness.

Science has been completely beneficial to ordinary living when properly applied. When misused, it is equally harmful. Land can be poisoned by chemicals, workers can suffer industrial disease, war can mobilize science to man's own destruction. Science is a good servant, but man must remain master.

The modern scientific revolution has certainly enabled man to make enormous strides in harnessing Nature's power and potential for his own purposes. Yet, e should be careful not to assume too easily that final and complete control is only a matter of time.
Before the days of freedom of though and research, progress was held up by ignorance and superstition. Early cosmologies pronounced the earth flat, the fixed center of the universe. Being flat, it therefore had edges, precipices in fact, so, wide travel and exploration was discouraged, and none by the most intrepid would venture far. Religion especially Judaism and the mediaeval Christianity rooted in Jewish concepts, taught this cosmology as a religious fact and banned all scientific research based on independent thought. It was believed that the world was God's -- in the sense that he discouraged interference and undue investigation, all knowledge necessary to man's salvation being contained in the Bible. Knowledge, therefore, belonged to the Church. Men died at the stake to contest this assertion. But it was the Renaissance which set thought free. Galileo pronounced the earth round. the door was open, and science struggled free from religion. Thus, the beginning of man's conquest of nature came about, and it was not until the 20th century, well after the Darwinian theory of evolution has been fully accepted, that science and religion came to terms, that the enlightened began to realize it was a case of 'both and' rather than 'either or.'

But whatever knowledge was groped after the Renaissance, such knowledge had virtually no practical application, until the 18th century in Britain, which marked the beginning of the scientific revolution. This was because there was virtually no such thing as systematic scientific research. From times up to Watt's steam engine, applied science was almost non-existent. But from 1733 onwards to the present day, discovery has followed discovery with fantastic speed; the steam engine -- hence industrial machines, 'horseless carriages,' and railways -- now of course petrol jet, atomic and nuclear power; electricity with its manifold applications; radio, telegraphy, radar, television; rocket propulsion and therefore space probes; lighter metals resulting in freedom to use them for aircraft; plastics, with their thousand one uses; man-made fibers and a host of others. And apart from these dramatic discoveries, great advances have been made in medical science, in public health and in crop growing -- to mention but a few.

The more man probes nature's laws, the more he seems to control nature. Today, he an extract precious metals from ore -- he can even transmute them; he can move earth and forests and rapidly lay roads, construct airfields and parts, build new cities. He can defend himself by using modern weapons, guns, bombs or missiles. He can ride the earth's surface by car, rail, bicycle and ship; he can search the sea's bottom by using diving gear, or sail beneath the surface for months on end in submarines. He can fly over it in jet aircraft high over the earth's atmosphere. He can photograph the moon from a few kilometers range and transmit the pictures instantaneously to earth. We have seen him land on the moon. He can move and till the earth with giant machines. He can defeat disease by antibiotics and prolong his life by observing scientific health-rules. He can use natural products as never before; timber for his daily newsprint; coal and oil for his machines; waterfalls for his hydro-electric plant; steel and concrete for his buildings; nuclear power to produce his electricity.

There seems to be no end to it all, and it is easy to assume that man will soon master the world and eventually the universe. This, on reflection, seems to be a fallacy, for what man is really doing is discovering and applying the forces of nature -- not inventing them, and in his applications, merely scratching the surface. Science may probe space, but it cannot defeat the laws of time and motion. there is no foreseeable way tin which man could ever venture beyond Mars; Medicine had advanced, but we still suffer from the common cold. The psychiatrist can diagnose a psychopath, but cannot cure him. The technologist can make a robot or a computer, but cannot begin to understand the human brain.

It seems the giant intelligence we call God has said 'thus far and no further'. And the facts of man's moral nature give no cause for optimism. The truth seems to be that man has not and never will master nature. It is nature which gently tolerates man.
The uses of forests
 

Forests and the many varying trees of which they are composed have, since the very earliest days played an important part in the life of mankind. It is because of this that men have realized their value and have taken steps to preserve them and to prevent their wanton and useless destruction.
From the primitive days of the wigman, the house on stilts or the African but, wood has been the basic material used for men's housing to provide shelter from the animals. The wigwam and the African hut were built round a frame of timber. The elaborately attractive black and white houses of 'Merrie England' in the sixteenth century depended on wooden frames. even today, when steel girders from the frameworld of our huge modern buildings like those in the Raffles City in Singapore or the sky-scrapers of New York, wood still forms an important part of the smaller modern houses. Soft woods of all kinds are used fro frames and doors and a variety of hard woods for furniture.

From earliest times too, wood has played a large part in transport. A rolling tree trunk, very probably showed primitive man the possible use of the wheel, perhaps as important a discovery as that of fire. In the earliest days of the automobile, wood was essential in its construction, but even before that, trishaws, carts, carriages and wagons, all made of timber enabled man to move from place to place overland. Men were equally dependent on wood for crossing water ad through all the staged from the hollowed-out log and the small boat built round a wooden frame right up to the first great sailing ships which first crossed over oceans, all means of transport were wooden-framed and wooden-walled.

Another very important use of forests is a modern one . This is the cutting up of logs and timber for use in the making of paper, particularly the kind of paper on which our daily newspapers are printed. The logs of wood, when cut, are ground up by hue machines and are turned into wood pulp. This, then undergoes certain chemical processes and paper is the end product. When we realize how much daily news-print the world consumes, we can see how great is the need of timber for this purpose.

As well as producing timber, certain forests provide important oils such as turpentine from the pine forests of North America or palm oil from the palm forests. Olive oil is produced from the olive tree. There are other products too. The American sugar maple provides sugar from its sap. Flock, for mattresses is produced by the forests of huge cotton trees in West Africa. Equally these same African forests provide the necessary shelter under which the cocoa bean can grow.

Forests also prevent soil erosion. They protect it from winds blowing it away and form water washing it away. Forests, too, revitalize the soil and because of the addition of humus and vegetable matter, it does not degenerate and become barren. They also attract rain-clouds and in places where they have been cleared, deserts are likely to appear.

Many wild animal and small insects find shelter under the protecting branches of forest trees. A wide variety of climbing shrubs, flowers and creepers are also protected by them. Forests too, whether the tropical ones of South-East-Asia; whether the sweeping miles of north American pines or whether the softer deciduous forest of Europe provide men with beauty. A tree, of whatever kind is a wonderful of nature.

It is because of the importance of forests that they should be preserved. In 1919, after the first great war, the wood shortage in Britain was very acute, because so much had been used in the war effort. The Forestry Commission was therefore, set up. This is a body which buys old woods and land, that is at present bare and turns them into modern forests using the latest scientific knowledge and equipment to help in this purpose. The modern forester grows his trees just as the farmer grows his crops or the gardener, his vegetables. He plants and then thins them and finally, when they are fully grown, he cuts them down for timber. He always replaces the felled trees with young ones. In reforestation, natural trees must always be grown. The Oak tree which is indigenous to England would not grow in Malaysia. neither of course, do palm trees flourish intemperate climates. Countries all over the world are caring their forests in this way, to ensure the supply of timber which is so badly needed.
Ever since members of early civilizations used simple hieroglyphics to communicate their thoughts, hopes and aspirations, there has been a close connection between reading and refinement. For this purpose, the terms 'refinement' must be extended to include far more than 'good manners' -- otherwise, the only reading necessary to produce he 'refined' person would be a book on etiquette ! Refinement, however, really implies culture and civilization in the widest sense, a combination of those qualities which differentiate man from the animal world, and it is the bearing of reading on the development of these qualities which we must examine.
A high standard of personal morality and unselfishness is cultured man's first characteristic. This, he largely owes to the books of his religion, whether it be the Christian Bible, the Muslim Koran, the Hindu Upanishads, the Philosophy of Buddha or Confucius. Such books teach him the meaning of family life and virtues of honesty, peaceful living and integrity. But, the best of secular literature helps him to achieve the same object. The innocence of Ophelia, the nobility of Sydney carton cannot fail to impress and attract the reader.

Greek tragedy was intended to induce in the audience a 'Catharsis,' or purging of the emotions, primarily those of 'pity and terror'. But the general reader finds that all good literature has a salutary effect on the emotional side of his nature. Great emotional pleasure may be derived from a good novel, as we enter fully into the life of the hero or heroine, an the best of writing, whether it takes the form of poetry, drama, or the novel has an undoubtedly maturing effect on our emotional nature.

For most people, however, the 'refined' person is the 'educated' person, the person whose intellect has been developed through reading intelligent books. The clear, logical thinker owes much to his grounding in the school-room, and even more to the love of reading which this grounding has fostered. Reading becomes a stimulating function of adult life, and ceases to be a child's tool for passing an examination or getting a job.

Cultured living requires that people should be 'well-informed,' and wide reading has the added advantage of imparting useful general knowledge. Thus, the well-read man or woman is more fitted to live in the community and travel, profitably, outside it. Such knowledge is obtained from a variety of sources ranging from the newspaper and magazine to the many available volumes of specialized non-fiction books.

An added benefit of good reading is the development of a love of language for its own sake. Style, imagery and figurative language, the 'atmosphere of prose and poetry, its emotional intensity and its intellectual content-all these things inculcate a love of beauty, the mark of a truly civilized person.

No reader of good literature can fail to be influenced by the attitudes to life to members of the family, to the community and to the nation which it contains. He constantly checks his own philosophy against what eh finds, and in analyzing it, refines it. we do not necessarily try to behave like people in books, but at least we can learn from them.

Sometimes, however, we rightly desire to model our lives on those of great men and women, in so far as we can, and in this connection, the importance of reading biographies cannot be over-estimated. it is a poor scientist who does not emulate the achievements of a Michael-Angelo or an Einstein, it is a poor nurse who does not admire the forcefulness and devotion of Florence Nightingale.

Today, we live in a cosmopolitan community, which has become sophisticated and matured by the admixture of foreigners, with their own languages, ways of life and special gifts. Furthermore, few of us nowadays, spend all our live sin our own small village or town. And so, it becomes increasingly important to know about other countries, other people. To know about other countries, other people. To know something about them from books, perhaps to learn their languages, at once smoothes the path to friendship, and it is a characteristic of a refined person to wish to make friends with other nationals -- not to regard them suspiciously as 'foreign devils.'

The refined person is the mentally disciplined person -- the person who demands a full and intellectually satisfying life.
The old fashioned idea of teaching was that the children should play a passive part. They were completely in the hands of their teachers, to be molded into a certain pattern set by formal education, and to emerge as school leavers full of facts which, they had all too often learnt off by heart and parrot-woes. Often, none of these facts were related to life. The children were made to absorb them as a sponge absorbs water. this attitude was adequately summarized by Addison in the eighteenth century. "What sculpture is to a block of marble, education is to the soul," he said.
Nowadays, such attitudes to teaching have completely changed and, while a certain store of facts must be learnt for examination purposes and indeed as a background to ordinary living, today such facts are not the 'be all' and 'end all.' Each child is regarded as an individual and not as a cypher in an educational machine. The teacher's aim is to develop the full potential of each child. He must be taught to respond to and to participate in the activities connected with learning and to -co-operate with the teacher so that everything he does is geared to his own life and to developing his control over his own environment. Today therefore, the facts and the subjects studied are secondary to the development of the child's whole personality. Hence, subjects cover a much wider range these days, from technical and practical subjects to current affairs and commerce.

To claim a child's interest, great importance is placed on purposive learning which means practical work of all kinds for the pupil. Such work must be varied as a child soon becomes bored when one particular activity is carried on for too long. His interest is not stimulated neither is the require skill acquired.

New attitudes mean new methods. Oral teaching, a time-honored method is still used, but not to the same extent. The teacher must do some talking, but children are encouraged to talk too, to ask questions and to discuss. The teacher has many mechanical aids to assist him in oral work. Language laboratories in which children can both listen to correct speech in foreign languages and record their own efforts, are extensively used. tape recordings of poetry and literature and of plays stimulate a child's interest and foster a love for these things.

Words must be supplemented by visual aids which are important. A British child, who has never seen South-east Asia will know it better, if he sees pictures of rice fields of Malaysia or Singapore's colorful harbor. British geography will come alive for a Malaysian child if he can see pictures of the coal-black mining country. Diagrams and charts clarify many subjects like anatomy, science or chemistry. Film strips, from which children absorb facts much more quickly than they do from a book, are widely used too. It is one thing to explain the growth of a plant from a seedling. It is a much more telling experience to see it on a film taken with a time lapse camera so that in ten minutes, growth spreading over many weeks can be seen. Mathematics too, makes use of visual aids. Problems can be 'explained' and 'Cusenaire' equipment provides models and blocks for measuring, all of which convey more to the pupil than a dull textbook.

In modern teaching, great value is placed on creative subjects such as craftwork, music, dramatics and woodwork. Here, practical work is the order of the day and the child's progress measured by the end product.

Modern teaching includes the body as well as the mind. a child must express himself and have an outlet. Hence, all schools provide facilities for physical education and for a variety of games. Many provide swimming instruction. extra-curricular activities too are considered important. Hence, visits to museums, art galleries, theaters, and public games are organized.

We have come a long way from the old ideas on education where the three R's or the classics were alone considered important. Now the aim is to teach a child live and to be lived with. As with all new ideas, time will supply the answer as to whether the child and hence the man has benefited.

Throughout history, man has demanded entertainment. Greek tragedy and comedy were an important feature of ancient soceity, staged in impressive open-air amphitheaters. The troubadour and 'strolling players' of mediaeval times were welcomed in hall and cottage alike, and the shadow and puppet plays of the East, even today, can draw crowds of village spectators. Thus, it has been, and always will be in every country in the world.

'Entertainment' implies non-participation by the audience. A football match may be entertainment to the spectators, but it is sport to the players, and when we think of entertainment, we must exclude, 'activities' such as indoor games, card playing, dice, tenpin bowling, even amateur theatricals, because the point of all these is that we are providing our own amusement. To be 'entertained', we must be content to look, and to listen.

Modern entertainment has become a highly organized business, and in most modern countries, is available in bewildering variety. In a big city every conceivable taste can be met, from cabaret to ballet, from radio and television to the opera and the circus, from the 'straight' theatre to the 'Pop Ground', from the cinema to the variety show, and from the comedian to the symphony concert. And where different races. live side by side, as in Singapore, to these may be added the traditional performances of the Chinese, Indians and Malays.

And what an attractive world this is - especially to young people! There is a glamour and glitter about it all which makes it irresistible. The prominent 'stars', especially, the 'pop' stars, of today become the idols of the adolescents, who imitate their clothes, habits and hair-styles, and dream of becoming famous and wealthy themselves, Generally, this remains a dream, and the humdrum business of ordinary living has to be got on with. But there are examples of talented youngsters being 'spotted' by promoters and turned into famous, wealthy personalities almost overnight, so young people go on dreaming.

Among them, there are a few who, having talent, try to break into the world of entertainment and, of these, a small minority succeeds. The truth is that bitter disappointment awaits the majority of young hopefuls, yet some carry on, and among them are the few who, not only possess talent, but who also have the good luck to be 'spotted'. But even this is not the end of the story. The real problem is not to 'break into' entertainment, but to keep your place in it, and this means not only a good basic training, but also having the originality to produce more and more new material. The television is an insatiable 'gobbler' of scripts as writers find to their cost and no comedian can afford to put over the same jokes twice. The crux of the matter is that some achieve instant success, and to be sure f a sustained, permanent place in the world of entertainment demands a training, whether in the drama or ballet school, or in the music academy, or with a professional script-writing team. There are no short cuts for the professional. For this reason, many professional entertainers are disgusted by the enormous sums paid to relatively untrained 'pop-groups' - but, of course, the majority of these die a swift natural death, their members returning to the humdrum jobs from which they came. Another source of anger to the professional is the inequality of reward, which is related to the popularity of the actor and not to the degree of training and skill which lies behind it. A musician in an orchestra will receive a small, if steady wage; a pop-group guitarist perhaps a hundred times as much; a trained stage actor will be paid far less than a more glamorous, but far less gifted cinema star.

Thinking of the average professional in the world of entertainment, one marvels that he is prepared to go on at all; his conditions are such that nobody without a vocation for entertainment would ever consider his life at all. At times, he will be working, and quite well-paid, but there will be other times when he is 'resting' i.e. out of work, and then he may hardly be able to buy food and shelter. Moreover, when he is in funds, he will be helping his less fortunate colleagues; the theatricals are a generous race. Eventually, age will catch up with him, but, he cannot expect a pension. Those who make a lot of money tend to spend it, and few are able to live in affluence after retirement.

Furthermore, the professional entertainer is exposed to many moral temptations from which most of us are spared, and he has to be of strong fibre, if he (or she) is to be free from the corrupting influence of some of their colleagues.

Beneath the glitter and the glamour lies hardship and heartbreak for the majority. The promoters, the managers and the impresarios are never poor men, and the entertainer becomes pathetically dependent on them -- especially when his public image is fading. But despite all this, we still have the professionals and always shall -- because the world of entertainment has an eternal, irresistible glamour. 'The show must go on !'
 	
The influence of religions
 

In a short essay, on a vast subject, it is impossible to deal with more than four or five aspects of the influence of religion on the life of man - and these, of course, must be connected with the main world-religions excluding primitive, animistic beliefs and practices encountered in the most backward societies. Considering Buddhism, Christianity, Islam, Hinduism, Confucianism and Judaism, we find that religions have influenced every aspect of the life of man.

Among the early Jews, religion not only 'influenced' government, it was government. Palestine, until the 8th century B.C. was ruled by 'Priests-Kings' who claimed divine sanction for all their decisions. Their appointment was a religious rite. And this has more or less influenced the Western theory of monarchy ever since. The theory of the 'Divine Right of Kings' was formally propounded in Britain in the 16th century, based on New Testament social philosophy. Officially rejected, it has, nevertheless, influenced the monarch to subject relationship in many countries ever since. Christianity, for its first 300 years, lived in more or less opposition to the Roman Empire ... until the days of Constantine, who, in 325 A.D. became the first Christian monarch of the Holy Roman Empire. But of course the temporal and spiritual functions of government had long since been separated between Pope and Emperor, King and Archbishop, and the relations between these have shown all the 'ups and downs' one might expect in subsequent history. In most countries today, government is carried out on democratic lines, the monarch retaining little more than a strong 'influence' and powers of sanction and veto.

Religion has, in result, played an important part in the foreign affairs of countries. In this, the Moslem and Christian religious are cases in point. The faithful Muslim has always been permitted to take up arms in the defense of his religion, or to further its cause. The outcome has been wars against the Jews and the Christians. The Christians, likewise, considered it their duty to oust the Moslem Turks from the 'Holy Places' of Palestine in the middle ages, and long drawn-out 'crusades' were the result, costly in manpower, wealth and goodwill to both sides. If we examine the causes of most wars from mediaeval times to the 17th century, in Europe and the Middle East, we find religion was the direct cause, as between Christian and Saracen in Europe; sometimes, it was used as a cloak to further a political or economic struggle, or as a sanction to proceed with a war of aggression where legal claims could be proved (Henry V, Charles VI of France). Occasionally, the war was on a religious issue such as Protestantism versus Roman Catholicism. The Spanish Inquisition, as a part of the counter reformation, forcibly attempted to 'Convert' Protestant prisoners to Catholicism for the ultimate good of their own souls! Religious massacres have been commonplace in India in the past, and it says much for the democratic spirit of the New Malaysia that, today, Christians, Muslims and Hindus are able to live together in harmony.

Among other influences, those on the social customs of countries have been important. The Western 'weekend' is based on the Christian Sunday which in turn replaced the Jewish Sabbath. Bank Holidays such as Easter Monday and Whit Monday have a religious origin - just as do the sequence of holidays proper to the Chinese and Indians, beginning with Chinese New Year. But the effect of religion on social custom goes much deeper. It certainly produced the caste system in India and was partly responsible for the class system in Europe, but nowadays, both Hinduism and Christianity repudiate these arbitrary divisions among people. The theories of marriage and general conduct in social life also stem from the teaching of the respective world-religions and have become a fixed part of the pattern of life where they apply.

The most important influence of religion is upon morality. Modern law is based on a mixture of Roman law and religious principle. Its sanction is authority. Moral law, which is behind national and international legal systems, has behind it the final sanction - the Will of God. In this connection, each world-religion has made its own individual contribution to the sum-total of world morality, despite the fact that certain moral precepts are held in common by them all. If we look to the Muslim faith, we find there an admirable teaching about self-discipline; to the Hindu faith, about non-violence; to the Christian faith, about love; to the Buddhist faith, about contemplation and to Confucianism, about duties to society and the family. The most important commonly-held piece of teaching is that we should behave towards others as we should wish them to behave towards us.

The great Religions not only carry profound influence today, but also are, (and will remain) integral part in the life of man.
Whenever national economy permits, whenever commerce and industry flourish, cities are nowadays passing through a process of modernization. This is a world wide trend. In the 'older' countries, this process is steady, almost gradual, except in Europe, where the inhabitants of Germany, Italy and France, and Britain to some extent, had to take bold and swift measures to reconstruct vast areas devastated by bombing. In the 'newer' cities, the process has been ever faster, and of these, Singapore, which we will examine later, is a typical example. But in all cities, the tendency has been to convert city residential areas to other purposes, and the result has been the proliferation of problems; housing shortage, and the resettlement of large groups of workers to suburban areas; the social changes involved in such moves, and so on. Generally, the residential areas in the centre of cities have become neglected, giving rise to overcrowding and the creation of slums, while the wealthier professional and managerial classes have steadily moved out to suburban or country houses. So, whether the changes have come about through government policy or were made necessary by war-time destruction, they have been changes for the better.

If a modern city is to play any real part in the modern world, its central areas must exclude dwelling places, except perhaps those which are preserved for historic and cultural reasons. The needs of civilized life have to be met, and there simply isn't room unless 'skyscraper' blocks of flats are built - and on the whole, these can be built in suburbs, when there is pressure on space, as in Hong Kong. Secondly, land values in the centre of cities are very great, and rents therefore, become uneconomic, or have to be subsidized by the government. It is not difficult to see why these land values are so great when the competition to build 'at the centre of things' is so great. The list of the various kinds of public buildings, all competing for space, is enormous. To quote but a few, space has to be found for government buildings and offices, police and fire stations, hospitals, office blocks, shops, sometimes factories, hotels, a wide variety of places of amusement, churches, car parks and garages, museums, schools, universities, art galleries, and a hundred others.

The result is that the government, or property speculators, buy land and housing property, demolish the house, and erect some kind of public or commercial building in their place. An acre of land in central London can, for this reason, be worth more than million pounds sterling.

At the same time, it is realized that you cannot run a large city, unless the workers are there to run it. or near enough to commute by bus, train, car or bicycle. So the suburbs expand - either upwards or outwards - and the position is reached that the city's ever-widening circumference has become a mixture of older and larger houses, new industrial developments, and new blocks of flats, or re-housing areas, built by the private speculator, built and subsidized by the government as council houses. Unless architecturally planned as 'satellite townships' such areas soon tend to become depressing warrens of 'living units', utterly featureless and lacking even the 'character' of the old-fashioned slums. But this is only of the problems attending on a re-housing area. New facilities in the home mean changed ways of life. The lost 'community spirit' has to be re-created. Clubs, churches, temples, shops and sporting facilities have to be introduced, if the new area is to have any individuality, if the older people are to be saved from boredom and the younger people from delinquency. Internally, there are 'teething troubles' in the early days. It is not only the housing shortage in a modern city, which is the problem - it is the featureless house in the featureless area.

The age-long housing problem in populous Singapore has been solved by the Government in recent years. Since 1963 the Government, through the Housing and Development Board, has completed thousands units of flats and shop-houses, for the lower income groups. As an example of our previous remarks, it may also be noted that consultant engineers from the U.S.A. have been engaged to advise on transportation by monorail, dual rail or electric train. Traffic congestion has always been a problem, but Singapore is on the way to solving this by road-widening and double-tracking projects, and by building multi-storey car parks.
Recent developments in transport by land, sea and air, have been made necessary by the modern, 'high-pressure' age in which we live, and made possible by scientific and technological development. Since the war, most modern countries have electrified their railway systems, motor cars have become fast, comfortable and reliable, the bicycle has largely been replaced by the motor scooter. The hovercraft, floating with equal ease over sea or land by means of its compressed air jets, is becoming a useful method of making short sealand journeys. The nuclear-powered ship or sub-marine can travel on or in the water for months on end-without refueling. The helicopter can hover, take-off and land vertically, in a jungle clearing, on the deck of a ship, or on the roof of a building. And in the sphere of fast air-transport, the jet-engine has revolutionized speeds and heights at which aircraft can travel, and so made the crossing of oceans and continents a matter of hours. While in the grandest sphere of all, that of outer space, the rocket-propelled space-craft can orbit the globe or reach the moon, enabling humans to land there.

The advantages of these power-war improvements are obvious. The pace of modern life, internationally as well as nationally, required swift communications. In an age, when even the minor affairs and troubles of even obscure countries are given immediate and world-wide publicity by the radio-telephone, and, television through links such as 'Telstar' and 'Early Bird,' has made it possible for statesmen and politicians to travel swiftly to conduct talks and 'on-the-spot' investigations. Domestic issues, once settled locally, or by the sheer passage of time, nowadays, rapidly become internationally explosive. Without the jet plane, U.N. mediators would be powerless. Industrially and commercially, swift travel is no less important. Personal business deals between, say. U.K. and U.S.A., can be finalized within one day - and with all the benefits of personal contact, and 'off-the-record' discussion. The pressure of time on people who can afford foreign travel and holidays is such that they often have only a few days to relax in different surroundings. Swift travel is, therefore, a modem trend of the tourist trade overseas. And within a country, tourism is greatly helped by the modern car, or the motor scooter, both as a cheap method of seeing the countryside and also as an advance on the bicycle for the lower income group commuter. Commuting for the rich, nowadays, is even carried out by helicopter; whereas the scooter moves through the traffic jams, the helicopter can fly over them! And who knows what scientific revelations will be made, when man is able to travel confidently in space and see for himself something of the mysterious universe in which he lives?

But modern transport also has something on the debit side, much of this being due to its actual or potential misuse. The satellite, space-ship, or jet plane can all be used for international spying and for releasing nuclear bombs as well as for peaceful purposes. The fast planes quickly transport troops and equipment to trouble-spots, but international friction is increased when two hostile nations make of the domestic issue of a minor country the battle ground of their own ideological disputes. It is a sad irony that many advances in modem transport have been forced on major countries by diplomatic competition and mutual mistrust.

Internally, modern transport has played havoc with many modern cities. It is said that there are as many private cars as taxpayers in Singapore. In most countries, traffic congestion is an ever present imitant; peace is banished by over-crowded roads, and the wear and tear on the nerves by high-speed traffic. But the car remains a 'status-symbols', the bigger and faster it is, the more status' a family thinks it has.

Philosophically, the idea that material possessions and progress can be equated with human advance in the true sense is rubbish. We all like traveling fast from 'A' to 'B' - but, in the words of the old war-time British poster - 'Is your journey really necessary?'


The Renaissance gave the world an intellectual revolution, the 18th century an industrial revolution, and the 20th century is giving us a scientific revolution, of which the advances in transport and communications are a part.

For the purpose of this essay, we can discount the train, ship, motor car, and telephone, because they have all been with us for many years, and consider more recent developments, As we do so, we are confronted with a bewildering array.

Taking transport first, the most dramatic advance has been in rocketry. At this moment, both the USSR and the USA are capable of putting men `into orbit' round the earth, who can even leave their space-craft and float in the space. Permanent scientific satellites already carry equipment which feeds back date to the earth. The second revolutionary advance is the speed of air transport due to the development of jet engine. Invented by Sir Frank Whittle, this engine today, powers aircraft to incredible speeds and heights. The 'sound barrier' is broken very easily and high flying reduces air friction, so that crossing oceans and continents is now a matter of hours. The safety-factor has also been highly developed. Air line disasters continually make news, but in fact, the accident rate in flying is very low. For local transport, the helicopter has become an incredibly useful machine. Able to hover, land and take-off vertically, this aircraft needs only a confined space; even the top of a large building or a small jungle clearing will do. The machine has shown its paces in war, and also in the more humane tasks of land-sea rescue, collecting land-casualties and dropping food and medical supplies. Perhaps bracketed with this machine is the hovercraft, land-sea or land by means of compressed-air jets. For short, comfortable journeys, this transport innovation is ideal. Four of them have recently been ordered by Britain for the English Channel crossing. Finally, of course, nuclear fission has helped transport. The nuclear engine can operate for months without re-fueling, with the result that submarines carrying strategic nuclear weapons, can remain under sea almost permanently, and that nuclear sea-transports are independent of fuelling-stops.

Turning to communications, we find a series of similar advances. Perhaps the modern age dawned when the murderer, Crippen, was arrested in 1910, as he left the trans-Atlantic liner in the USA where subsequently, he was tried and executed. His arrest was due to the radio-telephone, an invention which has been of great service ever since where world-wide instantaneous communication is desired. Nowadays, it is possible to pick up the telephone in Singapore and within a matter of seconds speak to the subscriber in London. This is achieved by a series of booster radio stations set up at intervals for this purpose. The undersea cable supplements this method, and it is not possible to send pictures by both means. This is a boon to journalists. Internal communication have, of course, been greatly improved. A large office or factory nowadays, relies greatly on two modern methods of communication; that of the intercom telephone system, which enables offices to exchanges notes at the drop of a switch, and the 'public address' system for disseminating news and even 'music while you work'. The same system is used on ships and at sports meetings, among other places. The last has marked the development of radar, which is really a locating system. Radio waves 'bounced' back from the object located define its position, on a screen. Television is, of course, the best known advance in communication. It has a variety of scientific uses in addition to its commercial use as a news and entertainment medium. Satellites such as 'Telestar' and 'Early bird' now enable television to be used on world-wide scale.

We live in an age of scientific marvels, which could make for a better, happier world - were their employment confined to humane purposes. But every one of these inventions can be misused, and the reflective mind is saddened by the fact that whereas man is making enormous advances on the scientific front, he is still in the dark age from the moral point of view.
Modern youth, indeed all youth in whatever country, have something in common with the crab. The crab, if you look at him carefully as he sidewalks the golden sandy shores of Malaysia, has a very hard outside shell under which is a very soft interior and young people can be compared with crabs.

Today's youth, in general, seem at first glance to be hard, sophisticated and wordy. On the whole, he is better educated than his parents were. There are more schools, more colleges and universities and more chances for him to develop the best that is in him. He enjoys all the advantages of modern science, television, radio, faster and more efficient travel - all contribute to his urbanity. A Malaysian youth enjoys travel these days just as the youth of Europe and America does. Mass production means cheap, smart clothes within the reach of most pockets. It means possessions too, on a far larger scale than what the previous generations have had.

This group, if they are working are comparatively "well-off," and since between the ages of fifteen and twenty, most of them are single, and live at home, very cheaply; they have more actual spending money per head than any other age group. Consequently, their pleasures and their possessions, clothes, make-up in the case of girls, and motor-cycles and things of that kind for boys, are more abundant than they were ten years ago.

This age group too, seems to like the same kind of things and adopt similar fashions. Pop music is its theme song. Walkman (cassette player) and youth seem to be inseparable and it is "a hard day's night" for the rest! The 'Pop groups' have set the fashion among many young people, for other things too. The long hair style of the modern young man of the West has become almost a status symbol. Clothes for boys have a more distinctive cut and are fashioned from brighter materials. The girls, while adoring the Western singers, wear their hairs long and straight and "Baby Doll" dresses are "with it."

This, then, is the outer shell of the modern youth, but underneath is the soft vulnerable part. He has his problems just as his parents had at the same age. For some examinations loom forever large and these are, in some ways harder because competition is keen these days, and the "rat race" so much quicker. In an Age of Technology, great emphasis is laid on technical and written qualifications of all kinds. For others, who are wage earners already, there are problems of balancing the budget, of making ends meet, of pleasing the boss and doing a satisfactory job.

For all of them, there is the difficult process of transition from the child, with very few responsibilities to the adult with very many. How to behave? What to say? Shall I sound or look silly? How to run a banking account or a car? Such questions may seem trivial, but to modern youth, struggling to find his feet in an adult world, they are all important, because youth is, above all sensitive. An advantage of age is that life teaches us not to care too much what other people think, but this is not given to youth and so they are easily hurt.

Questions of religion, of morals, of politics worry them, because this age group, or whatever educational attainment is a "thinking" group. It questions, for the first time, the validity of parental utterances or the sagacity of philosophers and religious leaders. All the time, it is searching for truth and for the answers to life's problems. It sometimes thinks that it has found them until life shows that is has not! Much, far too much, is written, discussed and published about modern youth, its habits and its behavior.

Juvenile crime and delinquency, encouraged by violence in television programs and 'Comics,' are, it is said on the increase. For the small minority, this is unfortunately true, but it must be remembered that minor crimes, all of which are recorded and apprehended today, would have been 'overlooked' or punished by 'authority' on the spot, fifty years ago. Nowadays, all crimes, however trivial, reach juvenile Courts and so swell the statistics.

Modem youth is often irritating, but which generation of young people is not? It may have 'oddities' which to older people seem very peculiar indeed, but, on the whole, the picture is a bright one. Young people, whether in the East or in the West, enjoy their young and, with help and guidance, will mature to be the citizens and parents of tomorrow. Good citizens and good parents, in these days will be discussing the foibles and peccadilloes of their own children - the youth of tomorrow.
The damming of rivers to form reservoirs was common practice in Roman times, and probably much earlier. Over the intervening centuries the practice has evolved for three main purposes; human consumption, irrigation, and industrial use. Since rainfall is never sufficiently uniform to provide a reliable water source from normal river flow, the reservoir has always been a great boon, spanning as it does lengthy periods of drought. There are, of course, other reasons for damming a river. Following heavy storms in mountainous areas more water than a river can carry will flow down to the plain, inundating large areas often destroying crops, homes and animal and human life. Mountain passes, if dammed, give the opportunity not only to control the flow of flood water at its peak but also to retain large quantities for controlled use in dry weather. This control of water works from sea to river as well as from to sea. An example is the recently constructed Thames barrier below Woolwich on the River Thames in England. This consists of solid pillars across the river with massive steel plates between each pillar which can be raised or lowered mechanically. The object is to protect the low-lying parts of London when a certain combination of wind and tide raises the water level by as much as thirty feet.

A further use of the dam is to produce hydroelectric power, the power station, of course, being built below the level of the dam. Water is channeled through conduits and used as mechanical power for the turbines. It is then returned to the river. Reservoir water is also used today in vast quantities in nuclear power stations for cooling and other purposes and is similarly returned to the river or to the sea.

Some rivers in their natural state are not navigable by large vessels, or run dry in seasons of drought. Where such rivers can be dammed they can be given a constant depth for purposes of navigation, and this benefits a country's communication system.

More often than not a dam may be central in a multipurpose scheme including most of the functions outlined above. This is particularly true in countries lying in temperate zones, where water shortage can be a nuisance but is rarely a disaster.

Matters are different in underdeveloped countries which are hot, dry and barren. In these areas populations are often nomadic, driving flocks and herds from waterhole to waterhole, or scratching a mere subsistence from the soil. Drought means disease, hunger, dehydration and death to animals and humans alike. The damming of major rivers such as the Nile is crucial to life itself, and the control of their floodwater for irrigation purposes essential, but even this is not preventing large tracts of North East Africa from reverting to desert.

Perhaps of least importance is the social value of a reservoir. Some stocked with trout, provide good fishing, and most are used by sailing clubs, and for other aquatic sports. A reservoir is also a great attraction to water-loving birds and often becomes an interesting staging-post for migrations.

Damming a river can also cause problems. A great area of land, with its trees, flora and fauna, farms and houses, has to be inundated. Neither the resident, who have to resettle elsewhere, nor the environmentalists, appreciate this. The problem is more acute when the countryside about to be spoilt is environmentally unique, as in a recent case in Australia, where attempts were made to involve Prince Charles and Princess Diana in the dispute. Creating an artificial lake inevitably changes the character of a large area. Farmland is destroyed, natural scenery, in the opinion of some, despoiled. People have to move, inconveniently.

A second drawback may be political. Many rivers flow through more than one country, that lying higher up the river having the whip-hand. A dam built for one country's benefit may be much to the detriment of another. The USSR has been in dispute with Turkey over this matter as has Egypt with the Sudan.

Dams are vulnerable to air attack in wartime. The destruction of the Mohne See dam in the Second World War brought the industry of the Ruhr to a virtual standstill, as well as causing loss of life. There have also been cases of the collapse of dams due to inadequate strength and imperfect design.
The important of common salt
 

In its mineral form sodium chloride, NaCl, is known as common salt. It is important because it is essential to the health of human beings and of animals. For domestic use it is fined down to what is known as table-salt, and small quantities of other chemicals are added to it to keep it free-flowing when in contact with the atmosphere.

Salt and potassium are combined to produce iodised salt, used when iodine is lacking in diet. It s absence causes goitre, the swelling of the thyroid gland.

Livestock as well as humans need salt, and this provided in the form of solid blocks, known as 'salt-licks'.

Salt is also crucial to the food industry. It is used in meatpacking sausage-making and fish-curing both for seasoning and as a preservative. It is also used in the curing and preserving of hides and in the form of brine of brine for refrigeration purposes.

Salt is extensively used in the chemical industry; in the manufacture of baking soda, sodium bicarbonate; of caustic soda, sodium hydroxide; of hydrochloric acid, of chlorine etc. It is also used in soap-making, and in the manufacture of glaze and porcelain enamel. It also enters metallurgic processes as flux, a compound used to assist the fusing of metals.

Salt lowers the melting point of water, so in combination with grit, it is used for clearing roads of snow and ice. It is also used for water-softening by means of removing calcium and magnesium compounds from tap water.
The relative importance to man and animals of the five senses of sight, hearing, touch, taste and smell
 

It is difficult to grade the senses in relative importance to mankind. Opinions vary particularly between sight and hearing. A person blind from birth has no concept of vision, so presumably does not `miss' sight. It is different for a person who goes blind because suddenly, or gradually, so much is lost; personal independence to a large degree, driving a car, reading and watching television, enjoyment of all forms of visual beauty. Some of these deprivations can be partially overcome. The loss of sight tends to train a more acute hearing. People will always help the blind in practical ways, and there are many modern aids for the visually handicapped, ranging from braille and books on tape to all kinds of domestic appliances designed for the sightless. Musical appreciation and music making are also open to the blind. Many blind people would grade vision as less important than hearing, since, given help and their own determination, they can live a relatively full life. The obvious drawback to deafness lies in loss of communication, though today there are some marvelous machines which allow the sufferer to learn speech through varied frequencies of vibration. The traditional method of lip-reading supplements this, so that conversation and teaching can be carried out. The social disadvantage of deafness is that of the impatience of others. Deafness is not at once obvious and so may be mistaken for stupidity. In the modern world deafness can also be dangerous; traffic-sense, particularly in children, depends largely on hearing. Touch, taste and smell are all sources of pleasure, the two latter being important in the enjoyment of food, but they are all relatively dispensable. Their absence can, however be dangerous; the loss of nerve endings can lead to severe domestic burns and abrasions, while taste and smell can detect lethal gases and poisonous substances.
From the human point of view most people would grade the importance of the senses in the order given in the question. This is not necessarily so in the animal world. Smell or 'scent' is of crucial importance to many animals, who rely on it to detect enemies and to find quarry. Thus it becomes far more highly developed than in humans, since survival may depend on it. For the same reason hearing is of nearly the same importance. The hearing range of animals is much wider than that of humans. Dogs can hear supersonic sounds and react to them at great distances. Many animals have very limited vision, simply because vision is relatively unimportant. Touch and taste are also of less importance to animals than to humans, though, as with humans, these two senses, combined with smell, have a protective role in warning them off obnoxious and poisonous organic and inorganic substances.

Nobody can ask an animal to grade the importance of the senses, but it seems to be, smell, hearing, sight, touch and taste in that order.

`It pays to advertise.' The old adage remains true in principle because advertising not only sells goods but also creates the demand for new lines. The home computer is a modern example. The half a dozen big producers go in for highly competitive advertising, some of it aimed at children. They can play games, educate themselves, prepare themselves for modern living. All this can be done with books and paper, but parents are pressurized into buying computers, never-the-less, the sop to their consciences being that they can use the computer for family accounts. Of course they can. Equally they could do their family accounts once a month on the back of an old envelope.

Advertising sells goods and services, otherwise it would not exist, and the development of advertising in the West dates back at least three centuries, coinciding roughly with the publication of early journals such as The London Gazette, Tatler and Spectator in England, the circulation of which was largely limited to London and one or two large provincial cities. So advertising began on a local basis, because wherever you create a demand you must be able to meet it. So various factors combined to create national and international advertising; mass-production, based in the Industrial Revolution of the 18th and 19th centuries, rail communication and transport, the development of printing, especially color printing, and the freighter for overseas markets. For as long as most people can remember advertising has been seen wherever the public go; on walls, shop fronts and hoardings, in railway stations and the underground, on streamers trailing behind light aircraft, from static balloons, on trains, buses and business vehicles, taxis and container lorries. With the advent of color-television, the commercial break has assumed primary importance. Some commercial radio channels still carry advertising. Handbills, advertising local firms, flood through the letter-boxes. Junk mail, addressed to computerized lists of likely buyers, fills the waste paper baskets.

From this will be seen that over-kill is one drawback to the effectiveness of modern advertising. People get fed-up if they are over-pressurized, especially intelligent people. The hard sell becomes counter-productive. Yet the fact that it continues argues that this kind of advertising is financially justified.

Advertising is therefore big business, and the world's capitals, outside the Eastern bloc, offer scope to advertising firms with their highly specially areas of expertise. Such firms employ some of the best ideas people, graphic artists, promotional experts, and film producer and technicians.

The effectiveness of advertising depends on the assessment of the consumer's motivation in buying, and a direct or indirect appeal to that motivation; sometimes the creation of that motivation, by an appeal to a range of human instincts. Where there is poverty in a potential market the only effective appeal is based on cheapness, reliability and effectiveness in a product. In a mixed or affluent community the field is wide open. Most Western advertising works in a competitive market where the variety of brands is matches by the consumer's power of choice.

The soft sell works best when appealing to the very rich, and usually price is not mentioned. A country house with a hundred acres of land is offered as a modest gentleman's residence, the Rolls Royce is merely described as 'the best car in the world. Everybody knows that a small group of products are the best in their fields, so advertising merely keeps them in the public eye. 'Apeing the celebrity' is another line of attack; if a famous heavy-weight uses a particular deodorant, or a great actress a particular shampoo, good sales result. Another successful line with a shampoo is that it works, implying that the others don't. In contrast sexy lingerie ads are self-defeating. they bore women and men don't usually buy lingerie. Yet sex can sell chocolates. If a stunt-man goes through the hoops to bring his beautiful girl-friend the brand of her choice he will take the easier way of buying them in the supermarket and she may begin to fantasize about the bringer. The appeal to snobbery still works. Because those bright, successful, affluent Jones next door certain brand names, the failed, boring economical neighbors must do likewise. Comic ads amuse some, repel others, but in either case people keep the brand name in mind, if only never to buy it.

Most countries today have a statutory body which seeks to deep advertising up to a certain basic standards; ads must be morally decent, truthful and legal. However there are countless ways of disobeying the spirit if not the letter of the law. Subliminal advertising has rightly been banned. The advertising of foodstuffs has been improved by 'sell by' and statements of contents. 
 	
The causes and consequences of erosion
 

Erosion is the eating or wearing away of land features. It is caused by a variety of factors, some natural, others man-made. The consequences can be serious both for the natural world and for man himself.

The natural causes are weathering, water, ice, wind and change of temperature. The changes may be very gradual, sometimes taking millions of years and dating back to the major upheavals on the planet when the earth was very young. Wind and rain driving incessantly against sandstone, formed originally by immense pressures on early sea-beds and then lifted above sea-level by volcanic eruption or the clash of land-plates, wears the stone back into sand, thus creating beaches along the sea-shore. In the case of harder rock such as granite, surfaces are worn smooth.

Weathering also erodes exposed coastlines in temperate zones. Often cliffs and dunes simply disappear over perhaps a short period of two or three hundred years. The sea encroaches, and sometimes coastal villages are lost. There is written evidence of English villages having been lost under the waves.
 
The sea also plays its part in the erosion process. The Netherlands, facing the turbulent North Sea, have for centuries fought the battle against salt water encroachment due to erosion. Great dykes have been built to exclude the sea, and gradually the low-lying salt flats have been sweetened and fertilized for agriculture and bulb-growing. In another way, the sea also erodes rock fragments by friction due to the tides. The smooth pebbles on northern beaches are the result of their having rubbed together over millions of years.

The great ice-floes attached to the poles play a conspicuous part in regulating sea levels. In general, sea levels are thought to be rising, though opinions vary as to the rate. At present, many fear what is called the 'greenhouse effect', i.e. the punching of holes in the ozone layer due to industrial gases and the use of CFCs. Nations are beginning to agree to eliminate these hazards. The result might be the melting of the ice-caps causing a devastating rise in sea levels. This would put much of the land in temperate climates under sea-water.

Slow-moving glaciers also have an effect. Their immense power pulverizes any rocks in their path. The piles of shale at the foot of many mountains resulted from the pressure of glaciers millions of years ago.

Wind is probably the greatest single cause of erosion. Where there is no protection given to the soil, and after a period of drought or intense heat, the soil crumbles to dust and literally blows away. Man himself can either let this happen or take steps to prevent it. Rain, of course, has a dual effect. In some circumstances it can wash away the soil into river beds, where it is carried down to estuaries, often silting them so that they require dredging. Inland, and on flat territory, rain holds the soil together. Yet rain depends on trees and foliage which cause clouds to precipitate. The central plains of North America from time to time become dust bowls, simply because all vegetation has been cleared in favor of large scale, economic cereal growing. The same clearance of rain forests goes on currently in South America in favor of cash crops. Conservationists throughout the world are resisting these clearances, but are fighting vested interests.

The rain forests support a wide variety of animals, birds, insects and plants, many of which can only exist in their present habitat. This is an added reason for resisting deforestation. Sooner or later when the forests have gone the climate will change from not and humid to dry. The soil will crumble and erode.

Tribes dependent on land for grazing and agriculture lose their herds, flocks and food. They become nomads or refugees and are exposed to epidemic and starvation. Erosion can cause much human suffering.

Even in temperate countries large-scale farming is now being discouraged, for the foregoing reasons. In England such farming has meant the destruction of hedges, ditches and trees, aging spoiling traditional landscapes and the habitats of bird, animal and insect species.

Some erosion is natural and inevitable. Much however is caused by man. Long term conservation is essential if man is to pass on a beautiful planet to future generations.
Obviously the practical means of doing so lies in the hands of the police force, para-military antiriot forces, and, in the last resort, the armed forces themselves. In democratic countries, these are firmly under the control of civilian governments, the members of which are freely elected.

Governments legislate and judiciaries administer the law. However the degree of control over the individual and the nature of the sanctions to be applied depend partly on the traditions of the country concerned and partly on the seriousness of the law and order problems which the country faces.

What are today's problem? Political protest, leading to strikes, street demonstrations, physical violence, use of arms and weapons, mob violence and vandalism, looting, and in extreme cases, civil war. Football violence, such as has recently excluded England from matches in Europe. Crime against the person and against property e.g. murder, rape, theft, burglary and vandalism. These evils spread from country to country by imitation through international media publicity. Paradoxically, they also spread when law and order sanctions are either tightened or relaxed. This dilemma faces Mr Gorbachev precisely because of glasnost and perestroika, particularly insofar as political unrest spreads through the Soviets and Russia's satellite neighbors.

So the distinction between personal and political motivation behind lawlessness must be made. Where the motivation is personal, i.e. based in natural violence, social resentment due perhaps to deprivation, greed, sexual amorality, hatred or drug-induced mental states, then sanctions must be toughened as required. There are arguments for and against the death penalty, but there is little doubt that it provides an effective deterrent. There are arguments against physical punishments, but they also deter. English law provides severer penalties for offences against property than against the person. In view of the muggings, street and public transport violence experienced today, this must be reversed.

The modish, liberal explanation of the increase of such crime is that `society rejects the poor and underprivileged. Rebuild slum areas and offer more government handouts and crime would disappear'. This is nonsense. What is society but a collection of individuals? Every individual is endowed with personal choice. The individual must be made to choose the law and order path. Religion and morality must be instilled into children in the home, in the school and in the workplace. Some form of compulsory national service of a non-military nature would benefit young adults of all racial origins and of both sexes.

The more difficult question is that of offence against law and order when the motivation is truly political. Do citizens owe a duty to support and preserve the established order in return for the benefits they receive from it? If not, at what point does the freedom fighter become the terrorist? At what point in a democracy does the legitimate lobby become the violent, chanting, vociferous and sometimes blackmailing pressure group? The answers must of course depend on the political stance of the individual. Again however the distinction between political and personal motivation must be clearly made. In Ireland religion and politics are used as a cover for common criminality. In South Africa the motivation behind violence is often tribal rivalry or the instinct to loot, pillage and murder.

The justification for using the sanctions already mentioned in order to maintain law and order when offences are political lies in the quality of any country's government. Where there is democracy, where there is a multi-party system, where the legal system is fair, where human rights including that of free speech within the law are preserved, there lies the justification. When these things are denied then there can be a case for resistance, even revolution.

Yet underlying the spread of common criminality is the flight from religion and morality and the weakening of the family system. Much youth delinquency could be pre-empted by discipline in the home, school and work-place, always provided the motivation behind such discipline is affection and the true well-being of the young person.
We live in a world we are perpetually exposed to what William Shakespeare described as "the slings and arrows of outrageous fortune". It is true that much suffering is caused by accident and natural disaster and is therefore almost unavoidable. A drunken car driver may kill or maim. Hurricanes and earthquakes leave a trail of death, injury and havoc. Some steps may be taken to lessen the likelihood of this kind of suffering by imposing severe penalties for drunken driving, or living, if possible, outside hurricane and earthquake centers, but the innocent still suffer, and are likely to go on suffering.

Unmerited suffering has always perplexed philosophers, who can rarely say more than that we live in an imperfect world. Religions supply explanations; God, or the gods, punish mankind for breaking the divine law, and to some extent this is true. Abuse of alcohol, tobacco, drugs and sex carries with it automatic retribution. Whether catastrophe is a direct form of retribution for sin, imposed by a divine being or beings is very doubtful. What is quite evident is that we are required to live in a world which is dangerous, and whatever protection from either natural or man-made disaster we can find has to be made by ourselves. Some religions teach that there will be an after life in which all wrongs will be set right, and where the injustices of this life will be redressed. This enables the faithful to put up with whatever misfortune comes their way in the hope of better things to come. Suffering has to be faced by everybody, sooner or later, and it is no use philosophizing about divine impartiality. "God's rain falls on the just and the unjust", says the Old Testament. Nearer the mark is this rather flippant rhyme;

"The rain it raineth every day
Upon the just and unjust fella, But mostly in the just, because
The unjust hath the just's umbrella'.

The lessons of history are against the probability of abolishing suffering, yet that is the ideal, the objective towards which all civilized human beings should work.

If selfishness and hatred could be replaced by unselfishness and love, this would go a long way towards the alleviation of suffering. Ever since pre-history there have been wars, usually caused either by pure aggression of by greed for fertile and or natural resources. Since 1945 war has taken on a new and horrific dimension. Though nuclear bombs have been used only against Japan, there is a proliferation of nuclear weapons, and recently there have been terrible examples of the use of napalm, nerve gases, and chemical armaments. There is no need to enlarge on the resultant suffering. And since all these armaments are universally available, and since the arms trade virtually knows no boundaries, any real progress must lie in the direction of multi-lateral disarmament and severe restriction on the arms trade. This can only be achieved by a move towards the "one-world" concept and a heightened respect for the dignity and basic rights of the individual.

The latter point raises the matter of political systems. Most civilized countries today are governed democratically rather than autocratically. The democratization of much of Eastern Europe is a real step forward. Gone are the secret police and the barbarous acts perpetrated against the individual by the previous regimes. However, political oppression and brutality to dissenters still exists in many parts of the world. It is to be hopes that the major powers will exert such pressure that autocracies will finally be overthrown. With that overthrow could come an end to torture and the physical and mental degradation which continues to scar the face of humanity.

There are three final points. First, religious fanaticism, an age-old problem. Does God want "Holy Wars" and the self-sacrifice of teenagers on the battlefield? Does God approve of hostage-taking, of the bombing of town centers or aircraft? There is one theme common to all true religious belief; "Do unto others as you would they do unto you".

Second, the poverty of the "third world". The wars waged by, and the cynicism shown by many third-world leaders should be brought to an end, if necessary by force. International and voluntary aid is often diverted to the purchase of arms and the feeding of troops.

Finally, the frailty of the human body itself. It is true that God allows physical suffering but has given man the intellect t alleviate or prevent it, then medical research must not be hampered. Science is on the way to finding the cause, and therefore the elimination of cancer and other inherited diseases. Genetic in vitro probes can also prevent the birth of handicapped children. Research must be given the green light.
Strictly speaking, a language is a verbalized means of communication, enabling the speaker to convey thought to another person. However, the more complex the thoughts or ideas, the harder or more cumbersome language becomes. To explain verbally why 'the square on the hypotenuse of a right-angled triangle equals the sum of the squares on the other two sides' would require a long and tedious paragraph or great math tutors. And this is the simplest possible example; anything more complicated would be unmanageable. So in this way mathematical symbols which nowadays are universally accepted, compress information in a way that no ether 'language' possibly could, and this fact supports the topic statements.

However, this 'language' is only available to most people in it's simplest forms, i.e. arithmetic, algebra and geometry, and these are taught in schools because they have everyday usage. The shop assistant needs arithmetic, unless there is an automatic cash till, and technicians of all kinds need the other two; perhaps more, such as trigonometry, logarithms and the calculus, should he or she be dealing with quantities that vary in time and space. In this sense, of course, mathematics is a minority language, a language intelligible only to the specialists of all nations.

The time may come when knowledge of higher mathematics is far more wide-spread, however. The 'new' mathematics is now being taught in many schools, sometimes alongside the traditional approach, and younger students find the new methods more intelligible. The principles of course have not changed; merely the setting out. However, there are great developments available to younger students enabling them to see the subject as a whole rather than as a series of separate compartments, and this should engender more interest in those whose natural bent is in the direction of the arts.

Mathematics has been described as 'the spearhead of natural philosophy', and this was certainly true up to about 1800. The subject grew up independently in China, India, the Arab world and Europe. For example, many of the Alexandrian and Greek schools of geometricians, represented by Thales of Miletus, Pythagoras, Euclid, Archimedes etc advanced propositions which were already Pythagoras, Euclid, Archimedes etc advanced propositions which were already known elsewhere. The West derived it's numbers system from the Hindu-Arabic world, which reached Europe in about 1000 AD. The West learnt mathematics from the Arab world and, from the 15th century, great developments took place.

Descartes revived algebraic geometry, Napier invented logarithms, Newton and Leibnitz the calculus. Lobachevsky developed non-Euclidian geometry, and was followed by Einstein, though the latter was more of a physicist than a mathematician. From Newton onwards, mechanics and astronomy began to use advanced mathematics and, later on, physics came in for the same treatment. Both 'pure' and 'applied' mathematics became the indispensable tools of progress. Pure maths reaches conclusions by means of the deductive process, and may be independent of need. Applied maths consists of developments to meet the requirements of science and technology.

So mathematics has become a 'beautiful language' in several senses. Firstly, in it's ability to compress ideas, just as a great poet achieves desired effects by great verbal economy. Second, because it's tools, the symbols, are internationally accepted. Third, because it is entirely objective, and completely exact, allowing no room for prejudice or human emotion. Fourth, because it constantly provides the ground for new hypotheses. These in turn are checked by logic and observation. Often as with Pythagoras, mathematical conclusions can be checked by other means. So mathematics can lead man closer to absolute truth than any other means, that is in the categories of discovery in which it can operate.

Mathematics means 'facts', verified by experiment, and these facts are true within the four dimensions in which the human mind can operate. The other dimensions, perhaps six according to Stephan Hawking, must be compressed into infinitesimal space, so are likely to remain the prerogative of the Creator!
Over the past three decades, there has been an explosion of industrial development in many Far Eastern countries, ranging from those with no work-force expertise to the far more sophisticated states such as Japan and Singapore. Most countries have .some natural resource to develop, be it oil, timber, rubber or minerals and gemstones. The general process has been to exploit these resources by importing foreign expertise and equipment. Ideally, the results have led to dramatic increases in countries' GNP, favorable balances of trade, and the establishment of hard currencies which attract foreign investment. All these should lead to the building of hospitals and health centers, schools and colleges, sporting facilities and other amenities. Good wages should permit radical improvements in living standards. Unfortunately, this only happens where a country enjoys a reasonably democratic political system. otherwise, in a one-party state, the temptation is to divert new money into armaments, unnecessary extravagances and sometimes the pockets of those in power.

Singapore and Japan are not typical of the Far East, since for decades they have been ahead of the rest in industrial development, although keen competition has reduced their lead in the past seven or eight years. Oil exploration in the Singapore region has dropped, and with it the demand for the re-export of oil-related machinery, drilling equipment and metal sheets and bars. Electronic components, diodes, photocells and integrated circuits; consumer goods such as radios, TVs, clothing, furniture and vegetable oils have also declined, due to competition from countries where much lower wage-levels are acceptable. However, Singapore will always benefit from its free trade zones. There are six; five for seaborne cargo and one for airborne. With their time-limited but duty and document-free storage facilities, they will always remain an attractive proposition. So does INTRACO, an international and paid-up trading company which has many useful functions.

The above relates to trade as much as to industry, but the results of both are much the same. On the industrial side, apart from the products listed in para 2, mention must be made of the great diversity of industrial products in modern Singapore; industrial chemicals, printing and publishing, shipyard restructuring and upgrading, aircraft repair and overhaul capabilities, machine tools and related products, and office equipment. Less than 5% of the land area of Singapore is used for farming, the main products being pork, poultry, eggs, vegetables, fish and cut flowers.

So to summarize the advantages. Industrial proliferation generates jobs. Money can be spent on universities, colleges, schools and training centers. State housing, mostly blocks of flats, offers rented accommodation. Health, social and police services can be financed. Typical health hazards, such as the anopheles mosquito, can be eliminated, and both hygiene and family planning publicized. Above all, relatively late industrialization means that state-of-the-art factories can be built. There is no legacy of ancient factories to modernize or demolish.

Yet all is not sweetness and light. There is something to be said for a more leisurely pace of life. A sudden shift to urban dwelling and high tech employment can and does set up psychological problems, which lead to health problems. Moreover, there was something to be said for the semi jungle nature of Singapore, and it would be pleasant to have a few wild tigers present. However, the main disadvantage is that industrialization sets up living standard expectations which depend absolutely on a healthy overseas trade. At present there is a world trade recession. Also, surrounding countries are becoming far more competitive. Inflation and widespread unemployment are the chief dangers.
The answer is that computers already allow some people to work from home, though clearly this cannot apply to more than a limited number of people and a limited number of occupations. As to whether this is desirable, the answer is philosophical as well as practical.

Computers, both analog and digital, have developed out of all recognition since the Second World War, when they were large, mechanical, and limited in use. They were then used in conjunction with radar for missile guidance and also for code breaking and a small range of mathematical functions. Most of those functions are now available in a child's pocket calculator. The application of electronics in the 50s followed by the use of the silicon chip and pre-printed circuits widened the computer's function out of all recognition, permitting a myriad series of voltage controls. The computer today is powerful, compact and relatively small. It combines readily with word-processing, faxing, and the electronic creation of screen graphics, which can be modified either by keyboard control or by electronic pen. The analog computer rapidly solves differential equations for civil and mechanical engineering problems. The digital computer with it's card punching function permits access to data banks, and allows the processing of records and all the kinds of work connected with bills, orders, wages, VAT etc. The computer today is integral in the world of business, commerce, design, word-processing and industry in general. Any organization from the small business upwards keeps a computer to which remote terminals may be linked, giving access at a distance to all it's functions and information.

The need for all white-collar workers to do a nine-to-five job in the office has disappeared. Today it is obviously possible for all workers down to lower-management level to work from home, and as computers continue to develop it is likely that firms will find it convenient to let an increasing number do so. Whether this is a desirable change is a moot point.

Some visionaries anticipate the day when computers, in combination with robotry, will totally eliminate the need for work as we know it. This may theoretically become possible, though in any event computers could never quite eliminate the need for maintenance groups. To most of us, however, such a prospect would be appalling. Leisure only has value by reason or it's contrast with work, and the instinct to work is a built-in part of the human makeup. The past millenia have not adjusted our genes in this direction for nothing.

A more likely scenario is that a much higher proportion of workers will eventually be able to operate from home. Of course, many people have always done so. The writer, the painter, the sculptor either work in the study or in an adjacent studio. Even the professional musician practices at home. Some of these are reclusive by nature, others not.

The majority of people are naturally gregarious. To produce their best they need both the company of others, and the 'atmosphere' of work. There is an instinct to go out to the job, and with all save workaholics. to be able to draw a clear line between work and leisure. The benefits of doing so are obvious. Easy association with others is confidence building. Ideas improve and extend as they are exchanged. You cannot get the 'feel' of a firm or institution at long range. If you have any responsibility at all you need to be in personal touch with managers and directors, not for ever using the telephone or the fax machine. And what about the social side, the friends made, the office party, the human element ?

To work in public demands a certain standard of dress and personal care. It would need more self-discipline than many people have to keep up the same standards at home. Self-discipline and the observance of good routines may come easily to some, but not all.

The reality of today's work-pattern is that when children are of school age wives also take on paid employment. Perhaps the wife also would have a computer terminal and all the paraphernalia of a modern office? Would they share facilities or duplicate equipment? How many flats and small houses have even one room which could be turned into an office? Who would make the coffee, cook the meals, collect the children, do the shopping and the housework? One can foresee many sources of domestic discord!

Computers may change. Human nature does not. As a tool, the computer is vulnerable to the enemy, industrial or personal. Hackers can wipe out records unless there is duplicated soft-ware backup kept under lock and key. Hackers can introduce a virus.

The more one considers the implications of working from home the less desirable the project seems to be.
First, what is this effect? Ever since the Industrial Revolution began in the 18th Century smoke from fossil fuels, oil, natural gad and especially coal had deposited carbon dioxide in the lower part of the earth's upper atmosphere. The effect of this had been that part of the energy of the sun's rays reflected from the earth's surface had been absorbed by the C02 and by water vapor and returned to the earth in the form of heat. Thud the atmosphere is behaving increasingly like a greenhouse. The glass allows the sunlight through but traps the heat. The consequence is what is called 'global warming'.

There is a school of thought which says that the result will be a change in the earth's climate, plus an increase in nitrous oxide, methane gad and FREONS. It is predicted that by the mid 21st Century average temperatures will ride by 5 degree C (9 degrees F). This will result in the melting of glaciers and the polar ice-caps. Coastal waters will ride and inundate many low-lying countries. Food production for an increasing world population will be put at risk.

Not everyone, of course, accepts this scenario, though the quantity of CO2 in the lower upper-atmosphere is constantly monitored, and the fact that the level is increasing is not disputed. Whether or not the expected ride in average temperature will happen is another matter. There have been no significant climatic changed for centuries, indeed millennia and, the opponents of the doom-merchants argue, nature has it'd own methods of damage-limitation and self-adjustment. Moreover, there are no present signs of global warming. The weather pattern in Britain, for example, is much the dame ad it wad in Victorian days, or Roman days for that matter. Why should it suddenly change? Coal had always been burnt and before coal, wood and charcoal. Forest fired have always raged. Volcanoes, and explosions such ad Krakatoa (1883) have always thrown tons of noxious gases into the atmosphere. After that particular explosion a cloud of dust and gas drifted over Europe and darkened the sun for six months - before dispersing naturally. A tidal wave drowned 36,000 in the Java-Sumatra area. Nature's self-damage greatly exceeds any possible human contribution.

The fact is, however, that many people do take the 'greenhouse' threat seriously, and there is a cross-section of people in most industrialized countries who lobby continuously against the continued use of fossil fuels. Whether they are right, or merely alarmist, only time will tell. However, the fact that CO2 is on the increase is undisputed. Further, it cannot be disputed that the greenhouse effect is a possibility, even if remote. Nuclear war is also a possibility, though remote, but every possible step is taken by democratic countries to ensure that it will not happen. So, therefore, should every possible step be taken to reduce, even eliminate C02 emissions. There are already agreements in the USA and in Europe to cut down, or eliminate the use of fossil fuels by certain target dates.

The problem is that many countries are geared to fossil rather than nuclear power sources. Supplies of coal, and probably of oil and natural gas, are virtually unlimited. In Britain, most pits have closed down, causing wide-spread unemployment and much consequent human suffering. The coal lobby argues for emission cleansing and a compromise, both economic and environmental, may be possible. It would be cheaper, they argue, than to transfer entirely to nuclear power, whose installations may in any event cause health hazards and even the occasional disaster.

One optimistic sign is that proponents of all power sources agree that every generation has an obligation to preserve rather than exploit and pollute the planer. The worst culprits in the C02 saga are the old-fashioned heavy industry plants, such as those in the Ruhr, East Germany, and what was the Soviet Union, and the fossil-fuel fired electricity generating stations. Much of the old industrial plant has now been either modernised or superseded, and some countries such as France have moved over almost entirely to nuclear power. That, in my opinion, is the way forward.

I do not believe that in any event the greenhouse effect would have the dire consequences which have been predicted. Yet it is a risk which we should not take. Modern technology has outgrown the use of fossil fuels, and apart from any possible dangers to future generations, the kind of world to which we commit them should be a clean, wholesome and beautiful world, as the Creator intended.
 	
'Science can never provide a final answer or things, it is only a way of studying them' Do you agree ?
 

It is somewhat rash to assume that the only role of science is to answer the question 'How?' That was true in the days of Newton, when an educated person could have a grasp in outline of all human knowledge. Science then filled some of the gaps left by the deliberations of the philosopher and the theologian. Since then, it has far outstripped the contributions of both. Philosophy has degenerated into historical study and has no modern contribution to make. Theology has made no advance since the Middle Ages. The mantle of seeking answers to man's most fundamental questions has fallen on science. Whether these questions will ever be answered is an entirely different matter, but there is no other way ahead. So the topic-statement is fundamentally wrong.

By 'science', of course, is meant physics, which is fundamental to all studies - chemistry, biology, astronomy, indeed all macro and micro investigation. Physics has identified the laws which keep the universe in a state of equilibrium, and today seeks a unified theory to account for the space-time continuum necessary to the existence of that equilibrium, and the various other 'dimensions' beyond the four known which are postulated. So science moves towards the first philosophical question, 'Is there a unified theory, or are events ultimately random?' The answer to this question, if ever found, leads to the far more fundamental question, 'To what extent, if any, id God (the Creator) limited by his own creation?' The determinism of Laplace is now seen to be totally beside the point, and belongs to a mechanistic view of the universe which can no longer be sustained. Today, science is moving rapidly towards a 'chaos' theory which takes into account God's freedom of action plus the predictable results of laws already known to us, and also unpredictable events.

It is interesting that whereas the old scientific determinism either limited to the Creator's function or precluded the necessity of a Creator, or saw the Creator as totally detached from his creation, science today is begin forced into a belief in God. It also moves towards an acceptance that the scientifically unknown area, the God - mankind 'personal' relationship, is not only feasible, but likely. So science has become much more than 'a way of studying things'. Whether science can get beyond this point is a matter of conjecture. At a shrewd guess, science may well establish the possibility of 'eternal life', without being able to advance any more proof than could the old-time theologian. World religions have always said that such a belief depends on revelation and personal faith, and it may well be the Creator's intention to keep it that way. Faith, at least, would be greatly devalued if it could ever become the subject of scientific proof, whatever that may be.

Another answer, again stemming from the 'chaos' theory, is to the co-existence of good and evil. If there is a Creator, it follows that evil, at least as understood by humanity, must have been allowed to enter the world-scene at some point, but deliberately. Redemption from its consequences is another result, and history is the record of the struggle between the two forces. This says science, although leading to apparently random results, such as the little child stepping under the bus, or a death from cancer, is not random at all. All the same, it may stem from 'chaos', if this is seen in conjunction with a belief in the indestructibility of the human personality. So, say the faithful, 'God not only creates, He cares', and science today is not disposed to reject this possibility, the two approaches may converge on the same point. The processes of the universe are incredibly diverse and complicated, so why should the possibility of life after death be ruled out ?

Such a belief is an essential corollary to any concept of justice in the Creator's character. This is not justice merely in the sense of retribution. The early Jews believed the Creator got so fed up with humanity that He destroyed them in the Flood, but made a fresh start with Noah's family and the paired livestock' Divine justice is part of the concept of Divine Love, which postulated creation, with mankind as it's highest sentient form, as an expression of that love.

So the great world religions have this at least in common with modern science; there is a benevolent Creator who offers post-earthly life in some other dimension in exchange for the human response of kindness and observance of a revealed moral law. Justice, therefore, moves into an eternal setting.

A religious scientist will find no essential disharmony between his or her faith and the scientific outlook. The great questions of life have satisfying, if unprovable answers. Some of the inadequacies of religion, such as early church doctrines of the cosmos, and strictly Bible-based theories of the origin of species, have been corrected by scientific investigation without detriment to the central core of belief.

Where science, or more precisely the scientist, inevitably falls short is in the application of an essentially simple moral code to the complex issues raised by scientific advance. Genetic manipulation is a case in point. The whole question of in-vitro fertilization is highly controversial.

All that is on the local scale. On the grand scale the Creator may, or may not allow the discovery of a unified theory of the universe which will provide answers to supplement, rather than displace the answers already provided by the higher religions.
You are a member of the school debating team which opposes the motion that 'Hand phones should be allowed in schools'.
 

Good morning and warm welcome to the respectable judges, the opposition team, teachers and fellow students. First of all, I would like to convey my gratitude for being given the opportunity to represent the team that opposes the motion hand phones should be allowed in schools.

There are many important reasons why hand phones or cellular phones should not be allowed at the school premises. Although recent years have witnessed an "explosion" of hand phones in Malaysia, it would be a grave mistake to allow school students to bring them to school. Firstly, possession of hand phones distracts students from their studies. In fact, the main reason why the government has made it illegal for drivers to use hand phones while on the road is that it increases risks of accidents. Likewise, hand phone users at schools would be busy either sending short message texts (SMS) or calling their friends when they should be focusing on their studies.

Secondly, hand phones are becoming cheaper to own. With the introduction of the prepaid system, many students even from poor backgrounds are able to own hand phones. Thus, I have personally witnessed how students compete to buy expensive handphones with the latest features. Video phones are the latest craze and there have been cases reported in the press whereby students have used the phones to film other students in compromising positions. They have in fact used the films to black mail the targeted student or sell them to VCD peddlers or even circulate them through the internet.

Thirdly, there are still many poor students who are unable to afford these phones which I would consider a luxury rather than a necessity. Hence, they face a tremendous amount of pressure to own hand phones, some even resorting to stealing or shoplifting. The undue pressure on them is unhealthy. Instead of feeling the pressure to perform better at school, students face competition to show off their wealth and possessions. This is leading to the spread of negative materialistic culture which our Eastern society abhors.

Fourthly, students have been apprehended using the SMS to cheat in the examinations. Many teachers have caught them red-handed using this latest hand phone technology to cheat and do well in the exams. Those who have not been caught continue to engage in this illicit method to further their academic achievements. Honest and ethical students feel undermined by this and many are prepared to throw in the towel and cheat as well. They fail to see the point of studying hard and competing fairly in the exams when others who do not put in any effort at all to earn high marks.

Supporters of hand phones say that they should be allowed to be used in schools for emergency purposes. Though I concede that parents and students should stay in touch via phones in cases of emergency, it does not mean that handphones are the solution. School authorities must make the effort to install and make available more public phones. Phone use should be restricted to the morning or lunch breaks

I am sure that most, if not all of you, would agree with my position on this issue. Hence, I would reiterate that hand phones should be banned from the school premises due to its negative effects. Thank you.
You are taking part in an oratorical contest. The topic you have chosen is Women are increasingly becoming victims of fashion.
 

Good afternoon and a warm welcome to the honorable judges, teachers, parents and dear friends. My topic today is titled Women are increasingly becoming victims of fashion. Before I proceed with my arguments, I would like to thank all those present for allocating time to be here as well as giving me the honor to state my position on this issue.

As many of us readily acknowledge, fashion plays an important role in our daily lives. Fashion relates to designs of clothes, hair styles as well as accessories such as jewelry, shoes and others that many see as shaping our personality. A person attending an interview stands a bigger chance of getting the job if he or she is dressed appropriately and fashionably compared to candidates who are dressed sloppily and in an old fashioned manner. Thus, it is important for us as humans to dress well and neatly and keep up with the latest fashion so as not to be branded as ultra conservative and traditional.

However, having said that, we can become a victim of fashion when we lose control of our personalities. Our fashion sense then dictates our personality which means we have become slaves to fashion! Women are more prone to becoming fashion slaves and as a woman I can verify that. Many of my female friends compared to male friends are fashion crazy and spend a lot of money buying trendy, designer-brand and fashionable clothing. They always appear to be competing with each other. The poorer ones who cannot afford to spend such huge amounts of cash on clothing and accessories feel left out and eventually alienate themselves.

I am sure the audience here would have noticed how pencil-slim or even anorexic the supermodels who model the latest fashion are. Most of them are actually very young or forced to maintain a skinny look to stay in the job. You would hardly see any curvy or models with a bit of flesh on them - they would immediately lose their jobs! Thus, the designs are getting tighter and women are forced to become thinner so that they are able to parade around with those skimpy clothes! In fact, I have trouble buying clothes from the malls because they are too tight for me and I am not even considered plump by most people. Hence, many young girls and women have fallen victim to fashion and developed medical condition associated with obsession with thinness such as anorexia and bulimia. There have been many cases, some fatal, of women consuming slim drugs that are not approved by the medical authorities. Even the late Princess Diana admitted to being a bulimic and famous seventies singer Karen Carpenter had died of anorexia nervous (though they are not considered fat).

It is important for women to feel confident with the way we look. Of course there are some of us who would want to shed a few pounds because we are overweight. The latter condition can lead to obesity and doctors say you can develop serious medical complications as a result of that. However, the only way we can ensure a fulfilling life is to eat healthily and lead an active life by exercising daily and donate our time and effort to doing good. We should channel our energy to becoming a better person and be less materialistic and obsessed with our looks. After all, life is short!
I hope my talk has given all of you some food for thought. Thank you once again for your kind presence.
The effects of War on Human Societies
 

Wars break out for various reasons. There are wars between countries or nations and within the nation. The latter is generally known as a civil war and can occur as a result of differences based on race, religion, socio-economic dissatisfaction among others. Whether wars are waged between countries (interstate) or inside the country between different sections of the communities, the effects are very damaging.

According to experts, the main reasons or factors that contribute to wars are human greed for wealth and intolerance towards the other. Many world leaders in fact believe that the main reason America invaded Iraq was for its oil wealth. Hundreds of thousands of innocent Iraqi civilians as well as American and Iraqi soldiers have been killed, injured or maimed. During the eight-year war between Iran and Iraq in the 1980s, there were more than 1 million casualty figures with millions injured. The attack on the American World Trade Centre on 11 September 2001 killed close to three thousand people and the subsequent reprisal on Afghanistan by American forces killed thousands of people in that country. World War 1 and World 11 combined have claimed millions of lives and in the African continent, tribal wars and regional wars continue to occur.

The civil war between the Hutus and Tutsis in Rwanda tad claimed more than 3 million lives and in the Democratic Republic of Congo, more than 3 million people have died due to conflict between warlords. Many countries especially in Africa are still embroiled in tragic wars.

The effects of war are both physical and psychological. Human societies are deeply affected by wars as residential areas, public infrastructure, hospitals and the very basis of human existence are destroyed. Malaysia too experienced war when it was once occupied by the Japanese and people faced many hardships and challenges to meet their basis needs. The Japanese only surrendered when the unconventional weapons or better known as nuclear weapons were used on Hiroshima and Nagasaki which took thousands of lives and maimed as well crippled thousands of people exposed to radiation. Thankfully, most warring nations still use conventional weapons like grenades, rockets and otters which do not inflict that kind of damage as nuclear weapons.

Wars bring untold miseries as well as political and economic instability. People's lives and daily existence come under threat. It would be difficult to find jobs or live our normal day-to-day existence. Populations are displaced and have to constantly move about for security. What is happening in Darfur, Sudan is a dire reflection of the tragedy wars bring. Some are scarred emotionally and physically for life.

Thus, humans must avoid wars at all cost. The only way we can protect our lives and ensure stability in our country is to practice tolerance and respect for each otter. Or else, we too would become extinct like the dinosaurs!

You are the secretary of the Ethics Society of your school. The editor of the school magazine has asked you to write an article for the magazine on the issue of declining ethics among students and ways to reverse that.
 

Declining ethics among students
School is a place where students learn the importance of ethics. Ethics relate to good behavior whereby one conducts one's behavior according to set rules and regulations which are based on moral values. The school also provides an environment for students to realize that unethical behavior would not go unpunished.

However, statistics indicate that worrying number of students are behaving unethically. There has been a steady increase in number of students playing truant. The statistics compiled by our Ethics Society show that almost every day, a student plays truant. Most of these students skip classes and have been reported as loitering in shopping complexes and some in the company of bad crowd. There are also students who fake illnesses so that they would be excused from attending classes. One of our teachers has even reported a student forging a medical certificate so that he can avoid class to attend a concert!
In addition, discipline teachers in secondary schools complain that the number of school bullies has gone up. Incidents of physically weaker and younger students being terrorized and extorted for money are rising. Many of the victims have been beaten and in fact, a killing of student by a group of bullies from a religious school has made newspaper headlines recently. It is tragic that a fourteen year old boy lost his life due to bullying and ragging. The future of the perpetrators remain uncertain and most probably they would be sent to a juvenile detention centre. Their career prospects and future upon being released would be very bleak indeed.

School authorities are also worried that vandalism is on the rise. School equipment in our very school has been vandalized. Some students even broke into our laboratory and stole some equipment. They have not been caught. Most school authorities also believe that vandalism and stealing is directly connected to students being hooked to drugs. This is another big problem among students. Declining ethics among students see many engaged in illegal and harmful activities.

Thus, urgent steps need to be taken to reverse this worrying trend. Schools should emphasize on civic education. Most students look at civics education as a subject rather than something that has to be applied in their daily lives. Teachers play an important role in encouraging students to behave ethically by demonstrating the importance of good and moral behavior.

Students should also be encouraged to get involved in community projects. Assignments and projects which involve the community must be introduced. These assignments should be graded. Hence, students would gradually learn the how to act in accordance to rules and regulation when interacting among members of society.

Punishments for wrongdoing can act as deterrent. However, it should be reserved only for those caught for severe wrongdoing. Instead, counseling would be a better tool. School counselors play a vital role in drumming into the perpetrators on their acts are so detrimental to society at large and also to their own future.

I am sure the school can halt the problem of declining ethics among students. The school authorities, especially teachers, have an important role to ensure only students of high moral caliber are produced.
Write an article for a local daily expressing your views on why you think that schools should allocate more time for reading English books
 

Instilling the culture of Reading in schools

As a form five student studying at a local school, I must admit that we have a long way to go to making Malaysia a reading nation. At schools, I have found that most students only focus on studying and preparing for important examinations. Their reading is limited to schools books and hence, they possess restricted knowledge.

Although the ministry of education had introduced the English literature component at the secondary level, the standard of English leaves much to be desired. I personally feel the prescribed novels and short stories are inadequate to increase the standard of English among students. Thus, I propose that schools allocate more time for reading English books, especially non-academic books such as novels and short stories which have literary values and merits. Books that can enhance one's general knowledge are plenty and should be suggested as part of a regular reading campaign.

The reading culture must be instilled at a young age. Admittedly some students speak and write well in English largely due to their parents encouragement who are either highly educated or encourage their children to read widely and extensively. A large number of students are not that lucky and those who come from poor background do not have the advantage of reading and improving their language skills. Thus, schools play a very important role in encouraging the reading habit among students. Merely emphasizing on reading is not enough. Schools must set the trend.

At least two free periods must be allocated for reading. Each classroom should be well stocked with books and students instructed to read at least three books in a week. An English language teacher or the existing English teacher should be appointed to discuss the books that students have read. The discussions can centre on the literary merits of the books as well as literary criticisms. Hence, in this way students are taught critical thinking skills and nurture the ability to think and discuss openly about a variety of issues. The school library should also be well stocked. Currently, school libraries mostly stock academic books. Very few acclaimed works of fictions by great writers such as VS Naipaul, Salman Rushdie, Timothy Mo and even classical writers such as Mark Twain, Charles Dickens, RL Stevenson, John Steinback, Vladimir Nabakov and local writers are stocked.

Students should also be given assignments related to the books they have been assigned to read, and not merely confined to the prescribed novels in the examinations. In this way, they would strengthen their writing skills and would not feel intimidated when they enter university and having to research books mainly written and available in English.

It is my believe that if the above suggestions are taken seriously and incorporated by the schools as part of the curriculum or even extra curriculum, the low esteem that overwhelming number of students feel regarding their English language ability will be a thing of the past. in fact, students themselves would eventually develop an interest in the language and would try their best to improve themselves without the prompting of school authorities and their teachers.

As part of your school assignment, your teacher has asked you to describe on eye-witness account of an accident.
 

It was a very cold morning as it had been raining very heavily the previous night. As my mother was feeling a little under the weather, my sister volunteered to drive me to school. I had overslept and as a result, was running a bit late for school. We got into the car hurriedly. The road was already congested with traffic. It appeared that everyone was late as well.

My sister was a careful driver and despite the fact I was already late, she refused to drive fast on the slippery road. I was lucky she was such a resolute and careful person because a few hundred meters away from the school, we witnessed a tragic accident. it all happened very quickly, as most accidents do. A car full of school children had made a left turning without signaling and as a result a school bus crashed into it. A few cars behind the school bus rammed into the bus as they could not brake in time and soon it became a pile up. The already congested road became jammed with vehicles that came to a crawl. I told my sister that I wanted to help the victims and she nodded silently. She brought the car to a halt not too far from the accident spot.

The scene that greeted us was something I would never forget. It left an indelible imprint in my mind to date. The impact of the accident had plunged three school children out of the car. The driver, a lady, lay lifeless on the steering wheel. I rushed to the children who were preschoolers. Two of them were seriously hurt and bleeding profusely from the head and hands. they were conscious although too weak to realize what had happened. One of them had her left hand severed and appeared unconscious. I think she was killed on the spot. In the meantime passers-by had called the ambulance and while waiting we tried as best as possible to help the victims.

The passengers in the school bus too were injured. I dashed into the bus and saw the driver laid slumped on the wheels. He had severe injuries on the head. While my sister helped him down from the bus, I told the injured school children to stay calm. Most of them appeared to suffer from minor cuts and bruises on their arms and bodies. it was really fortunate that nobody was badly hurt. By then a few adults had entered the bus and together we instructed the children to come out of the bus slowly. The children were crying and screaming for their parents and we had to hug them to keep them quiet.

Meanwhile, two ambulances had arrived. A traffic police car was there too. Two policemen were taking down statements from eye-witnesses. The injured and the dead were whisked away to the hospital. My sister and I later gave an account to the police of what had happened.

I was late for school. In fact, many drives were also late for their work. I informed my teacher of the accident and both felt that it could have been prevented if the drivers had been more careful. Innocent lives would not have been lost otherwise.
You recently participated in a 3-week study program at a Japanese school Write a report to your teacher describing vividly your experience there.
 

A report on a study program in Osaka, Japan

I was one of the 30 Indonesian participants who were selected to participate in a three-week study program in Osaka. Japan. The selection criteria were stringent. in fact I had to sit for an oral test. Luckily, I was coached by my teachers to prepare for it. The questions basically tested our general knowledge.

The program was organized and funded by Mombusho, the Japanese Ministry of education. the ministry sponsored our return airfare, food and provided us with a generous living allowance. we were grateful for their generosity as Japan is among the most expensive countries in the world.

This was my first ever trip to Japan. I have read about Japan in books and heard about their amazing culture from relatives who had visited the country. But nothing prepared me for the fabulous experience I had there.

Each of the participants stayed with a Japanese family throughout the duration of the program. The family I had stayed with was very kind, generous and humble. I was treated like a prince literally ! Their son was studying at the same school that I was attached to for three weeks ad we took the train daily to our school. The public transportation is very efficient though rather expensive. I did not experience any traffic jams or congestions on the road.

I was a splendid learning experience for me at the school. I picked up basic Japanese language skills which allowed me to converse with the pupils without much difficulty. The students there were ever ready to help me with studies especially with complicated mathematical problems. The average Japanese student is well rounded. He or she is also good at sports and able to think and write creatively and critically. Many of them also work pat time for pocket money. they are well mannered, well dressed, always polite and humble even though many of them hail from rich families. they treated me very well and of course whenever we go to the restaurants, they always treated me !

One very interesting and peculiar habit of them which I have acquired is bending the upper body to acknowledge the other. I think it is a good custom that shows respect for the other.

The food is another experience. Japanese like sea food and that explains why majority of them are slim and health. They also eat lots of vegetables and I actually picked up the habit of eating more vegetables from them. the tempura and other sea food dishes ere heavenly ! But their peculiar liking for raw fish and prawns is something I do not share ! However, I noticed there is an increasing number of western fast food restaurants which are gaining popularity among the younger Japanese. I guess it would not be long before they too battle obesity problems like us !

I had experienced lots of memorable events there. There was once I was lost in a shopping complex. My Japanese hosts were in a boutique nearby and I could not find them. A kind elderly old man actually helped me to find them. In fact, he even treated me lunch despite my refusal !

My experience in Japan had been invaluable. My only hope is more Indonesian students would be given the opportunity to experience the culture and school environment there.
Your teacher has asked you to write an assignment on one of the most influential persons in your life. Write an article describing the person's personality traits and his/her influence in your life.
 

An influential figure is basically a role model for a person to follow. Most people I know cite their parents or well known political leaders or successful business persons as influencing their perception of life. As for me, the most influential person in my life is a historical figure and he died many decades ago. The person is Mahatma Gandhi.

Born as Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi into a strict vegetarian Brahmin family, Mr Gandhi has always been my role model despite the vast generation gap between us. Mr Gandhi's passion and commitment to uplift the conditions of the poor in India as well as heal the animosity between the Muslims and Hindus in India are highly commendable. In fact, there are no words to describe his achievements, except he was a great man. Thus, the Indians gave him the title "Mahatma" which means Great.

Mr Gandhi was very passionate about the ethical treatment of animals. He abhorred the killing of animals for food. According to him, a person's morality can be measured by his or her treatment of animals. Thus, I became a vegetarian at a young age despite parental objection. I fervently believed in his compassion for animals and like him I believe we can be called truly moral only if we learn to respect another life.

As a firm believer of non-violence, Mr Gandhi was upset with the hardships and discriminations faced by the Indians under British colonial rule. The people were treated like slaves and the British were not committed to bringing the Muslims and Hindus together. In fact, Mr Gandhi sacrificed his life for that. A radical Hindu nationalist gunned him down because of his unhappiness towards Mr Gandhi's compassion for Muslims. like Mr Gandhi, I believe that as human beings we must have shared ideals and religion should not be a barrier for unity. Thus, I joined the Multicultural and Multi religious Society in my school in which I am the secretary. We regularly hold programs that would bring students from different race and religion to participate in the activities and learn from each other.

I would say Mr Gandhi has been very instrumental in my success now as the secretary of the Non-Violence Association. Though the post is only at the state level, I am proud of my achievements as I am still relatively young. The president of the society had approached me one day and offered me the post. He found out about my active involvement in societies at schools as well as the Society for Prevention of Cruelty to Animals.

Mr Gandhi was a small and rather fragile looking person. one can be deceived by his appearance as being weak and uninspiring. However, beneath that appearance, he is a firebrand. As a qualified and trained lawyer, Mr Gandhi even fought for the rights of the colored and African people in South Africa during the Apartheid period. He was jailed for his outspoken views that all of us are equals, no matter our color, race or religion.

I do not think that Mr Gandhi had any weaknesses. Of course as a human being, he would have his own flaws but his impressive personality traits far outnumber and supercede his weaknesses.

I would like to emulate Mr Gandhi and pursue a law degree and later specilize in human rights law. That would give me the necessary qualifications to join a non-governmental organization to fight for the rights of the down trodden and the discriminated.
 	
Rapid deforestation is endangering both the wildlife and our health. Write an article for a newspaper on this.
 

Every nation aims for a developed or advanced status. Only through development, the nation can progress and ensure the people enjoy a high quality and standard of living. Deforestation clears land of trees and bushes for development. Houses, industries, parks and public infrastructure are built on the cleared land. However, rapid deforestation as a result of greed for quick wealth is endangering both the wildlife and our health.

In Malaysia, the last decades since independence have witnessed massive deforestation and clearing of land for development mainly to build houses, condominiums, theme parks, industries among others. The purpose is to provide facilities and amenities to the citizens. However, this is causing major problems to wildlife as their habitat is destroyed. Our indigenous and unique flora and faun is also being threatened. Protected species such as tigers, elephants, rhinocerous and others are dying due to the destruction of their natural habitat. Many are forced to find new areas which may not be conducive to them. We often hear in the news how wild tigers and elephants encroach into human habitat and have killed or maimed humans while foraging for food.

We need to preserve more forests and reserve areas for these animals as sanctuaries. Aside from providing a haven for these creatures, preservation of forests is also good for us as trees provide fresh and health air. As human population increases, so does pollution. Forests and jungles provide natural protection against pollution by providing uncontaminated air and trapping pollutants.

The government and nongovernmental organization must collaborate to protect the green lung. the presence of factories and increase in number of vehicles on the roads have resulted in an unhealthy atmosphere. In addition Malaysia regularly suffers the haze problem due to forests fires from Kalimantan as well as open burning here. This combined with indiscriminate felling of trees have contributed to a host of medical problems among citizens of our country. Doctors confirm that there has been a dramatic increase in people suffering form lung and breathing complications. A major factor is the destruction of forests coupled with pollution.

Hence, it is vital that the government take immediate steps to prevent this situation from worsening. the state governments should designate more forest reserves and great care must be taken to relocate wild life if their habitat is being cleared for housing or industries. In fact, the government should reduce the number of licences being issued to developers and timber logging companies. They are the main culprits threatening the existence of wild life as well as our health. Fresh air provided by natural forests is important for human survival.
You had recently attended a seminar by health experts on why schools should ban vending machine selling soft drinks as well as the sale of junk food and food with low nutritional value at the canteen. Write a report for your class teacher.
 

Report on a seminar to ban sale of soft drinks and junk food

Our parents and teachers always stressed the importance of eating fresh and nutritional food because they are packed with vitamins and have low fat and sugar content. In fact, a healthy diet ensures that we do not contract diseases such as heart problems, diabetes, high blood pressure and others. Eating healthily also prolong sour lives.

The recent seminar I had attended also emphasized the same principles of consuming foods that are rich in nutritional value. The health experts who spoke at the seminar suggested that students and teachers should join forces to ban vending machines which sell soft drinks. they also urge us to make efforts to ensure canteens do not sell junk food.

Soft drinks are spiked with sugar and have no nutritional content. The main ingredients of these carbonated rinks are water, sugar and colorings which are harmful to us over the long term. excessive sugar consumption contribute to diabetes which is life threatening. those who consume too much sugar too are at risk of becoming obese which can lead to medical complications. Thus, schools should only allow the presence of vending machines that stock health drinks such as soy bean milk, yoghurt drink, herbal teas and others. The latter has low sugar content but rich in protein and carbohydrate.

Junk food or fast food such as burgers, fries, donuts, cakes, cookies, chocolates and savories are not good for our health. Junk food contains harmful additives and colorings. Thus, school canteens should not stock these food. Instead, canteen operators should be allowed only to sell rice, noodles, pasta, bread, fresh salad and other raw vegetables as well as fruits and juices.

The experts stress that only through healthy eating can we ensure students perform well academically. students in fact waste their parents' money buying food that provides zero health benefits. The link between eating nutritious food and performance in examinations has been well established. Junk food only makes a student lethargic as he or she is deprived of essential vitamins.

The health experts also suggested that the ministry of education subsidizes food costs at canteen so that students have access to quality food. It is a common knowledge that nutritionally rich food tend to be more expensive and thus canteen operators are reluctant to sell them. However, if the government provides subsidies to these operators as well as food coupon to make health food more affordable to students, it would be successful in creating a society which is health conscious.
Your friend's mother is suffering from severe health problems. You have wide knowledge on the efficacy of herbs and vitamins as opposed to conventional western medication. write a letter to your friend explaining the benefits of traditional herbs and vitamins for her mother's health.
 

Dear Shirley

Thank you for your letter which I received two days ago. I am glad you actually bothered to send me a "snail mail" instead of the more popular electronic mail !

I am very sorry to hear of your mother's condition. You mentioned that she is recovering from chemotherapy as a result of breast cancer. it must have been a very traumatic experience for her as well as all of you. I know it is difficult to care for an immediate family member especially one that has suffered tremendously. Chemotherapy can be very debilitating and I am sure she has lost a lot of hair and not to mention regular vomiting and weakness. I feel honored that you wrote me for advice.

The efficacy of herbs and vitamins has long been established both by traditional and modern doctors. The benefits of these are tremendous especially for those who are recovering from a serious disease. even before the advent of modern medicine and surgery, humans have been using traditional medicine such as herbs and roots to treat sickness and diseases as well as cuts and bruises. As you know my sister is a homoeopathist and hence, my extensive knowledge of this subject matter ! In fact, many patients and even pet owners consult my sister for advice on herbs and traditional therapies.

Western medication has side effects and is ineffective for certain people. If you had consulted me about your mother's condition before, I would have advised you not to proceed with chemotherapy. the latter's side effects are known and it can be very damaging for an elderly person like your mother. However, all is not lost.

My advice for you is to approach pharmacist and traditional healers to identify appropriate herbs and vitamins for your mother. explain to them your mother's health condition and status and do not forget to mention that she had just undergone chemotherapy for cancer. However, I would strongly recommend that you consult your mother's oncologist first before buying the herbs and medicine. the doctor would have prescribed some western medication for her and there can be adverse side effects if you mix traditional medicine with modern pills. Nevertheless, if you feel the doctor's medicine is ineffective, I suggest you stop the medication and try the herbs and vitamins instead.

Please also feel free to contact my sister for advice. Her patients speak very highly of her and many have told me how homeopathy has produced better results for them compared to western medicine.

I have to leave you here now. Do write or call me if you need further advice. send my warmest regard to your mother and the rest of the family. take good care of yourself.

Your caring friend.

Michael
Alcohol advertisement in the print media and cinemas should be banned. Write an article to the newspaper on this issue.
 

Alcohol is the natural substance found in alcoholic drinks such as beers, wine, hard liquors and liqueurs. It is formed through the fermentation process. Alcohol can also be artificially manufactured and added into drinks. There are many types of alcoholic drinks sold in the market as well as illegal ones known as samsu. The alcoholic drinks are both locally manufactured as well as imported.

Excessive alcohol consumption is unquestionably bad for one's health. Numerous researchers indicate that alcohol consumption on a regular basis destroys the liver and oesophagus. Thus alcohol advertisement in the print media and cinemas which encourages one to consume alcoholic drinks should be banned.

Alcohol consumption also impairs one's ability to drive or concentrate on certain activities as the alcohol which enters the blood stream rapidly distorts one's coordination. In fact, police statistics show that drunk driving is among the major contributors to fatal accidents. many innocent lives have been lost as a result of irresponsible drunkards on the road. Alcohol advertisement portrays that those who drink are macho and manly. It indirectly presents the view that only man who drink are "real man" and those who don't are weaklings.

Thus, the number of alcoholics in this country has seen an exponential increase. To be sure, Alcohol Anonymous (AA) has reported that more and more people are seeking help for alcohol abuse. This attests tot he popularity of alcoholic drinks despite the high government taxes on these "sin" items. According to AA, alcohol advertisements play an important role in influencing particularly the young to pick up the habit.

More and more working women too are getting hooked on drinking. Instead of relegating drinking alcohol to social occasions, we se an increasing number of both men and women drinking alcohol excessively and regularly. Alcoholic drinks give a false sense of confidence and boldness. it is quite common to see those who had too much to drink behaving inappropriately as the alcohol looses one's inhibitions. In fact, many young female teenagers report of how their males friends introduce them to alcoholic drinks and force them to get drunk. In fact, it is quite common to hear of date rape as a result of this.

Thus, the media should be more scrupulous in terms of its advertising content. Advertisement is an important source of revenue particularly advertisements related to alcohol which generates huge sums of profit for the media companies. However, the media must be more responsible in how it sources its revenues. It has an important role to play in ridding society of its vices. It can begin by banning alcohol advertisements and instead run advertisements that shows the public the dangerous consequences of alcohol consumption.

The money spent on consuming alcohol can be diverted into better buying products such as health supplements and health food. The media should instead encourage these products to be advertised by offering an attractive rate.

Hence, it is clear that advertisements directly influence alcohol consumption. Hence, the ban on alcohol advertisements should be effected immediately. Too many families and individuals have been destroyed by this vice.
Write a story with the title: An Encounter with a Celebrity
 

Like most of my friends and fellow students, I have always dreamt of an encounter with a celebrity. My favorite artist is Ning Baizura. She has a unique voice and a very likeable personality. Ning Baizura is also an actress but I personally believe she is a much better singer than the former. I have many pictures of my favorite artist and I never miss any of her concerts just to catch a glimpse of her.
Two weeks ago, my friends celebrated my 17th birthday at a five star hotel. These are my inner circle of close friends who also happen to be very rich and lavish. thus, they invited me to usher in my birthday in style with an expensive buffer lunch. I agreed as I rarely get the chance to dine at the Hilton Hotel. In fact, it was my first dining experience in that luxury hotel known to be the favorite spot of the rich and the famous.

While I was busy chatting with my friends surrounded by sumptuous food and delicacies, my friend, Sarah, tapped my hand urgently. Startled, I turned to her and she pointed at the direction of a table near a secluded corner. I almost dropped my fork. It was Ning Baizura! I was thrilled to note there were other famous celebrities at the table having drinks. My friends pestered me to approach her convincingly arguing that I would never ever get the chance of such a close encounter. I plucked up courage and approached the table very diffidently.

She flashed a smile. Gosh, she looked even more gorgeous in persona and elegantly dressed too! I smiled hesitantly. I suspect now she must have noted how nervous I was and quickly extended a handshake. I shook her smooth hands observing her beautifully manicured fingers. She had style ! I sat next to her upon her invitation and she quickly ordered a glass of orange juice for me. She then proceeded to ask some questions about myself. I told her briefly about my background and the reason I was there. she grinned widely and wished me "happy birthday" before placing her hands in the bag to withdraw an expensive looking pen. It was for me, birthday gift, for a unique person like me she said. I was overwhelmed with emotions.

I thanked her profusely and Sarah who had quietly approached the table asked permission to have a group photograph. Ning Baizura obliged gracefully. My other friends had surrounded us by then and everybody shook hands with the great singer. After snapping a few shots, we thanked her. She was truly humble and pleasant character. she had to rush for a work out at the gym, she said. Before she left with her friends, she handed a visitation card and told me that I can call her whenever I want. She also told me that if I am looking for a modeling career after my studies, I should get in touch with her.

I was floored and nodded happily. she waved us farewell before running towards a chauffer-driven Mercedes Benz. that must have been the happiest day of my life - catching my idol in person !
Write a story beginning with "My mother eyed me with suspicion."
 

My mother eyed me with suspicion. I dared not look at her. Knowing that I was late from school five days consecutively, I could not offer an acceptable explanation. I knew she did not believe that I had extra curricular activities every day and arrive home after 5pm. However, realizing she had little choice but to accept my explanation, she told me that dinner was in the refrigerator and to warm it up in the microwave oven. She had to rush for her night shift at the local clinic.
Ever since we lost our dad in an accident, my mother became the sole breadwinner. I was the eldest among the four siblings and it fell upon my shoulder to ensure that they become responsible adults. Aside from helping mother with the household chores, I regularly coach them in their studies. Thankfully, they are obedient children and never once did I have have to raise my voice or force them to complete their homework. But all of us missed dad tremendously. He was a model father and husband. Life was cruelly snatched away from him at a very young age of 40. It was a freak accident that killed him. He was walking towards his car parked at a construction site when a crane accidentally dropped a huge metal on him. He died instantly and mom had never recovered from the tragic incident.

However, she managed to pull through for our sake and secured a job at the clinic. It was very tough on someone like her who had never worked before in her life. But money was scarce and there were five mouths to feed. Dad did not leave much behind. He never suspected he would die so young. we stopped dining out and had our meals mostly at home. we basically lived from hand to mouth. That's when it dawned on me that I had to do my part for the family. I knew mother would not agree but I threw caution out of the window and managed to get a part-time job at a fast food joint. I worked three hours a day and managed to bring home money so that my siblings and I can go out for occasional movies or meals.

I am sure mother suspected something amiss. But she could not quite point the figure to the source of her suspicion. However, I was guilt-ridden and had to constantly reassure myself that contributing financially tot he family was the least I could to alleviate my mother's burden. One day, while I was busy serving the customers, I was startled to see mother standing opposite the counter waiting to place an order. She appeared perplexed and shocked at the same time. I took her orders and saw her returning to a table occupied by my siblings ! My supervisor who saw my worried expression and who knew about my family situation quickly volunteered to take over my duties. Slowly, I removed my apron and joined my family.

Mother was already crying and so were my siblings. She covered my hands with hers and told me that she was grateful for my help. I could not hold back my tears and hugged her. I realized that I should not have hidden such a big secret from her. But my beloved mother understood my situation and reassured me everything would be alright.
I have always been interested in various cultures especially those completely alien to us. Thus, imagine my delight when my father told me that he was taking us on a holiday to Bangkok and from there to visit a remote tribe that lives about 200 kilometers north of the capital city. My father explained the tribe lives a secluded life and the members are cut off from the rest of the world in terms of their unique (some would call it weird, he said) cultural practices.
The Thai people are very friendly and their greetings are very similar to the Indians. They bring their palms together in a prayer-like position and bend their bodies a little as a way of welcoming and acknowledging you. I was rather overwhelmed by that and took to doing that during my entire trip there. we spent only two days in Bangkok before heading towards the remote village which was going to be the most exciting time of our lives, dad promised. we hired a cab to take us there in a journey that lasted more than four hours. It was an exhausting trip but well worth the trouble.

The tribe called Sam Ponh are very friendly and bold despite the fact they are still very traditional and conservative in their outlook. The ladies wear coils around their neck as a symbol of beauty. I was rather startled when I saw them in the marketplace selling vegetables, fruits and handicrafts. Their necks are elongated and according to one of the women I spoke to, the coil is worn around their necks at a tender age of two or three. The coils, made of steel, are removed when the ladies retired to bed. When asked whether they feel comfortable without them, the older among them smiled and said she did feel kind of naked without the coils!

The younger generation women of this tribe do not appear to appreciate this fashion and many have refused to wear them. the tradition in terms of dress code appears to be dying out though still alive among the older ones. One of the elderly women told us that in matter of decades, there would not be a single woman wearing the coils. Just like many other ancient customs, the process and invasion of westernization is slowly eroding these values, my father said.

We bought lost of handicraft and also dined in one of the restaurants there which looked more like a stall! The food was delicious and I noticed people of this tribe eat a lot of raw food. they did look healthy and fit. The Sam Ponh people still use many items that we consider ancient and outmoded like the spinning wheel to make textile.

I truly appreciated their lifestyle and the fact they appear very contented with simplicity. They are not in the least materialistic, my dad said. However, it was my belief that sooner or later, the tribe would be forced to modernize and they would lose many of their age old customs.

We left the village the next morning and took a flight back to hometown from Bangkok. It had been a refreshing and splendid cultural experience for me.
When I visited my brother who lives in Australia, he took me to a must-visit place -- the National Art Gallery. Selva knew I was an amateur painter and hence, loved all types of paintings such as still-life abstract and others.
It was the beginning of spring when I arrived in Canberra. The temperature was about 17 degrees Celsius and though my brother did not require warm clothing, I was all wrapped up -- it was just too cold for me coming from a hot country like Indonesia. The National Art Gallery was located at the heart of the city surrounded by fountains and beautiful rose gardens.

There was no entrance charge and the architecture was both impressive and unique. There were many types of paintings on display based on the painters' country of origins, ethnicity and even theme of the painting. The paintings on display were categorised into Asian, Aboriginal (native Australian painters) and Caucasian (white painters from Australia, America, United Kingdom and other western countries). I estimated least a thousand paintings on display, a far cry from our own Art Gallery in Indonesia. the painters ranged from the most experienced to the amateur ones. There was even a section where paintings by Art students were on display and I must say, the quality and the sheer imagination of the painters despite being mere students, were breathtaking.

I was most impressed by the aboriginal paintings. There is a sad history that surrounds the natives of Australia. When the white settlers mostly from United Kingdom came to Australia in the 19th century, it was inhabited by natives. A violent confrontation ensued between these two ethnic groups. Most of the children of the aboriginals were forcibly taken away from their parents and brought up by white parents. the adults were taken to settlements where there was hardly any cultural inter-mingling. The children of the natives were known as the stolen generation named such because they were deprived of the opportunity to grow up with their family. Some of the paintings depicted this theme. They were heart wrenching which moved me to tears.

The paintings covered many themes such as landscapes during the colonial period, scenes of mountains, oceans and festivals among others. Since it was a public holiday, the gallery was crowded with students, parents and their children. It was amazing to see even small children appreciating such abstract paintings. The price of paintings almost made me faint. They ranged from AUS$1500 to a few million Australian dollars ! It was such a huge display of paintings that I was sure the government must have paid big sums of money to purchase these works of art. After three hours I was tired yet refreshed by the visit.

We later adjourned for tea and pies at a cafe located on the third floor of the building. I told my brother of my intention to contact some of the Australian artists for comments and display my own paintings which I had brought along. He told me that the Australian painters were very humble and helpful. I made up my mind to contact them the following day.
 	
How can we help ease traffic congestions in our country ?
 

Traffic congestions or traffic jams on our roads especially on the by ways and expressways are a common sight. Even in housing estates, one encounters traffic congestion or slowdown and thus, a trip to the local store located just minutes from the house can take up to half an hour due to this. according to the police, congestion also leads to other problems such as road rage and road bullies in addition to fatal accidents.
There are may ways we can help ease traffic congestions in our country. The main reason contributing to our roads being clogged up is the increasing number of vehicles, especially private ones, on the road. Most families nowadays have at least two cars. Thus, there has to be ongoing campaigns on the benefits of carpooling. Parents can make an effort to drive their children to work rather than helping him or her to purchase a car. Those with school going children should use school buses rather than sending them on their own. There is always congestion near schools as most parents prefer to send their children for reasons of safety or convenience. Thus, a regulation must be introduced that bans parents sending their children in private vehicles. They should be instead encouraged to use school buses.

The recent hike in petrol prices should be welcomed rather than criticized. Most people are able to afford cars not only because they are cheaper compared to say Thailand but also because petrol prices are relatively low. The increase in petrol prices by 30 cents a liter however, appears to have little impact in reducing traffic in major cities. Perhaps, the government should increase further the price of petrol to discourage people from spending idle time on the roads.

Another way to help our country overcome traffic problems is to increase the price of vehicles. The recent announcement of a drop in price of cars would only aggravate the traffic situation in our country. The government should take a cue from our neighbor country and introduce a steep levy on ownership of cars. It should at the same time make public transportation more efficient, effective and affordable. In our neighbor country, cars are very expensive because of the levy imposed on them but the traffic situation is much more manageable. The latter is mainly due to the fact there are less cars and most people use the MRT, buses and cabs which are highly efficient.

It can be a nightmare to be on the road during weekends. Most people either dine out or go shopping during the weekends thus, jamming up the roads. The government should impose a weekend levy or congestion levy on those who use private vehicles during weekends. it would discourage people from using their cars and instead use the public transport to arrive at their destinations. This would also indirectly reduce the accident rates.

Hence, with the above measures in place, I am sure our country would be able to overcome or at least reduce traffic congestions and accidents on the roads.
How can we lead a healthy lifestyle ?
 

A healthy lifestyle means maintaining a balanced and nutritious diet as well as engaging in sports or other fitness related activities. A healthy diet alone however is inadequate to ensure a healthy body as physical activity helps to keep one in shape and free of sickness and disease.
According to the World Health Organization, only one in ten people exercise regularly and a majority do not follow a healthy diet. The main culprit is our penchant for junk food as can be seen from the popularity of fast food chains and other western eateries. even local foods such as fried noodles, friend rice and snacks and savories are laden with fat and calories. Thus, consuming this type of food on a daily basis can contribute to weight gain. Overweight and obese people suffer from many health complications such as diabetes, high blood pressure, high cholesterol and even cancer.

Hence, the emphasis on healthy lifestyle should start at a young age. Parents must urge their children to eat more vegetables, fruits, juices, wholemeal and wholegrain foods. Many parents, due to time constraint, usually find the easy way out by cooking two-minute noodles or heading towards the nearest fast food joint for  quick meal. They do not realize however that sets the stage for an unhealthy lfestyle for their children who quickly become addicted to such foods. Thus, parents can counter this problem by cooking or preparing meals that do not take up time such as cheese sandwiches, soup, stir friend vegetables or buy pre-packed meals from supermarkets which can be warmed up in the microwave oven.

Dining out usually involves eating heavily and unhealthily. Most of us are prone to ordering deep fried food and oily dishes as opposed to steamed or baked food. Thus, though eating out is unavoidable, parents of children and adults as a hole should order fresh food and foods that are nutritious and not laden with oil, fat or sugar. Once a pattern of healthy eating is established, it would be easier to carry through such a lifestyle and for the children to follow suit.

School canteens must be urged to sell only highly nutritious food and drinks. Vending machines that sell soft drinks and drinks that are spiked with sugar should be banned. Hence, school going children would be exposed to healthy eating form young.

Daily exercise is vital. In fact, schools should implement Physical education on a daily basis rather than twice weekly. Only the minority are actively involved in sports. Most students are sedentary and prefer to concentrate on their studies as they consider indulging in physical activities a waste of time. By enforcing regular exercise daily, these students would be exposed to the importance and benefits of exercise.

Many parents and adults do not allocate time for physical activity. A large number of them work long hours and return home late thereby depriving themselves of the benefits of exercise. Parents must lead an exemplary life which can benefit their children by increasing awareness on the health benefits of exercising regularly. Bringing their children for walks in the morning or evening is a good start to achieve this goal. They should become members of clubs which have swimming pools and gym facilities. During the weekend, the family can strengthen their bond by adjourning to clubs for exercise and a healthy meal after that.

In short, leading a healthy lifestyle is a conscious decision. One can ignore that and lead a life that exposes one to many healthy hazards. it is important to recognize that a healthy living ensures a longer life span as well as a life free of disease and complications.
Pets have become a common sight in many households. In fact, one would be hard pressed to find a household without pets such as fish, dogs, cats, rabbits, hamsters and even turtles. In France dogs and cats are the most common pets.
There are many advantages and disadvantages of owning a pet. The latter plays an important role as companion to its owner. Dogs and cats in particular are considered very close to humans and have been domesticated for thousands of years. They no longer live in the wild but amidst human habitats. These animals can form very close bond with their human owners and in fact dogs are even known as men's best friend. Dog owners would tell you how their best friend would snuggle up close to them for comfort and follow them everywhere and know well their routines such as feeding time and the time when their owners return from work. Experts say that pets are very therapeutic and can even prolong the lives of human being, especially elderly folk or these widowed and living alone. Even young children and the recluse respond well to animals rather than their human companions.

Walking one's dog keeps one in shape. Since these four-legged creatures need lots of exercise to keep them fit and healthy, most do owners have to allocate time daily to walk or jog with them. This not only provides the opportunity for pet owners to establish close contact with their dogs, it also force them to exercise and keep themselves fit in the process.

Apart from being a source of comfort and constant companion, a dog in particular would lay down its life for its master or mistress. There are countless stories of how dogs have warned their owners of an impending disaster such as fire, accidents, break-ins and eventually saved their lives. Dogs are also kept to provide security for the home front against intruders and robbers. Service dogs and sniffer dogs are used to extensively in the west such as America, United Kingdom and Netherlands among others. Service dogs such as Labradors and Golden Retriever are trained to assist the blind and elderly to help them with basic tasks such as crossing the street, answering the phone, collecting the mail and others. Sniffer dogs are used by the Customs Unit and the police force has a Police Canine Unit that has dogs specially trained to detect drugs and other dangerous substances like bombs.

The disadvantages of having pets relate mostly to responsibility of caring for them. Pet owners must discharge their duties responsibly by feeding these animals under their care with proper food, exercising them and ensuring they get medical treatment as well as the required yearly vaccination. There are many irresponsible pet owners who do not feed their dogs and cats, in particular, on time as well as ensuring these animals are taken for walks, bathed regularly and taken to the vet when they require medical treatment. We see, read and hear many sad stories of dogs and cats being abandoned as soon as the owner feels the animals have outlived their usefulness. Many are abused and ill treated.

Pet owners must ensure the surroundings are kept clean by collecting and disposing of animal waste properly. There are many complaints we read in the newspapers of how neighbors are exposed to the stench from animal waste as well as dogs being chained up for long hours and hence, bark incessantly creating nuisance and discomfort in the neighborhood.

Hence, there are more advantages than disadvantages of owning a pet as the animal plays an important role in providing companionship and comfort for the owners.
How can schools play a role in producing well-rounded individuals ?
 

Schools play an important role in imparting knowledge and producing individuals with high moral and ethical values who contribute to our country's development.
However, there have been accusations that Asian schools are not churning out well-rounded individuals. The main culprit they say is the education system which is heavily exam oriented and although students excel academically, they are not good in sports or extra curricular activities. even straight As students are considered only paper smart lacking common knowledge or even skills-based knowledge. Thus, schools play a vital role in ensuring its products are not only academically well qualified but also confident, intelligent and have multiple skills.

The most important step schools should take with the cooperation of the Education Ministry is to place less emphasis on scholarly achievements and examination grads. Currently, due to heavy stress on examination results, many, if not all, student study to excel academically rather than have a balanced approach to studies. they study had and attend tuition classes so that they are able to get straight As in all the subjects. This leaves them little time to indulge in extra-curricular activities or sports. Thus, a markedly different way of grading and assessing students should be adopted like in the West. In order to produce well rounded individuals, grades should be given for assignments, extra curricular activities as well as involvement in sports. Ideally, only 50% of marks should be allocated for examination and the rest for participation in non-academic activities. This would produce students with a innovative, intelligent and creative personality as progression in school would not be based solely on examinations.

In addition, a system should be introduced to make it compulsory for students to volunteer with community-based organizations such as orphanages, centers for the disabled and other social non-governmental organizations. Assignments related to involvement in these organizations can form part of the examination system. Thus, students will be compelled to participate in various kinds of extra curricular and sports activities, under the guidance of their teachers of course. That would ultimately enable them to acquire people's skills such as communication and writing skills through the ability to interact with others and engage in stimulating discussions.

Study environment can be made less mundane and monotonous by introducing outdoor learning experience. More emphasis on outdoor learning activities rather than those confined to classroom activities should be made part of the regular teaching method. Students thus, will acquire interest in their studies and would be able to expand their general knowledge Schools would stop churning out "book worms" and diffident students. Rather, this novel approach would produce students who are smart, intelligent, bold and inquisitive.

In all, the task of producing well rounded students and hence, individuals lay heavily on the shoulders of the education ministry and teachers. It is the step in the right direction towards creating a generation that is inquisitive and smart. these individuals can then contribute tremendously to our nation's development and standing in the world.
If you are the school discipline teacher, how would you tackle the problem of gangsterism among students ?
 

Indiscipline among students is one of the major problems faced by schools today. Gangsterism in particular has become a menace due to its violent nature. Gangsterism involves bullying, extortion and even physical assault. The victims are mainly fellow students and there have been a few cases in the Philippines where the act of bullying and assault had been fatal.
If I am the discipline teacher, I would first undertake to study the extent of the problem in my school as well as the reasons why students would get involved in gangsterism. I would then haul the bullies and suspected gangsters in the school to determine further the reasons behind their individual behavior.

Statistics and studies on gangsterism indicate most student gangsters hail from poor backgrounds or broken families whereby they lack attention and love from the family members propelling them to behave in such a manner. Poor students become gangsters as a means to gain extra cash by extorting money from other students. Those who are a product of broken families normally indulge in these kind activities to seek attention and as a outlet for their frustration and unhappiness.

Thus, by engaging in a discussion with these gangster students from my school, I would be able to find out which category they belong to. I would then proceed to advise them on the dangers of their behavior which could land them in jail or in correctional institute for juvenile delinquents. If this method does not work, I would then engage the assistance of inspectors from the local police station to give regular talks at our school on why gangsterism is a crime and the penalties faced by the perpetrators.

A school-wide campaign would follow suit on how students and teachers can tackle the problems of gangsterism. the campaign would involve talks by former gangsters and reformed criminals who resorted to bullying and violence to achieve their goals and how that in turn has affected their lives and their families. Students would then be required to take a pledge not to resort to such behavior even if they face severe pressures from other students or as an easy way to make money from others.

Instead of caning or punishing gangsters, I would counsel them and use the soft-handed approach. These facing financial troubles who resort to extortion as a solution would be given assistance pending their promise not to repeat such behavior. These who engage in gangsterism to seek attention would be sent for professional counseling. Students facing constant pressure to become part of gangs, would be exposed tot he dangers of such behavior and encouraged to report, without fearing for their lives, to the school authorities. I would collaborate with the other teachers to expose students to fun-filled activities and outdoor learning experience to make school a more exciting place. This would prevent bored students from contemplating joining a gangster group to seek excitement and acceptance.

Thus, I hope with all these measures in place, the problem of gangsterism would be dealt with effectively and efficiently.
The effects of pollution and how students can help to reduce pollution ?
 

Pollution means contamination and there are many different types of pollution such as environmental pollution and noise pollution. Environmental pollution is the biggest challenge facing humanity as pollution of the air and sea directly affects our lives. The human existence can come under threat if pollution level increases to hazardous level. In fact, some country frequently faces the haze-related pollution yearly due to wild fires in their neighboring country aggravated by the practice of open burning in our country. Factories too are culprits as they emit pollutants and hazardous waste substances either into the air or into the sea. The increasing number of vehicles which emit the dangerous carbon monoxide and green house gases add to the danger we face from pollution.
The earth's atmosphere is constantly being exposed to hazardous materials due to rapid development and human activity to advance their lives. The industrial west like America and Europe is the biggest culprit as they are the world's biggest polluters.

Students can play a ole in helping to reduce pollution and create a healthy atmosphere for us to engage in activities without fear for our health. They can contribute to reducing the emission of harmful gas into the air by either walking or cycling to school. Most students go to school either by car or school bus and the carbon monoxide released by these vehicles is very harmful when breathed in large quantities. it can even cause deaths. Those who stay at a distance from their school should either car pool or use the services of a school bus. This can drastically cut down emissions from vehicles especially during peak hours.

Open burning is another major source of air pollution. Burning rubbish openly releases many harmful chemicals and gases and thus, should be avoided altogether. many adults themselves are unaware of this. It is the duty of students to spread this awareness and even set an example by tying up garbage or garden refuse in garbage bags to be collected by council workers.

Smoking too pollutes the atmosphere. The number of smokers in the country has not declined despite nation wide campaigns against smoking. Smoking among students has become a trend and thus, it is vital that these students top smoking to ensure an environment free from cigarette smoke. The later causes cancer and heart diseases among others.

In addition, students can play their role as responsible citizen by reporting to authorities if they come across vehicles spewing out smoke on the roads or factories emitting smoke and hazardous chemicals into the atmosphere. Immediate action would stem this problem as there are many factories use the river as an outlet to channel their dangerous waste materials.

Hence, each student has a role to play in reducing pollution. The latter is already contributing to global warming which threatens our existence in the not-too-distant future. The understanding of the dangers of pollution has to start at a young age and students especially are well poised to live a life that is pollution free as well as spread awareness on the importance of a safe future.
What are the benefits of volunteering ?
 

volunteering means to carry out a duty or a job without expecting repayment or remuneration. The concept is very popular in the advanced or rich countries such as United States, Australia, United Kingdom and other western nation. In Laos, the concept is rather alien as may look at volunteering as rendering help without expecting payment in return as a waste of time and effort. However, there are many benefits one can gain through volunteering.
When one volunteers to help out someone such as a friend, teacher or parent, one is immediately seen as selfless and helpful. When you help a teacher to clean he classroom or get involved in cleanliness campaign at the school level or other community projects, your standing would be elevated. Teachers and adults would look at a young person who volunteers his or her time for a certain activity as mature, responsible and deserving of respect.

In addition, volunteering with an organization such as orphanages, community centers and other non-profit organizations such as the Society for Prevention of Cruelty towards Animal and other welfare organizations allows you to interact with society at large. In addition to helping these organizations carry out their duties, you not only gain experience but can learn a variety of skills. This is especially beneficial for students. Even though one is not being paid, through volunteering time, effort and skills one would learn more than what money can buy. You can learn to be bold, assertive, independent as well express your opinions and gain communication and interpersonal skills. In Laos, this is lacking. Thus, the responsibility falls on the teachers to encourage students to volunteer their times not only for school activities but to spend their leisure in helping out community-based organizations.

Volunteering also allows one to become more mature at a relatively younger age. When you are exposed to volunteering at a young age be it at the home front, school or their organizations, you would learn the importance of responsibility in carrying out your duties to the best of your ability. Embarking on volunteer activities would enable one to learn survival skills such as responsibility, ability to express ideas as well as the importance of hard work and diligence.

Volunteering also exposes one to many interesting ideas and issues. For example, if you volunteer your time regularly at a charity organization, you would learn how the organization works and the importance of team work, and other essential ideas related to the day-to-day operations. of the organizations. You will not only enhance your general knowledge, but also learn how to deal with problems, challenges as well dealing with different types of personalities.

Thus, there are many benefits to be gained by volunteering. Students in particular should be allowed to participate in volunteer activities to enhance their knowledge as well learn useful interpersonal and organizational skills.
Do you agree the widespread influence of western culture among students corrupt them morally ?
 

It is very hard for Easterners to resist Westernization. The influence of western ideas and culture is widespread namely in dressing, mannerisms, food, books, entertainment and even education. However, western culture can also corrupt a person morally especially young people.
There are many aspects of the western culture that are deemed not suitable for Asians namely its sense of fashion, moral values regarding pre-marital sex, pornography and wild entertainment. The young mind is easily influenced and corrupted. When one enters shopping complexes, restaurants and other public places, the first thing that catches one's attention is the way the young dress. Many follow the fashion nuances of the west with little regard to Asian values and perspectives related to modesty. Many young teenagers can be seen clad in low cut tops, low waist jeans and in short very revealing outfits. They mimic western style of clothing as well free intermingling of sexes.

This situation has led to many undesirable consequences. Chief among them is the practice of free sex among students. The Asian values of saving oneself for marriage or until the right person comes along is discarded and considered archaic. Since many teenagers lack awareness on safe sex, they expose themselves to unwanted pregnancies, sexually transmitted diseases such as AIDS, gonorrhoea, syphilis and other life-threatening disease. WE read newspaper reports almost on a daily basis on how unborn babies are being dumped in toilets, houses of worship, hospitals and other public places. There are yet many students who upon finding themselves pregnant resort to abortion. The later can be fatal if not done by professional gynaecologists. Many charity organizations report of teenagers coming for advice when they find themselves jilted by their boyfriends. There are also many reports on teenagers contracting STDs and other dangerous diseases.

Another strong influence of westernization is in the arena of entertainment. Teenagers find it exciting and fulfilling when they visit video arcades, discotheques, nightclubs and other places of entertainment. Thus, they expose themselves tot he morally deficient elements at this kind of places. Apart from picking up bad habits such as smoking, drinking alcohol and other behaviors unsuitable for people of such a young age, these teens also expose themselves to abuse and exploitation. Many young people have admitted to being sexually abused this way by friends or strangers who spike their drinks with drugs only to awake next morning in the bed of strangers.

Thus, though not all elements of westernization corrupt young people morally, the latter seem more susceptible and even naive with regards to western influence in the arena of entertainment, fashion and behavior. Many teenagers demand unfettered freedom without realizing the consequences o their behavior which brings harm to them. In their desire to be westernized, they accept those elements which provides pleasure but places them at great risks.
"Money is the key to happiness". Do you agree ? Why ?
 

Money is of course very important for human beings to lead a decent and satisfying life. unlike animals and plants, money defines the existence of human society as we cannot live without it. Money is an important exchange for food, shelter and clothing.
Many people believe that money si the root of all evil. But contrary to that, I believe and agree that money is the key to human happiness. it has become indispensable in our lives when humans began using money for exchange of goods and services instead of he barter trade which was popular hundreds of years ago. Humans work to earn an income that would enable them to bring food to the table, clothe themselves as well as indulge in pleasures that can be obtained only through money.

When we are able to afford goods and services, it inevitably grants us a lot of happiness, satisfaction and stability in our lives. In many poor countries such as Africa, Cambodia, Laos, Vietnam and others, millions live in misery due to extreme poverty. They are deprived of happiness, dignity and a sense of direction n their lives as they live from hand to mouth and their future is at best uncertain. Thus, it would be foolish to think that money causes distress, and is the root cause of immorality and evil behavior. On the contrary, most of us earn an income through legal means which allows us to maintain a good standard of living. it enable us to travel for holidays and have access to good food, medical facilities, and a lifestyle that grants us much happiness and satiety. Many parents admit that they slog at work so that thy could provided comfort and stability to their offspring. Money especially comes in handy when a family member is stricken with a disease and cash is needed for treatment.

Unhappiness results when we are denied the above. Many families struggle to make ends meet and the lack of money almost inevitably sows seeds of unhappiness. They are exposed to continuous bickering, quarrels and ultimately, misery.

There are of course those, due to greed for more material wealth, resort to illegal means to become rich quickly. They commit robberies, murders and cheat to get ahead in lives. However, this does not grant them the happiness or the peace of mind. In the case of robbers and murders, the constant threat by the law enforcement authorities closing in on them, creates jitters and a life full of uncertainties and fear.

Hence, money would always be looked at as the most or at least one of the most important keys to happiness. it has become a part of what defines us as human beings as it allows us to live a life of dignity, happiness and contentment.
"Health is wealth". To what extent would you agree ?
 

The saying "health is wealth" is very apt as good health comes from a good physique that enables one to enjoy the pleasures and manage challenges of life. health here comprises the mental and the physical.
Thus I agree that good health is actually wealth as it allows one lead an existence without being hampered by disabling circumstances such as disability (both mental and physical), medical conditions such as diabetes, cancer and other potentially fatal diseases. A disabled person faces a lot of challenges n life including having to depend on another for basic needs and perform simple tasks. The situation is even more daunting if you are paralyzed and mentally unfit to lead a normal existence. One would not be able to earn an income becoming a burden to family and friends (though the latter are usually encouraging and supportive).

Many cancer patients and others who suffer from debilitating sickness spend huge amounts of money for treatment. In addition to that, they have to undergo very painful medical procedures. A cancer patient for example typically has to undergo chemotherapy and radiotherapy which have undesirable side effects such as vomiting, hair loss, weaknesses and other unpleasant symptoms. Despite all that, there is no guarantee that one would survive such sickness.

Thus, our good physical and mental well being provides us the opportunity to enjoy life without any hindrances. The "wealth" one derives from good health is actually a life free from circumstances that afflicts us in some way and hence, affects our happiness and comfort.

There are many people in this world who are extremely wealthy but due to poor health, they are unable to enjoy their material coins. Their daily performance is hampered by physical and mental incapacitation and hence, they can be actually considered "poor". A materially poor man or woman but rich in terms of health actually can be termed as "wealthy' as he or she is not hampered by sickness. the later does not have to fork out money for treatment and can enjoy a peaceful and blissful life.

In short, good health si wealth as no amount of money can cure one of terrible sickness. Good health ensures a fulfilling and enriching life.
Vitamins
 

Vitamins are also known as supplements. Nowadays, one can get many types of vitamins as well as herbs in capsules or tablets from the pharmacies, clinics or even the supermarket. There are basically two types of vitamins : natural and synthetic. The latter is manufactured in laboratories whereas the former is extracted from natural sources. Supplements have become very popular since the last few decades both in the East and the West.
Although most physicians and specialists recommend the intake of vitamins only if the person is suffering from certain deficiency in his or her diet, it has become almost a trend for most people to consume vitamins on a regular basis. There is widespread belief that vitamins promote good health, aids in weight loss and improve complexion among others. There are others who believe that certain vitamins help prevent cancer and other dangerous diseases.

The multibillionaire dollar vitamin industry is a rapidly expanding one as increasing number of people including children and teenagers consume vitamins to enhance their health and general well being. there is some truth tot he belief that vitamins form an essential part of a person's diet. This mainly springs from the fact that most of our food (except foods such as lettuce, fruits and juices) are cooked using heat and hence loses its properties. Not may of us eat salads and raw vegetables such as carrots, cauliflowers, broccoli and leafy vegetables. Hence, overcooking or even steaming these vegetables which employs extreme heat results in us eating food which have lost its nutritional content.

In addition, most of us also tend to eat more refined than complex carbohydrates. The former is more popular such as polished rice, pasta, white bread and others which have almost no nutritional benefits. polishing is a process that strips carbohydram of fiber and other essential vitamins. Hence, vitamins provide these important elements that are missing in our diet. Unlike in the west, Asians generally do not consume much fresh vegetable or fruit juices and most of our drinks here are spiked with sugar. Many of us also tend to drink copious amounts of soft drinks which can cause diabetes and other health complications. young people too tend to avoid or reduce vegetables and fruits in their diet, preferring junk food or fast food.

Hence, vitamins play a role in ensuring we maintain a balanced diet. supplements provide the essential vitamins lacking in our meals due to our unhealthy eating habits.
Disability
 

Disability refers to the condition of being physically or mentally disabled or challenged. The physically disabled are those physically handicapped such as the crippled, the blind, the mute as well those having some form of physical deformities. Those mentally disabled suffer from mental retardation such as cerebral palsy and down syndrome among others.
There are thousands of disabled people in Asia and many face discrimination on a regular basis which takes many forms. Very few employers hire disabled people as the latter is considered more a liability than an asset in the organization. However, these fears are completely unfounded. Many a blind and hearing impaired persons have contributed tremendously to organizations they are attached to. In fact, there are many cases of how disabled personalities have done themselves proud by being their own bosses. Their success stories include those how run their own business such as shops, restaurants, handicraft centers in addition to those who have become teachers and professionals through sheer hard work and determination. Many have even become successful sports persons participating in Paralympics Games and winning medals. It is a folly to think that only physically able people can make one's country and nation proud.

However, those who are successful are only a handful. Since many encounter discrimination, they tend to alienate themselves from society as they feel unwanted and rejected, Our mind set has to change to accept these people and integrate them into our society.

The government should introduce steps to ensure all the disabled people have access to education and employment. In fact, special legislations and laws ought to be introduced that makes it compulsory for employers to allocate a certain number of jobs for the disabled. The Welfare department too should provide financial assistance and medical access to disabled persons who come from poor backgrounds.

Ongoing campaigns to educated society on the need to accept and live in harmony with the disabled, rather than treat them as burdens or pariahs, need to be launched. In fact, the awareness should start from a young age. Instead of setting up special schools for the disabled, the government should institute regulations that abolish such schools and the disabled children sent to regular schools. this would enable the regular students to understand and accept their peers despite the latter being obviously disadvantaged. the disabled children too would not suffer from low esteem or even feel embarrassed mixing with regular children.

In addition, most of our public infrastructure, public transport and government buildings are not disabled-friendly. There has to be a concerted effort to ensure the disabled have access to these places and not feel hampered in anyway.

Thus, it is high time that we accept the disabled as an important component of our society. Despite their handicap, they play an important role in our lives and at the same time the need our respect, acceptance and understanding.
Religion plays an important role in the lives of majority of human beings. Humans compared to animals or plants are endowed with a sense of spirituality and yearning for a close contact with our creator. Irrespective of our religious background and faith, religion is considered an essential part of our lies as a source of inspiration, morality, and comfort and provides solace during times of trouble or grief.
However, although religion provides a moral code on how to live a peaceful existence and helps one to deal with problems, it can be misused. In fact most of the troubles in the world stem from religious fanatism or extremism. Religious fanatics take their religious ideology to extremes and in their desire to propagate the teachings of their faith and ensure all the religious principles are adhered to, they resort to violent methods. The bombing of the World Trade Center in New York in 2001 is a perfect example as well as the killings of Muslims in Gujarat, India in 2002 ad the Bali bombing in that same year. Thousands of innocent lives were lost in these tragedies.

Despite religion teaching tolerance, acceptance, good deeds and moral values, these fanatics hijack their own religion for personal ends. Religious fundamentalists are to a certain extent irrational as they defy universal values of respect, freedom of belief and other fundamental human rights. it is almost an impossible task to encourage them to think about the rights of others -- all they care about is to achieve their goals through killings and destruction. There is little respect for other faiths and human values as they consider the former as infidels who deserve "God's" punishment.

Religion too can be abused. many so-called religious leaders have exploited religion to their own ends and the sad irony is that many of us have fallen victims to such irrationality. In multicultural and multi-religious nation, there is a vital need for them to understand, accept and practice tolerance vis a vis other faiths. Thus, it is very important that we inculcate respect for other faiths and do not stray into fundamentalism which would ultimately destroy the harmony in the country.

Children should be exposed to the multi faiths in the country. They should be encouraged to learn about other religions, their principles and commandments. This would to an extent allow the younger generation to appreciate various beliefs that exist in the country. the government too must play its part. Any form of religious extremism should be resisted and those caught inciting religious hatred put behind bars.


Friends are very important in our lives. Friendships are easily formed when we are young and do not demand too much out of it. According to studies and research, humans tend to form highest number of friendships at kindergarten and primary level. However, one tends to have less friends as one grows older and wiser. This is because we realize there are good friends and bad ones.

The saying that a friend in need is a friend indeed is very apt in this scenario because good friends are those who are reliable and trustworthy. at a younger age, our demands are not too high regarding friendships as we rely mostly on our parents, siblings and relatives for important things. The friends we formed at this age are merely considered playmates rather than companions and confidants. Thus, our expectations of them are not high.

More serious friendships are formed when one enters puberty and achieves certain level of maturity. the latter allows one to forge fellowship with those who share the same interests, passion as well as similar moral and religious values. Thus, it is not surprising to observe that in some Asian country, mature students at the upper secondary level have friends of the same ethnic and religious backgrounds. At the university level, it is even more apparent. Even the Ministry of education has voiced concern over this phenomenon where polarization is prominent. The Indians, Chinese and Malays hardly mix with each other and are seen usually in the company of their own kind.

One of the main reasons for polarization among university students is that as they reach a certain level of maturity, common binding factors such as religion, customs and traditions play important role in selection of friends or mates. In addition, since majority of these students come from rural backgrounds where there is not much cultural interchange, they feel rather awkward to forge friendships with students of other races. However, this does not mean the students are racist or suffer from superiority complex. Thus, the university should introduce more programs that allow cultural and religious mixing and understanding of the other.

Nevertheless, in the working world, a different scenario prevails. One finds Indians, Chinese and other races forging stable and long lasting friendships. This is most probably due o the fact that to be productive in one's work, one has to believe in team work. The latter actually enhances the bond between the workers and eventually long lasting friendships are formed. In fact, this situation has even led to many inter racial marriages between the three major races. the products of the intermarriages are very unique as they have friends and relatives from both ethnic backgrounds.
Media refers to mass media such as broadcast media, print media and the web media. Television and radio are considered broadcast media while newspapers, magazines and journals are known as print media and internet news, the web media. The media is an important source of information through its news segments, entertainment and allows for exchange of ideas, suggestions and comments.

Consumers nowadays have a variety of media outlets compared to a few decades ago. The advent of the Internet and services provided through it, has enabled many of us to gain access to instant and a variety of news and entertainment. In fact, the presence of Internet also has led to creativity among the young consumers with the latter setting up personal websites, blogs and others. It has inadvertently led many students to take advantage of the prevalence of information by copying and plagiarizing writings from the internet news. While the internet has been hailed as the most important advances humankind has made in the 20th century, it is nevertheless open to abuse and exploitation that presents danger to humans.

However, although most of us get our news through the media as many of us have little time to read books or journals, the news presented to us can be biased and one sided. During the invasion of Iraq in 2003 by the United States and its allies, casualty figures of their military personnel were highlighted and hardly any news on the figures for Iraqi civilians and its military personnel. News reported on websites appears more reliable and transparent though one has to be careful about the accuracy of the facts reported. the media news too can misrepresent information to serve the objectives of certain people or authorities in power.

In many Asian nations, there are limits to press freedom. Although the media is allowed to present news and its views as well as perspectives, it is barred from providing news that can potentially create unrest and violence. The government has instituted the Official Secrets Act and Internal security act that allows it to detain anybody including those working in the media for inciting racial or religious violence. However, there is still a degree of freedom in these countries' press compared to other more conservative countries. we have access to news from all around the world and readers are invited to send their views and contributions to be published in the media.

The media is not only an important source of news and opinions but also entertainment. Most young people usually turn on the television for movies, MTV and other entertainment programs. the adults however, prefer news and more educational programs.

Thus, the media plays an important role in our lives as we cannot envisage a life without the daily reporting of national, regional and international news. It would be like returning to the Stone Ages. However, consumers must ensure the news reported in the media is accurate and not one-sided by looking at its contents critically and voicing their views on certain issues.
"Examinations" - This is a word that causes sleepless nights, a word can change a cheerful person into a nervous wreck. So, what are examinations, and how can they be any good?

An examination can be defined as a detailed inspection or analysis of an object or person. For example, an engineer will examine a structure, like a bridge, to see if it is safe. A doctor may conduct a medical examination to gauge whether a patient is healthy. In the school context, it is the students who take the examinations. These are usually a series of comprehensive tests held at the end of each term, year or, in the case of public examinations, after a few years.

One of the main purposes of school examinations is to improve the quality of education. From the results of the examinations, the teachers and planners of the curriculum will be able to gauge the extent to which the students have acquired the knowledge and skills of the course material. This would, first of all, provide an evaluation of their teaching methods, so they can improve them, if necessary.

Examinations are also used as a yardstick for measuring the capability of the candidate, for further education or employment. For example, examination results are the main criteria when selecting students for entrance into universities. It is assumed that the examination results would indicate whether or not the student will be able to handle the course. In the case of employment, it is felt that the examination results will indicate whether or not the job seeker has the skills or intelligence to handle the job.

However, does the school examination system provide an accurate yardstick of the candidate's ability? Albert Einstein, at the age of 16, took the entrance exam to the Swiss Federal Institute of Technology, but failed and so was rejected by this elite school. Yet, Einstein went on to develop the theory of relativity and quantum theory, winning the Nobel Prize in Physics at the age of 42. Other examples of famous achievers who failed in school examinations would include Winston Churchill, Thomas Edison and Bill Gates.

One may also question whether the present examination system results in better teaching in schools. In fact, some teachers are so pressured to produce good examination results that they are forced to practise poor teaching methods. They may race through the syllabus, ignoring the fact that the weaker students have not grasped some of the concepts. Some other teachers may concentrate on popular examination topics, ignoring the topics which are rarely tested in the examinations.

Pressure to succeed in examinations may also be detrimental to the students. They may be so filled with anxiety and stress that they do not enjoy their school years. They may be studying only to get good examination results, rather than a rounded education. Some of the weaker students, who cannot seem to achieve good examination results, may lose interest in their studies. In extreme cases, students may be so frustrated or disappointed in their results that they may consider ending their lives.

In conclusion, I realise that examinations are necessary and useful in many areas of our lives. However, within the school system, they should be given less emphasis or conducted in a different way. Furthermore, educationists, employers and students themselves should be reminded that examination results may not provide the best assessment of an individual's talents and capabilities.
A popular saying goes, "Marriage involves three rings: the engagement ring, the wedding ring, and the suffering."

If it is commonly felt that marriage is so difficult, why do most people wish to get married? Probably, the instinct to find a mate is inherent in human beings; and I am no exception. Somehow, I believe that there is someone out there who was made specially for me, and, once I find him, we will fall in love, and get married; and only then will I feel complete. So, how will I recognise my Mr Right? What qualities should I be looking for?

First of all, I am not looking for "Mr Tall, Dark and Handsome". Character is more important than looks. I cannot deny that I am attracted to good-looking boys, but marrying solely for physical attraction will probably lead to short term pleasure but life-long regret. I have also noticed that handsome boys are often vain and arrogant, which I find most unattractive. One of the main things that I admire in a man is humility. Such a man will not boast about his wealth, intelligence or achievements, but, instead appreciate other people's abilities and achievements. He will also readily admit when he has made a mistake. Such a man would be a joy to live with.

Good communication is the key to any solid relationship, most of all, marriage. I would want my future husband to share his thoughts with me. I want to hear his dreams and to share in his struggles. On the other hand, I will also need someone who will be ready to listen to me, and interested to know what is happening in my life. There should be no secrets between us.

Life is full of challenges. We can expect to face failure as well as success; heartache as well as joy; boredom as well as excitement. So, the perfect husband should have a positive attitude and a good sense of humour. He should be witty and say things which make me laugh. The perfect husband would also be one who can see the silver lining behind every cloud, rather than focus on the flaws in every situation. With such a man, I will be encouraged to look at life in a happier and more positive way.

Above all other qualities, the perfect husband will be faithful. He must be someone who really believes in that marriage is made to last "till death do us part". He will be totally committed to our relationship, and willing to stay for the long haul, "in sickness and in health, for better or for worse"; as couples promise in the wedding vows. The perfect husband would not be distracted by other women; not even when I have lost my looks. He would be a "one woman man". In return, I will also promise my total loyalty and faithfulness to my future husband.

Actually, there are many other qualities that make a man perfect husband material. For example, one obvious quality would be the ability to provide; and, though it is not the most important quality, physical attraction must be a part of the equation for a marriage to work well. However, while it is easy to make lists, finding a man to live up to them will be very difficult. Furthermore, instead of focusing on my requirements for the perfect husband, I think I should recognise my own imperfections, and set about correcting them. As Barnett Brickner said, "Success in marriage does not come merely through finding the right mate, but through being the right mate."
Dark rain clouds were gathering in the sky. I was cycling as fast as I could to get home before the downpour. When I felt a few big drops on my head, I decided to head for a bus stop, about a hundred meters away. As I was nearing the bus stop, I saw a lady rushing towards it from the opposite direction, tugging a little boy behind her. The little boy was finding it hard to keep up with her, so, finally, she just picked him up and carried him.

Suddenly, a motorcycle roared past me, almost knocking me down. "Hey! Are you mad!" I shouted at the motorcyclist. He turned to look at me, and for a split second, I saw his face - cruel, glaring eyes and menacing expression. However, he just sped on. Then, I realized that he was heading right for the woman and little boy!

"Watch out! Watch out!" I shouted. I saw the lady turn to look at the motorcyclist, dismay etched on her face.

In an instant, the motorcyclist had reached the lady. He stretched out an arm and grabbed hold of her handbag, hitting her on the back at the same time. The impact sent the lady hurtling forward. The mother and child fell on the road, landing right in the path of a van.

"Stop! Stop!" I screamed at the van driver, waving my arms wildly in the air. Thankfully, the driver had seen what was happening. With a squeal of brakes, the van stopped a few meters from the spot where the mother and child lay sprawled on the road.

I saw the lady crawling on the road towards the wailing child. There was blood all over them. Tossing my bicycle to the side of the road, I ran to help them. By the time I got there, the van driver had reached them. He was cradling the child and examining his limbs.

"I think your little boy is all right. Nothing is broken," he said. "How about you? Do you feel pain anywhere?"

"Please help me. I am pregnant," the lady replied, weeping.

"Don't panic. You'll be all right. I'll take you and your son to hospital," said the man.

The lady could not walk, so the man carried her and settled her in his van. I carried the whimpering child to the van. The man asked me to go along with them so that I could help make the police report. I realized that, by this time, the motorcyclist would have gone far from that spot, with the lady's handbag.

A few days later, I was told that the lady had suffered only minor injuries from the incident. She had some rather deep cuts on her face and limbs, and her knee was twisted. Thankfully, her unborn baby was unharmed. The snatch thief was never apprehended and I doubt I will ever see him again. However, I will never forget the menacing look he had given me.
'School children should not have long holidays'. Do you agree ?

 

R-i-i-i-ng! The bell signaled the beginning of the six week long school holidays. The pupils burst into a loud cheer, thinking of the break they would have from dreary school lessons. "Freedom!" they shouted. The teachers heaved a soft sigh of relief. They would also be glad for the freedom that the holidays will bring.

Teachers have a very stressful job, keeping a classroom of children in the seats for a whole school day. Some of these children may be hyperactive, some may be badly behaved or uncontrollable. Their own parents may be unable to cope with just one of them, yet teachers have to deal with as many as forty children at a time. Furthermore, a teacher's job is tedious and monotonous. They have to prepare lessons day in and day out, standing in front of one class after another. The long holidays will give them a chance to relax and recharge their batteries. Furthermore, teachers can attend courses during the long holidays. These courses will give them more ideas, skills and inspiration.

Long holidays also give a break to the children, who active by nature, are cooped up for hours in a stuffy classroom. Then, after school, they are faced with piles of homework. On top of that, some children have to attend extra tuition in subjects they are weak in, or extra lessons in piano, violin, or guitar, ballet, or martial arts.

With so many structured activities, some children have no time to choose their own leisure pursuits. They have no time to "stand and stare". They also lack the time to bond with their family members, and relatives. The long holidays would give them the opportunity to go on holidays with the family; perhaps they can even spend time with relatives who live far away. They can also take part in other enriching activities, such as educational trips to a foreign country, or attend youth camps, such as Outward Bound, which will help in character development.

Yet, we have to take a realistic view at the other side of the argument. How many families can afford to send their children on overseas field trips or courses like the Outward Bound? In fact, in many families, the parents will be out working all day, and the children will be left unsupervised. This may be dangerous for younger children. As for older children, they may be drawn to undesirable and anti-social activities, like theft, gangsterism, gambling and drugs. Furthermore, for some children, school provides their only exposure to academic learning. Thus, the long period away from their studies may cause some children to regress badly in their academic skills.

So, in conclusion, long holidays are beneficial for some people and not so good for others. The teachers, who need a break from a stressful and tedious routine, will definitely welcome the break. Long holidays will also give opportunities to children from privileged homes to take part in enriching out-of-school activities. However, long school holidays may be detrimental for children from less privileged homes. In my opinion, for the good of the general public, schools should not have very long holidays. Or, if long holidays are to remain a part of the school year, certain activities or services should be provided for less privileged children to keep them occupied in a safe and useful way.
My favorite day of the work

 

I live with my grandmother in Bentong, whereas my parents live and work in Kuala Lumpur. They usually come home to see us once or twice a month. If they manage to get away, it will be on the weekend, usually arriving very late on Friday night. So, Saturday is my favorite day of the week for that is the day I get to see my parents.

It is a joyful feeling just to know that my parents are in the house and sleeping in their room. I know that my father will be very tired, after driving all the way home after a demanding day at work. So, I keep very quiet, allowing them to get all the rest they need. My mother usually wakes up first. "Where is my big girl?" is her usual greeting, followed by warm hugs and kisses. I will make her a cup of black coffee, just the way she likes it, and we will sit on the balcony, sharing our experiences since we last met. This is my favorite part of the day, pouring out my heart to my Mum, my closest confidante.

When my father finally wakes up, we go out for breakfast. It is usually dim sum, my father's favorite breakfast food. This is a jolly family time. My father's jokes never fail to make us roar with laughter. Sometimes, my grandmother will tell my parents the news concerning our other relatives, including their illnesses or the bad behavior. My father will comfort her and try to encourage her to be patient and happy. When my grandmother gets into this mood, I cringe inside because I wonder whether she will mention my misdeeds. Fortunately, my parents are both understanding, and try to keep our breakfast a light-hearted occasion.

My father has two sisters in Bentong, and we usually go to his elder sister's house after breakfast. His younger sister's family will also drop over, if they are free. While the older folk chat in the living room, we usually go out to the orchard and relax under the trees. My aunt and grandmother will cook up a storm in the kitchen. They are excellent cooks, and, somehow, we always find space in our stomachs for the delicious food.

In the afternoon, we often go to the supermarket to buy the household necessities. Then, sometimes, we go for a movie. We usually have dinner at the stalls. Sometimes, our relatives will come along for dinner or the movies, adding to the fun. Later, my father will look at my schoolwork. He will praise me for my achievements, and correct me gently when he feels I have slacked. Sometimes, when I face difficulties in my studies, such as Additional Mathematics, or Physics, my father will explain the concepts to me. I look forward to this time with him, as I want to do well for my own sake, as well as to make my parents proud of me. When, we have finished, we just chat or watch television.

Actually, nothing very exciting happens on the Saturdays when my parents come home. We do very ordinary things - eating, chatting, grocery - shopping, and revising schoolwork. However, it is not the activities I look forward to but the people I am doing them with. This is the time that I feel most secure and loved. I know my parents will have to leave the next day. So, I treasure the time we have together.
Write a story ending with : "... We said our goodbyes and went our separate ways"
 

The canteen was crowded with campers, all ravenous after the day's activities. To my relief, I spotted an empty place at one of the long tables. I walked there quickly and put my tray down. Just as I did so, I felt a bump against my hip. Then there was a clatter as a tray dropped on the table and curry splattered everywhere. "Yikes!" Someone yelled, followed by gales of laughter.

Curry was dripping all over my new camp shirt and my new jeans, and I could not find any humor in the situation. "Can't you look where you are going, you clumsy oaf! And what's so funny anyway?"' I shouted, glaring at the culprit, a lanky boy with wild hair.

"Sorry! Can't help laughing! You look so funny!" the boy sputtered, bent over with laughter.

I was too annoyed to answer and just stomped away to change my clothes.

The next morning, we were all assembled for roll call, when I saw the same boy come sprinting out of the quarters to join the lines, his unbuttoned shirt flying behind him. Before he could slide into place, he was spotted by the Camp Commandant. As a punishment for being late, he was made to do a hundred pushups. As we walked past him, on the way to breakfast, I let out a loud chortle. "Sorry. I can't help laughing. You look so funny," I said.

So the war of words began with the wild-haired boy, whose name, I found out, was Ben. A few days later, when I had trouble rappelling, it was Ben's turn to laugh at me and make rude jokes. Then, I had my revenge when Ben capsized his canoe. By now, however, I was beginning to regret this "war"; there was something mean-spirited about it.

On the last day, we went for an extended mountain trek. On the way down, I hurt my ankle slightly. I was able to stumble on but got left further and further behind my patrol. After some time, they were out of sight. Though, I knew I would get back to the camp if I just kept on the track. I was getting anxious as evening fell. I tried to walk faster but my ankle was getting worse. Then, as I was negotiating a path that clung to the mountain side, I tripped. My unstable feet slid on the muddy ground, and, unable to stop myself, I slid right off the path and down the ravine.

Fortunately, my fall was stopped by a clump of bamboo. I saw that I was about ten meters below the track. There was no way I could climb up the slope, with my hurt ankle, which now seemed broken. I shouted for help, but in my heart, I knew it would be in vain, as I had been left far behind the group. All I could hope for was that they would send a search party for me. So, I could only wait.

It got dark and I became afraid. Then, I saw a faint light, and heard a voice calling out my name. I recognized the voice as Ben's.

"Ben! Help! I'm down here!" I shouted.

Soon, I saw Ben's wild-haired silhouette on the top of the ravine and the light of his torch shining down at me. "Hold on. I'll be there soon," he said. In a few minutes, Ben was rappelling down the slope. He examined my ankle and, after pronouncing it was not broken, bound it up, gently and expertly. As he was doing so, some others from the search party arrived. I was brought back to camp, not much the worse for my misadventure.

The next day was a flurry of activities so I was unable to speak to Ben until we were boarding the buses which would take us back to our respective homes. Ben came from a state up north whereas I was from Johor, in the south. "Thanks for finding me yesterday. I'm really sorry for my stupid behavior," I started to apologize.

"That's okay. I was stupid too. We missed the chance of being friends but, perhaps, we'll meet at another camp," Ben replied, grinning.

"I'd like that," I said. Then it was time for the buses to leave the camp site. So, we said our goodbyes and went our separate ways.
Over the years, we all accumulate objects of sentimental value. Choose one such object and tell the tale behind its value.
 

My early childhood memories consists mainly of foggy, erratic images. I have a few memories from the days of my first few years. Mostly, I recollect watching television and playing games with my younger brother, who is two years my junior. There is one object, though, that has stayed with me throughout my young life, lying in my cupboard in most recent years -- my "po-chim".

Back in those days, most newborn babies were given a bolster, more familiarly known to the Hokkiens as a "po-chim". My parents, being indulgent, had bought me several. Every night, they would place me in my crib and arrange my bolsters and pillows about me. They must have meant well, but for a small child, it was like being surrounded by a forest of cushions. So, I would exhaust most of my energy flinging all the paraphernalia out of my crib ... all except for one blue-and-white bolster.

Eventually, my parents got the message. At bedtime, the only bolster placed in my crib was my favorite blue-and-white "po-chim".

When I finally learned to walk, I set myself to perfecting this exciting new skill. All over the house I wandered, meandering hither and thither. Nothing could stop me, be it chair, carpet, door or my parents. And, everywhere I went, so did my bolster, clutched in my hot little fist. Up hill and down dale went my bolster and I, searching for trouble and always finding it.

My brother, as I have mentioned, was born when I as two years old. i knew him for my brother the firs time I set eyes on him. Marching to his crib, I plonked my bolster in it and mumbled, "Baby brother also needs 'po-chim'. " Of course, I never fully relinquished my claim to the bolster. It had been and would always be mine. My baby brother did not really seem to like it anyway.

Later, as I grew older and stronger, my rough play took its toll on my "po-chim". Originally three feet long and plump with stuffing, my bolster ended up being almost empty, with one lone foot of stuffing left. The rest had long escaped through the numerous tears and splits in the material. Undeterred, I put half the stuffing in each end of the bolster and made myself a trusty ninja weapon, a nunchaku. I would whirl off in flights of fantasies, imagining myself in ninja warrior, ever ready to attack my brother, father, other, or anyone else for that matter.

Most children grow out of their soft toys and bolsters at any early age. I kept my old bolster by my bedside long past the age of ten. I never stopped playing with it, either. The games just got more sophisticated. Once, I built a miniature obstacle course using my bolster as a cable car sorts.

Then, one day, the material just got too soft to be used nay more. I could poke my finger through it without exerting pressure. That night, I placed my bolster in my cupboard and went to sleep, a sad little boy.

For the next few weeks, sleepless night after sleepless night followed. Finally, I gave in and started using the old bolster again. Patching up the hole as best as I could, I returned the old bolster to my bedside.

It did not take long before it happened. One night, unable to handle the job any more, my bolster tore in half. It was a heartbroken and sorry boy who sewed up the tear one last time.

Since then, my bolster has lain in a shrine of its own in my cupboard. I still take the occasional glance at it. It no longer represents pleasant dreams at night for my "grown-up" self. But it does represent something more intangible

That bolster, lying there, had been my first friend, my faithful comforter. It represents my childhood.

Goodbye, "po-chim".
Ways of Curbing Inflation
 

The price of goods and services seems to be increasing year by year. Nevertheless, there is much that we consumers can do to fight this seemingly unending inflation. How do we go about it ?

First and foremost, we can start at our very home. Eat more often at home and cut down on eating out. After all, own cooked food is tastier, cleaner, and healthier with less oil and additives. If hawkers have fewer customers, they are sure to think twice when they want to increase the price of food. They may even reduce the price to attract customers.

Next, encourage school-going children to bring home-cooked food to school. In doing so, children will avoid eating junk food or unwholesome food sold in school canteens. It is good for their health. Working adults can also bring own food to work although this may not be a popular practice.

Now let's tackle your shopping spree. Buy in bulk at a lower price. If possible, share with the others when buying in bulk. It would be a good idea to set up cooperatives to cater to consumers' needs. Members have a lot to gain in terms of cheaper and quality goods and services.

Of course, consumers should avoid compulsive spending, especially when the hypermarkets offer cheap sales and contests. Before you go shopping, it would be advisable to prepare a shopping list so that you will not buy unnecessary items. In fact we should spend less in times of inflation.

It would be a good idea to grow own vegetables at our backyard. After all, it is a good pastime and you will enjoy the very vegetables that you grow, knowing that they are fresh and free of pesticide or herbicide. Plants like chillies, brinjals, okra Mid others are easy to grow.

When coming to fruits, preference should be given to our local fruits. Perhaps you can even grow your own fruit trees, like guava, papaya. and mango. Eating more local fruits instead of imported ones will help in foreign exchange.

Last but not least, we should not waste. This is especially ii) when we organise parties or even wedding dinners. We often loud that there is plenty of food left and all this will go to waste. I lit% c, ills for a better planning and budgeting.

If we are serious in fighting inflation, and meticulously carry out some of the ways suggested above, we will certainly help stabilise the price of goods and services.
My immediate neighbors
 

I live in the new Woodlands housing estate. The neighborhood is clean and safe and the people living there are friendly.

My immediate neighbors, the Richards, are a Eurasian family. They are a very friendly and social people. The Richards have two children, a boy and a girl. The boy, Henry, is fifteen years old and his sister, Jasmine is a year younger than he.

Mr. Richards is a tall man with dark brown hair and striking blue eyes. He is in his late thirties and runs a computer shop that retails personal computes that carries his personal brand and he also provides technical support for his customers.

Mrs. Richards is a few years younger than her husband. She is a very pretty woman with long blonde hair that flows down her back in thick curls. She works with her husband at his shop and is somewhat an expert herself on the computer.

Henry is a good-looking lad who is very keen in sports. He is very athletic and likes to play soccer and basketball. He has taken part in many track and field competitions at school and is proud of the many trophies he has won. He also plays soccer with his school team. Henry is also a very good student. He studies hard and gets good grades in examinations.

Jasmine is a pretty girl who takes after her brother. She also loves sports, albeit as a spectator rather than a participant. She is also studious and does well in her studies.

My neighbors often drop in at our house on Sundays and we enjoy their company and friendship. As you can see, we have very good neighbors who are friendly and trustworthy. I would not want to swap neighbors for anything !
A Rainy Day
 

I woke up at the usual time for school that Tuesday morning. When I looked our the window, the day looked cheerful and the sky was bright and sunny. I grabbed my towel and headed for the bathroom. When I emerged from the bathroom some twenty minutes later, I saw that the day had transformed and dark clouds looked ominously up in the sky.
Mother advised me to bring an umbrella, but I declined saying that the school was only a short walking distance away and that I would be in class before it began to rain. I ate the two slices of buttered toast Mother had made fro me and drank a glass of chocolate milk. Then, I gathered my school bag and walked briskly in the direction of my school. Just as I reached the school gates, hard drops of rainfall pelted my head and body. I dashed inside the school building just in time to escape the downpour that had begun.

In class, we had to shut all the windows and switch on the lights for the day had grown very dark. There was also a constant strong wind that threw the raindrops onto the closed windows causing a continual patter.

I though that the rain would cease by the time school dismissed. I was wrong. The rain was still pouring relentlessly when it was time to go home and it looked as if it would carry on throughout the day and night. I decided to walk in the rain.

When I reached home. I was soaked to the bone. Mother made me take off my wet clothes and take a warm shower. Then, we ate a nice hot dish of fish and prawns for lunch.

The rain had somewhat subsided to a slight drizzle by the time Father returned home. We had dinner together and then I did some homework given to me at school.

I went to bed early that night. The rain had brought down the temperature by a few degrees Celsius and I was grateful for the cool and cozy atmosphere after so many warm and sweaty nights.
 	
A Frightening Experience
 

Malika spent a couple of hours getting dressed up in her finest dress, doing her hair, putting make-up on her face and finally coating her lips with bright red lipstick.
She then took her purse and went out. She was going to a grand party at hotel ballroom. She knew that prominent and wealthy people would be at the party and she wanted to appear her best.

She walked down the road to where it would be easy to get a taxi and stood waiting for one. In a few minutes, she saw a vacant taxi and she flagged with her right hand. The taxi came to a halt by her side and Malika opened the rear passenger door and slid into the taxi. She told the driver her destination and settled back comfortably against the seat.

While the taxi drove on, Malika thought of the handsome and wealthy men that she would meet at the party and dreamed that she would meet the her "Prince Charming" that night.

Suddenly, she noticed that the taxi was driving along a strange and deserted road that was nowhere near her destination. She leaned forward and asked the taxi driver where they were. The taxi driver turned his head and grinned at her. His eyes looked fierce and evil. Malika felt very frightened and pleaded with the taxi driver to stop. the man did not heed her cries and pleas and kept driving down the deserted road.

Malika knew that she had to save herself somehow. As a final and desperate measure, she threw open the door and flung herself out of the taxi. She landed on something hard and felt a sharp pain on her head. Then, she lost consciousness.

When she awoke, Malika found herself in a hospital bed. A young doctor was looking down at her. She was told that she was found unconscious by the side of a road that morning.

Luckily, Malika did not suffer any serious injuries.
A Sad Occasion
 

I am the youngest in a family of six children. My eldest brother. Ali, was almost twenty-three when tragedy struck suddenly to deprive our family of a filial son and loving brother.

I came home from school that day, cheerful because I had won the top prize in a school mathematics competition. When I reached home, I knew immediately that something was wrong. Many of my relatives were at my house and the looks on their faces showed sadness.

I quickly rushed into the house and met my sister, Salmah, who blurted out to me that Ali was dead. "He was knocked down by a car while crossing the road to his office," she said, "and was killed on the spot." I felt as if someone had pulled the carpet from under my feet, and for a second I felt dizzy. Then the realization of the loss set in and I was overcome with sorrow.

I could hear my mother and sisters wailing loudly inside the room. I knew that Ali's body lay there but I could not bring myself to go in. I moved towards the wall and turned my back towards it. Then, I slumped down to the floor and bowed y head low between my upright knees.

I felt someone touch my shoulder and looked up to see my father standing over me. His eyes were red and the skin around his eyes looked puffy. He told me that it was time for the funeral.

Ali's body was washed according to the Islamic custom and prayers were held. Then, we went to the Muslim cemetery at St James Park for the burial. After, the burial and further supplication for the dead, it finally dawned on me that I would never ever see my brother again in the flesh. I offered a silent prayer for my brother and beseeched God Almighty to provide ell for my brother in the Hereafter.
The Person I Admire Most
 

The person I admire most is my father. My father is a man of medium built and height. He runs a small textile shop on Arab Street which provides the family with a good and steady income. But, my father actually came from a very humble background.
My father was born to a poor family in Malacca. My grandparents could not even afford to send my father for higher education. After completing hsi studies in his village, he helped my grandfather in the padi fields.

At the age of eighteen, father decided to leave the village and head to the city in search of work. He found work as a peon in a small textile company. He was very hard-working and his superiors were pleased with him. They advised my father to continue his studies by taking part-time classes. He took their advice and enrolled himself in evening classes. He learnt English and other subjects n these classes.

After a few years, he got himself a diploma from his studies. Very soon afterwards, he was promoted and sent to manage the Singapore branch. My father was never a spendthrift and he never drank or smoked. He met my mother when he came to Singapore and they were married the following year. My eldest brother was born a year later.

My father had only worked for that one company. He constantly improved himself and grew with the company until he was appointed as one of the company's directors. When the old patriarch who founded the company had passed away, his two sons decided to sell the Singapore branch to my father. And so, my father finally became the boss of the very firm for which he had worked for.

My father is truly my role model. He has given the family everything it needs. He sets himself as an example for us to follow. He is never angry without a good cause and is always cheerful, kind and helpful and I hope that, by his example, I would grow up to be like him, too.
An Interesting Person
 

I met Mr. Vijay when we moved into our new house. He was our next door neighbor. Mr. Vijay was an elderly man who lived alone. He had a part-time domestic servant who came daily to cook and wash for him.
Mr. Vijay was a very sociable and amiable man. He was in his mid-seventies when I first came to know him. He was of slight built and was slightly hunchbacked. His eyesight was bad and he was almost blind without the aid of his thick glasses.

I became fast friends with this old man. For one thing, Mr. Vijay was a bookworm. He loved reading and spent most of his time poring over books, magazines and newspapers. He was a truly erudite person. He was inquisitive by nature and he would read on just about any topic. This made him a great conversationalist as he could speak on just about any subject under the sun.

Mr. Vijay had bought the house next to ours when he retired a few years previously. It was rumored that Mr. Vijay was very wealthy but he was never spending money unnecessarily and his wants were frugal. Indeed, it seemed that Mr. Vijay spent most of his money o books and other printed matters.

I enjoyed chatting with Mr. Vijay and we would often discuss on various interesting topics. I was a bookworm as well ( and I still am ) and we had similar inclinations towards the subjects we read. We would spend hours talking about history, science, politics and other subjects of mutual interest.

Three years ago, Mr. Vijay died at the age of seventy-nine. He bequeathed all the books which he had in his personal library to me. Believe it or not, Mr. Vijay had more than six thousand books in his library ! My father converted one of our rooms into a library to house all the books Mr. Vijay left me.

I feel sad that Mr. Vijay is no longer around. I have yet to find someone with whom I can converse as I had with that learned old man.
Jogging and Its Benefits
 

Jogging is fast becoming a regular exercise routine found in most neighborhoods. Doctors and nutritionists advise their patients to jog, for jogging brings many benefits. It increases stamina and helps us to keep fit and healthy. But for me, jogging is also a fun activity that gives me great pleasure. I enjoy breathing in the fresh air of the early morning, listening to the songs of the birds and seeing the beauty of nature through the first rays of the sun.
I began jogging when I was twelve years old. My elder brother asked me if I wanted to join him for a jog around the neighborhood and I agreed. we jogged for about fifteen or twenty minutes. At the end of the run, I was panting and felt very tired.

The next day, my brother asked me out for a jog again. I was somewhat reluctant to join him the second time. My brother sensing my thoughts assured me that it would get easier day after day and that I eventually I would enjoy jogging.

Needless to say, I went for a jog for the second time, and then a third and from then on there was no quitting. I fell in love with this activity. Gradually we increased the distance we jogged. First we started with one kilometer, then increased it to one and a half. Little by little, we increased the distance as our stamina improved. Now, we jog five kilometers daily !

A Bus Ride
 

I was waiting at the bus stop. I was going to school. As usual, the bus stop was crowded with people from all walks of life. There were office and factory workers going to their places of work. There were older women going to the market with their shopping baskets. Then, there were students like me who were on their way to school.
In another ten minutes, the bus arrived. it was already quite full but I managed to get in with the other commuters. When the door closed, I was jammed against the door of the bus. The bus was filled to the brim and there was not even much breathing space. I felt stifled and thought I would suffocate.

At the next stop, some people got off and I was able to move inward. But this made my position even more precarious as more people got on and I found myself sandwiched between two very huge men with nothing to hold on to.

As the bus stopped and moved at traffic lights, I would find myself helplessly bumping into others. I mumbled apologies whenever that happened. I could not even see where the bus was heading as my view was utterly blocked by the passengers surrounding me. But I did not worry as my school was near the bus interchange.

A few stops before the bus interchange, people started getting off the bus and there were no passengers getting on. Soon, there were only about a dozen passengers left and I even got a seat for the rest of the journey. When the bus reached the interchange, everyone got off and I slowly walked towards my school.

A Daring Rescue
 

Johnny was sound asleep when he was awakened by a loud commotion. He opened his eyes and lay listening. He could hear shouts and screams coming from the outside. Sensing that something was wrong, he quickly threw on his t-shirt and slipped into a pair of jeans, discarding his cotton pyjamas, and rushed out of the house.
There was a huge crowd gathered at one of the houses further up the street. The house was ablaze and thick clouds of smoke were floating up into the clouds. Johnny went back into the house and made an urgent call to the fire department. Then, he ran out again towards the house on fire.

It was Mr. Ong's house. Mr. Ong and his wife were safely out of the house but their young daughter was still trapped inside the burning inferno. the neighbors had formed a human chain and were using buckets of water to put out the fire but it was of no avail.

Johnny could hear the frantic cries of the young girl inside the burning house. Without thinking twice, Johnny furled himself at the door and broke into the house. He was almost overcome by the thick smoke. Johnny held his breath and managed to locate the young girl. He carried her over his right shoulder and dashed out of the house and placed her on a grass patch.

Soon, the fire engine and ambulance arrived. The paramedics quickly transported the girl to the hospital accompanied by Mr. and Mrs. Ong. The firemen used their big hoses to put the fire out but the house was completely ruined.

A few days later, Mr. and Mrs. Ong came to Johnny's house. their daughter was still recovering in hospital as she had suffered some minor burns. The couple thanked Johnny for rescuing their daughter.
A Ghostly Encounter
 

There are people who believe in ghosts and there are people who don't. I myself was a skeptic a few years ago. All that changed when I had a paranormal experience one fateful Sunday just a year ago.
I had gone to Malacca with my three friends. Ali, Alex and Bishek, during the school holidays. we went to a quiet village and a relative of my friend's had made us welcome and offered us the use of one his rooms. The village was a far cry from the city where we lived. There was no hustle and tussle of the rat-race found in the city. the days moved at a leisurely pace and we had lots of fun fishing in the river and climbing trees to pluck rambutans and mangoes. It seemed that life in the village was absolutely carefree.

One day, Ali claimed that he had heard that there was a haunted house at the outskirts of the village. He said that the house was very old and was in a badly ruined condition but none of the villagers would go near it. We thought that Ali was just pulling our legs when our host, Mahmud, stepped in. We asked Mahmud if there was such a house and he assured us that indeed there was. he also advised to stay away from the haunted house. He seemed to be in earnest but we brushed aside his admonitions. None among the four of us at that time believed in the existence of ghosts and we attributed such tales to overworked human imagination and folklore.

That night, Alex suggested that we go to the presumed haunted house and prove to the rest of the superstitious villagers once and for all that there was no such thing as ghosts. We readily agreed to this plan and we made our way to the house in question.

When we reached the dilapidated house, we felt an eerie chill, yet not even a gentle breeze was blowing. We flashed our torchlights and made our way to the house. The house had no door and we boldly walked in. There were still bits and pieces of old furniture strewn all over the floor and there were cobwebs hanging on the walls and ceilings. Insects and birds had built their nests inside the house. we smiled at this sight for this is an excellent example where the tiniest of God's creatures had made this place their home when man in his false superstition had abandoned.

Just then, we heard a terrifying scream. We had goosebumps and felt our hairs standing on ends. We looked at one another n fright. Then, a light formed in the middle of the room and a ghostly apparition appeared right before our eyes. The face was that o the ugliest woman we had ever seen. Her face had long line of open scars and we could see maggots and worms oozing out from the open scabs. She was floating in the air and her feet were not visible.

For a few seconds, we were dumbstruck and then in unison we fled from the house as fast as our legs could carry. We ran all the way to Mahmud's house and stopped to catch our breath only we have locked ourselves in our room.

The next day, all of us were down with a high fever. Mahmud called the doctor and we were each given an injection and prescribed a course of medicine. We were bedridden for three days. When we had recovered, we told Mahmud what had happened. He smiled and said that he had guessed as much as it was odd that all four of us should be taken ill at the same time. He told us that certain things cannot be proven scientifically but that does not mean that they are not true.

I cannot argue with that now.
A Secret Message
 

Inspector James was at his office that Sunday. There was an urgent case which needed his attention. A thirteen-year old girl had been kidnapped near her home a few days ago.
It happened like this. Shirley, the kidnap victim, was walking towards her house when she was kidnapped by four burly men in a red van. Two of the men grabbed the poor girl and carried her into the van which sped off immediately. A neighbor had witnessed this incident who quickly informed her parents and together lodged a police report. The next day, a ransom note had been sent to her wealthy parents. demanding a quarter of a million dollars to secure her release. The police were trying all they could to rescue the girl and to apprehend her kidnappers.

That Sunday morning, Inspector James had received a mysterious message at his office. It was sent by mail in a white envelope and written on a plain white A4-size paper. It read:

The girl is save for the moment. Hurry or she will be raped and killed when the ransom is paid.

The message was signed "A Friend". Inspector James knew that what the message indicated could well be true. Shirley would have seen the faces of the kidnappers and they might well kill her when they had received the money to save themselves from being identified in future.

But who had written the message ? It seemed to Inspector James that it must be one of the kidnappers who did not want to be an accessory to murder. Inspector James scrutinized the piece of paper and turned it first one side and then the other. The writer had told him to hurry but he had not revealed the place where the girl was held captive.

He pondered over this message for a long while and then an idea struck him. He went to the wastepaper basket and retrieved the envelope in which the message was sent. There right before his eyes was the address of an industrial office building in Mamba Street. That was the actual message, the location of the kidnappers.

Inspector James quickly gathered a force of his men and raided the location. It proved to be true. the kidnappers, who thought that they were sitting pretty, were not prepared for the police raid and were quickly overpowered and arrested. The girl was found tied to a chair and was not harmed in any way.

 	
Once Bitten Twice Shy
 

"Once bitten twice shy" is an old adage. In my case, it became a literal truth.
I was very mischievous as a young boy. I enjoyed playing pranks and practical jokes on people. I also liked to chase cats and used a handmade catapult to shoot at birds on the trees. My parents did not approve of my behavior and constantly berated me for the mischief I caused. I was even given a good thrashing from my father from time to time. But I did not mend my ways until this incident.

I had just finished lunch at home and I was feeling very bored. My brothers and sisters, all of them older than I, had not returned home from school. I decided to walk around the neighborhood and I brought my trusty catapult with me.

Soon, I came to Mr. Lingam's house. His pet dog, a giant Schnauzer, was tied to a post outside his house. I looked around and saw that no one was in sight. I decided to make good use o my catapult and picked a few small pebbles from the ground and aimed at the dog. A few of the pebbles hit the poor dog and it began to howl and help in pain. Eventually, the dog's anger was aroused and it began growling and barking fiercely at me while it strained against the ropes to free itself. I laughed at the dog, feeling amused by my sadistic deed.

Suddenly, the rope that secured the dog snapped and the dog was free from its bonds. With a few powerful strides the dog was on me. Its teeth sank into the flesh of my calf. I screamed in pain and fright and fell to the ground.

Luckily, my screams brought Mr. Lingam running out of the house and he managed to free the dog's teeth from my calf. He brought the dog into his house and quickly brought me to the clinic. The doctor gave me an injection and dressed the wound.

I related the incident to the doctor and Mr. Lingam. The doctor chided me for being cruel to a helpless animal and asked me to be kind and considerate to all creatures in future.

I learnt my lesson that day. I have since stopped playing pranks and being cruel to helpless creatures.
A Smuggling Operation
 

Samuel was feeling bored at home. He had been confined to his house since he fractured his leg in a soccer match two weeks ago. His leg had been set in cast and he could only walk with the aid of crutches.
Samuel picked up the cordless phone by his bed and sat thinking. Who could he call then ? He knew that all his friends were in school. He was about to replace the handset when a thought occurred to him. He disconnected the telephone wire from the phone and pressed the 'talk' button. He put the phone to his ear and listened. At first he could only hear a static crackle. He kept changing channels to see if he could eavesdrop on any conversation. he knew that it was sometimes possible to pick up conversations of other users but they would not be able to hear him.

After some moments, he did pick up a conversation between two people. And what a conversation it was ! Apparently it was a conversation between two smugglers. They were planning to smuggle in cigarettes illegally into Singapore from the Riau islands of Indonesia. Samuel listened carefully and took down the details of the smuggling operation. Samuel carefully noted down the details as the men spoke.

After he had the necessary details, Samuel plugged in the telephone wire again and quickly dialed the police. He gave his particulars tot he police operator and repeated what he had overheard. The operator thanked him and said that the police would investigate the matter.

A few days later, a senior officer from the Singapore Checkpoints Authority and a Superintendent of Police paid a visit to Samuel's house. the police had apprehended the smugglers as they tried to smuggle in the illegal cigarettes an the visiting officers thanked Samuel for his timely information.
Why I would like to be rich
 

Everybody wants to be rich and no one wants to be poor by their own choice. This is a fact. Event he rich wants to be richer and the very rich wants to be super rich. In a materialistic world, money is an indispensable commodity which everyone, young or old, man or woman, seeks.
Everyone has their own reasons for seeking wealth. I have mine as well, and these are my reasons.

First, I would build my dream house. It would be in a quite and secluded area, away from the busy city. It would be built on a large tract of land which would also include facilities such as a swimming pool, a tennis court, a badminton court and a jogging track that would run around the perimeter of the estate. It would also have a beautiful garden and a barbecue area for garden parties.

Then, I would also like to own a large yacht in which I could sail out to the sea. The yacht would have a well-stocked larder with the best foods an drinks available so that my guests and I could stay at sea for several days or weeks at a stretch.

I would have my own jet plane in which I could fly to anywhere in the world at a moment's notice. I could be in New York one day and in Paris the next and then in Shanghai the following day.

Then, I would also like to help people. I would start a charity foundation to help the needy. I would award scholarships to exceptionally talented youths so that they would be able to further their education without thought of financial worries. I would also set up homes for the aged and the handicapped.

Finally, I would donate a princely sum to medical research. Scientists have not found a cure to diseases such as cancer and Aids. It would be good to render y help to such worthy causes.

These are my reasons for wanting to be rich.
Needed Inventions
 

Since young I have been fascinated by works of science fiction. I have read all the novels and stories of famous science fiction writers such as Arthur C. Clarke and Jules Verne. My favorite television programs have been the likes of "Star Trek", "Space 1999" and "Battlestar Gallactica".
Since the beginning of time, man had used his inventive faculties to create machines to make life easier. We now have machines that would have been thought to be children's fantasies at one time.

We now have jet planes that can transport people from one corner of the globe to the other in a matter of hours where our forefathers could have to spend months or even years to cover the same distance. with the advent of the computer and Internet, information can be sent and received by millions of people all over the world. In deed, the last fifty years had seen such a rapid progress in science like never before in the entire history of mankind. So, it is not a mere fantasy of mine to see certain inventions coming into being in the future. I have many in mind but the following three are what I consider to be of utmost importance.

First, I would like to see improved household appliances. There are already mixers, grinders and cookers. But I would like to see the integration of these machines into one. I imagine a machine where all the ingredients are placed into different compartments. The front of the machine would have a menu with selection buttons. All the user would need to do is to press the button for the meal she wants and the machine who do the rest. The machine would perhaps be a model based on the one featured in the futuristic cartoon show "The Jetsons".

Then, I would like to see the transportation systems portrayed in "Star Trek" become a reality One would only need to stand in a 'transporter' and be sent to the place he wants to be. Roads would become a thing of the past and the precious land could be made full use in building residential and recreational facilities.

Finally, home based education. We have already seen the changes in the past twenty years since the introduction of the personal computers and the widespread use of the Internet. A further refinement on this technology and there would not be a need for schools. Pupils can study at home through computer-based teaching systems or they may study through the use of virtual reality. they would just have to put on their virtual reality headsets and they would find themselves in a virtual classroom where they can study the subjects of their choice.

These are the inventions that I would like to see in the future. They may seem far-fetched or even impossible today, but then, so did the possibility of flight a mere century ago.
A Scene During Recess
 

The school bell goes off to signal the start of the twenty-minute recess period. All the pupils get up from their seats, and with the permission of the teacher make their way to the school canteen.
The school canteen has many stalls offering a variety of foods. One can choose Malay, Chinese, Indian or even Western food. The stall holders are friendly folk and the food is inexpensive.

I quickly walk to the school canteen and head for my favorite nasi lemak stall. The stall is run by an elderly Malay woman whom we affectionately call Mak Haji. She is assisted by her son and daughter. Mak Haji also sells fried chicken, fried prawns, fried fish and anchovies, hard-boiled eggs and baked potatoes to go with her delicious nasi lemak.

After buying my meal, I walk over to the drinks stall and buy a tall glass of mixed fruits juice. The drinks stall belongs to Mr. Chan, a thin Chinese in his mid-thirties. He runs the shop alone but he is a very fast worker. His hands seem to move at lightening speed as he serves his customers.

Then, I scan the dining area for an empty seat and having found one, I rush to be seated. I finish the sumptuous meal in a matter of minutes and gulp down the refreshing juice. Having thus filled my stomach, I rise with the empty plate and glass in my hands. There are others waiting to have their meal and I have to make space for them.

All too soon, the school bell rings again to mark the end of recess time. All the pupils head back tot he classroom for the continuation of the day's lessons.
My Plans for the Holidays
 

The final examinations for the year are over and everyone is waiting impatiently for the start of the six-week school holidays. Now that the pressure of the examinations are over and the periods of intense study are behind me, I plan for the well-deserved break till the end of the year.
First, I would like to read all the latest best-sellers that have been released. Busy with my studies, here have been quite a number of new books that I have not read. Novels from Sidney Sheldon and Lawrence Block, two of my favorite authors, have been released recently. Then, there are also some issues of National Geographic and Readers' Digest magazines that I have bought in recent months which I have not had the time to read.

Then, I would have to watch the numerous television programs that I have recorded on video cassettes. I have missed out many episodes of "E.R." and "X-Files", not to mention the critically acclaimed "Desperate Housewives". Television programs are not the only ones that I have missed out. There have also been a few good movies which I have not yet watched. I would have to rent DVDS to watch those as well.

Finally, I plan to organize some fun activities with my classmates. I intend to go fishing by the stream and go trekking through the nearby woods with them. And if there is keen interest, we might even go camping for a week. We would, of course, have to bring the necessary camping items like tents, sleeping bags, insect repellents, cooking utensils and sufficient food.

I look forward in earnest to the activities I have planned for the holidays. I am sure that the coming holidays will be a time of cheery rest and cheerful recreation.
Tuition
 

The word `tuition' refers to remedial teaching in small groups. In the past, students who are weak in their studies engage the services of a tutor, one who was an expert in his field of study. Today, it is a different scenario altogether. Tuition has become a major money spinner for many teachers. Almost every student who can afford it go for tuition and parents are willing to fork out huge sums of money just to ensure that their children are not left behind in the rat race or paper chase.

The rationale for sending students for tuition is to provide opportunities for students who are weak in certain subjects to catch up. In schools, teachers have limited time to teach students. For example, there are only five lessons per week for subjects like Mathematics and English. The time allotted is certainly insufficient for weak students to understand a particular subject. Moreover, with increasing paper work and a load of other duties, teaching time may actually be further reduced. Teachers may rush through the syllabus leaving weaker students in the lurch. These students who have difficulty assimilating what is taught may then resort to tuition.

Nowadays, due to work commitments, parents stay away from home for the greater part of the day. Parents would then prefer to send their children to tuition classes just to keep them from getting involved in undesirable activities or just to prevent them from idling their time away. Some educated parents may be too busy to help their children with their studies. On the other hand, there are parents who are unable to help their children because they do not have a sufficient level of education. For these groups of parents, tuition is helpful.

Tuition classes, nowadays are no longer confined to small groups of students. Many tuition centers have a large enrolment. It is not uncommon to find tuition classes which have bigger enrolments than classes in schools. In such instances, students cannot get personalized attention from tutors and this defeats the whole purpose of tuition.

The authorities should come down hard on such tuition centers which are out to fleece students. Otherwise, such centers will be churning out teachers who give their wholehearted attention and devotion to tuition and slacken in school.
 	
Break time at school
 

I look at my watch. Two minutes to go before break time and the class is visibly agitated. Everybody is restless. Even Mr. Lee our mathematics teacher is fidgeting quietly in his seat, looking outside every now and then.
The bell rings, exploding the subdued silence of the school. I feel a tangible change in mood among my classmates. The brooding atmosphere immediately gives way to an excited chatter of happy voices. Mr. Lee strides quickly out of the class. We run.

We run toward the tuckshop, slowing down every time we encounter a teacher in our path. Teachers are so slow. They block the way and waste our precious twenty minutes of break time.

Nevertheless I am always one of those first at the tuckshop. I order a plate of mee and ladle a generous helping of gravy onto the mee. The thin Indian man sells the best mee in the world, especially the gravy that goes with the mee. Next I move over to the refreshment stall of the tuckshop and buy a glass of fruit juice. By this time the tuckshop is crowded with jostling pupils all trying to buy their favorite food. i sit down at one of the huge tables in the tuckshop. For a minute or so I am oblivious to my surroundings. What matters most is the delicious taste of mee in my mouth, and the subsequent thirst-quenching feeling of cold fruit juice running down my throat to my stomach.

Ah ..., a full stomach is a happy stomach.

When I become aware of my surroundings again, I can see one of my classmates sitting opposite me gobbling down his food. I look around. the tables are all fully seated. I see heads all bowed down and mouths feverishly chewing. One boy is gesturing frantically with his rice-filled spoon at his friend opposite him. Obviously he is trying to press a point home but I do not think he is having much success except for the bits of rice that keep flying out of his mouth. You should not talk when eating, my mother always tells me. How true it is.

Somebody nudges my shoulder. He wants me to get up because I have had my meal and he has not. He holds a plate of rice in his hands. I get up.

The din in the tuckshop is terrific. I see some blue-shirted prefects unsuccessfully trying to keep the pupils in line when buying food. The tuckshop sells many things -- mee, rice, drinks, sweets and other titbits. Money changes hands quickly. the shopkeeper and his assistants are working at a frantic rate. Young boys crowd around, pushing and shoving, trying to buy their food. Hunger is a very powerful force, indeed.

Where are the girls ? We have girls in the school too. I look around, Ah, there they are, demurely seated at a table, one table out of a dozen, eating slowly and gracefully unlike the boys who behave as though they have not eaten for days. Elsewhere I see groups of girls standing and waiting for the rush to be over before they buy their food.

Gradually the number of buyers at the stalls peter out and the girls move in. The difference is so great. the girls do not rush. In fact they take their time buying their food and they even help one another in buying. what contrasting sets of human beings they are, the boys and the girls.

A few minutes before the end of break time, the stalls are almost deserted. The mee seller has already packed up. There will be no mee for latecomers. The pupils move out of the tuckshop to gossip in unrestricted areas.

All too soon the bell goes, signaling the beginning of the rest of the lessons. I walk slowly toward my classroom. Nobody runs. Some stall for as long as possible before moving. Like worker ants we make our way to our classrooms. Like soldier ants the prefects move the opposite way -- toward the tuckshop, they have to eat too, whatever is left.
A seaside resort on a rainy day
 

Teluk Kemang  eight miles from Port Dickson town, is a very popular holiday spot. The beach is covered with lovely white sand and the sea is usually calm and inviting here. Furthermore the water's edge does not change appreciably during low and high tides. So a bather does not have to wade far to get to a decent depth.

Come Sundays and holidays, the beach is packed to capacity. This Sunday is no different. When I arrive by car with a group of friends, I have to hunt high and low for a parking space. After some time I find one a few hundred meters from the beach. We do not complain for we are lucky to find one.

In double-quick time we are in the sea, swimming to and fro and generally having a good time. From the water I can see throngs of people on the beach. Some are standing, some are sitting while the rest walk leisurely around. Some children are making sand-castles and a couple of white bodies are spread out on the beach, presumably sun-bathing. Too bad for them, the sun is hidden behind black clouds.

Black clouds! The thought suddenly occurs to me that it is going to rain. As if in direct response to my thoughts, the rain comes, thick and furious. I can feel the sting of the raindrops falling on my bare shoulders. The sea seems to boil under the incessant onslaught of falling raindrops. I can see the bathers, including me, crouching down as low as we can get into the water to avoid the painful drops.

Through the blurring rain, I see people on the beach rushing madly for shelter. Most of the holiday-makers who come here are in their best Sunday clothes. They have no intention of swimming. These people are mainly harried city workers who come here to join in the happy Sunday atmosphere. However this Sunday is not for them. Soon most of them who do not find shelter quick enough are soaked to the skin  their clothes, hairdo, makeup and all thoughts of a cheery holiday ruined by the relentless rain. They huddle remorsefully under whatever shelter that are available  in the stalls, in the hotels, under the huge trees, in the bus. Some bravely stand in the rain with their umbrellas. What a pathetic sight they present. The beach is completely deserted.

The souvenir pedlars are more prepared for the rain for they cover their wares quickly and effectively with plastic sheets. It is obvious that they have had a lot of practice at this.

The speed-boats that take holiday-makers for a ride around the bay for a fee are idle. The drivers sit forlornly in the boats, waiting for the rain to stop.

Those of us in the sea carry on with our fun. The feeling of getting caught in the rain while in the sea is quite invigorating. Water, water everywhere and enough for anyone to drink. All he has to do is to open his mouth, above the sea that is.

Eventually I can feel the waves becoming larger and the wind stronger. In a few minutes swimming becomes impossible as the waves become huge and angry and the wind begins to get cold. I signal to my friends to get out.

Emerging from the warm sea into the cold driving rain is like stepping from a warm bed into a refrigerator. We shiver uncontrollably. So we run to the car. It is so wonderful to be inside the warm car but what a mess we make inside the car; sand, water and salt everywhere. I will have to clean the car when I get home.

When I start the engine to move off, I can see buses and cars leaving the beach. It seems like these people have decided to go home too. Judging from the intensity of the storm, I reckon it will carry on for a few hours. There is no point hanging around. Still there are many stubborn holidaymakers braving the pouring rain, waiting for the rain to go away till the seaside becomes cheery and sunny once again.
The Interview
 

Mat leaned back against the sofa he shared with two other persons. He could see other sofas seated with young people of about his age. Without exception, each person held either a large envelope or a paper file in his or her hand. Everyone was nervous and expectant though each tried to look nonchalant and relaxed.

The room that Mat and the others were sitting in was air-conditioned. A pretty young girl sat in front of a telephone switchboard and was busy handling calls. The room was tastefully furnished and decorated. Mat thought: so this is the place I might get to work in; not bad, not bad at all. He checked the contents of his envelope - certificates, reference letters, identity card, resume, etc. Yes, everything seemed to be in order. This was the first interview he was going to attend after applying for various jobs advertised in the newspapers. He wondered how he would face up to the interviewers when his turn came. Being a recent school-leaver, he had absolutely no experience in being interviewed. He had consulted some older working friends about the correct way to present oneself at an interview, but they gave him contradicting advice that left him no wiser.

The door marked "Conference Room" opened and a young girl, presumably one of the secretaries, stepped out. Everybody turned their eyes on her. She held a piece of paper in her hand and from it she called out a name. Mat held his breath, heart pounding. Maybe this was his turn.

An unfamiliar name broke the tense silence and the young man next to him stood up, adjusted his tie and followed the girl into the room. Mat and the rest settled back on their seats.

Ten minutes later, the young man emerged. Another name was called. Still it was not Mat's turn.

After an hour of waiting and watching others getting into the room, Mat was feeling edgy. When would his turn come? He fidgeted about, fiddling his tie and rolling up the corners of his envelope.

He must have started to day-dream because when he heard his name being called, the young girl was standing right in front of him.

"Ahmad Nordin, are you Ahmad Nordin?" She asked Mat, raising her voice.

"Er, Yes, Yes!" Mat muttered. "It's your turn now, come."

Ahmad jumped up and and followed her into the conference room.

Inside the room, three men with ties were seated together behind a large long table. They looked as though they meant business. In front of them was a chair on which Mat was indicated to sit. Mat managed to say "good morning" and "thank you" before he sat down.

"Ahmad Nordin?" boomed the man in the middle. "You wish to be a sales representative?"

"Yes," Mat replied. "I want to give it a try."

"What experience do you have?"

"None, sir. But I am a fast learner."

"Maybe, maybe" the same man commented.

After this opening exchanges, Mat felt himself answering their questions confidently and spontaneously. He did not feel uneasy at all. In fact he was beginning to enjoy the interview. Soon he was talking cheerfully as though he had known these men for years. Then suddenly the man in the middle gestured to him to stop.

"Okay, Encik Ahmad, that's all. We shall inform you as to whether we want you or not. You may go now and thank you."

Mat stood up, wishing that he could stay longer. There were other things he wanted to say. Nevertheless he had to leave. So he uttered "thank you" and shuffled out of the room.

When he stepped into the busy street outside, the sun was shining brightly. He squinted his eyes to get used to the glare. The day was hot but the sky was a beautiful blue. Mat felt happy and relieved. He had just attended an interview which he reckoned to have done quite well. He had just cleared a fearful hurdle and he came out unscathed. With a smile on his face he half-walked and half-skipped down the road.
A Natural Disaster
Describe what happened when a natural disaster struck unexpectedly.

 
It was December 26th, 2004. People were in a holiday mood for a number of reasons. It was the day after Christmas, a Sunday. In Malaysia, schoolchildren were also enjoying their end-of-year holidays.
On Penang island, the hotels were fully-booked and people thronged the beaches. Besides Malaysians, holiday-makers came from all over the world to the resort hotels in Ferringhi Beach and Tanjung Bunga. The Dillon family had come all the way from Europe to escape from the coldness of winter. They had arrived the night before but were up early to swim in the sea and eat a late breakfast in the Crystal Restaurant on Fisherman's Pier.

While enjoying their Asian breakfast in a cosy private room facing the water, they saw a strange sight through the glass windows. People were gathering on the beach and pointing at the sea which was receding quickly into the horizon. Some people were excitedly picking up shell and even fish that had been exposed. Then Mr Dillon heard the Japanese man at the table next to theirs shouting `Tsunami! Tsunami!'. The Japanese man and his family jumped from their seats, gesticulating wildly to everyone, and dashed for the exit. Although no one understood Japanese, Mr and Mrs Dillon sensed that their lives were in danger.

All of a sudden a gigantic wall of water came crashing through the restaurant windows, knocking over every person and object. Mr Dillon and his wife grabbed their two children's hands. However, Tom Dillon's little hand slipped from his mother's grip and he was tossed by the waves. By some miracle, somebody saw his head bobbing above the water and snatched him up in time. Just as forcefully, the waves pulled back, tugging along whatever it could. Fortunately, the Dillons and everyone else in the restaurant had escaped onto drier ground. They dashed out to the street, shaken and bruised by he onslaught of the tsunami. The children, overcome by shock at first, burst into tears. Everyone literally trembled with fear.

The survivors tried to go as far inland as they could. They had to trudge in thick mud all the way. Seeking refuge in a hill-top hotel, some even tried to check in there instead of returning to their beachfront accommodations.

The devastating tsunami of 26th December 2004 killed more than 60 people in Malaysia. Its seismic force was most destructive in Aceh in northern Sumatra, the western part of Thailand, parts of Sri Lanka, and India. There were also casualties in Somalia, the Maldives and Myanmar. Altogether, about a quarter of a million people were killed, thousands went missing, and more than half a million lost their homes. Never has a natural disaster traumatized so many nations.
 	
A World-famous Archaeological Site
Describe the Machu Picchu in Peru

 
The Machu Picchu is a breathtaking sight. One has to climb 2,500 meters up the Andes mountains to visit it. Down below are forests and dense bushes that hide it from view.
Nestled between two peaks, the Machu Picchu complex was built between 1460 and 1470 AD. Comprising 200 buildings, mostly residences, temples and storage structures, it was a royal and religious estate serving the first great Incan Emperor Pachacuti. Today these structures remain as solid as when they were first constructed, although smallpox ravaged the Incan communities in the 16th century and by 1527, half of the population had been wiped out. When the Spanish conquerors came in 1532, Machu Picchu was abandoned.

The re-discovery of Machu Picchu revealed many archaeological wonders. The structures were professionally built with granite blocks fitted together perfectly without the use of mortar. What makes it even more amazing is that the interlocking blocks are of different sizes and shapes. Each block is multi-faceted, and some have more than thirty faces! Moreover, the joints are so tight that only razor-thin instruments can fit between the blocks. The ancient builders must have used bronze and stone implements to cut the blocks and sand to smoothen them.

There are other marvelous aspects of Machu Picchu. One is the beautiful harmony between its structures and the rocky landscape. The existing stone formations were used in the construction of towers, walls and columns. Sculptures were carved into the rocks and temples perched precariously on cliff edges. Another impressive aspect is the design of the residential area. Houses surround village squares and are connected by roads and alleyways. Stone cisterns and channels were built for water to flow through. The agricultural system is also astonishingly advanced, utilizing efficient terracing and irrigation methods to plant the main crops, which were potato and maize.

Hiram Bingham, the American historian who rediscovered the Mach Picchu in 1911 mistook it for the lost city of Vilcabamba, the last capital of the Incan Empire. Nevertheless, this archaeological find is considered the most spectacular in the world.
An Eccentric person

Describe an eccentric person you know or have heard about

 
Kevin strikes most adults as eccentric. Their nickname for him is 'Spacey'. They also refer to him as that "weird guy who never grew up". They say his hobbies and `passions' do not last longer than a few months.
His oldest sister Kim and her husband indulge Kevin. Yet they have never said a nice thing about him in front of their children, who adore him. They speak disapprovingly about him to their children, but they have never turned him away. Maybe they feel sorry for him, as he lives alone. He had been married once, for a very short time, and has no children. 'Which woman can put up with him?' is a familiar comment about Kevin from the adults.

Uncle Kevin's visits are always fun and exciting. Once he took an assortment of creatures to Kim's house. The children had been pestering their parents for a pet, a small one, and he knew that their parents had said adamantly, `We don't want to hear anymore of that, do you understand?' And there was Uncle Kevin, with a snake, an iguana, a frog, hermit crabs and different kinds of slugs. The creatures were all housed in plastic and glass containers. Kim screamed and banned them from the house. So the children played with them in their tiny garden. Uncle Kevin taught them a lot of interesting things about those creatures. He also said he was going to open a pet shop selling small animals. Kim predicted that this project would be abandoned as soon as he took up a new hobby.

True enough, he turned up one weekend wearing an apron and a chef's hat. He was loaded down with a paraphernalia of cooking utensils, piles of vegetables, and jars of spices. Announcing that he had taken up cooking and was going to be their `chef' for that weekend, he marched straight to the kitchen. Although Kim shook her head despairingly and said, `Another new hobby?', she did not try to stop him.

The children were breathless with excitement and anticipation. Chasing his sister out of the kitchen but allowing the little ones to be present, he proceeded to wash, chop, slice and heat up several pots and pans. They watched him, fascinated. He clowned around and parodied Bollywood movie scenes while he cooked.

Their favourite part of the cooking sessions was when he made them taste what he was preparing. Some of the stuff tasted strange, but every time someone grimaced, he asked for suggestions on how to improve the dish. At the dinner table, the tastier dishes were quickly eaten up, and the less popular ones were finished by Kevin himself. Nothing was wasted. After each meal, his sister made sure the children helped with the dishes.

He has declared that he wants to start a restaurant. Who knows what will become of that plan, says his brother-in-law. As for the children, they cannot wait for his next visit.
My favorite activity

 
The place where I live is just a stone's throw away from the sea. Ever since Dad took up a job on Penang island ten years ago, we have been living in Dad's ideal house that faces the sea. As he was born and bred in a fishing village, the sea had always been part and parcel of his life. My siblings and I also share the same affinity for the sea.
School, assignments and household chores usually keep us busy during weekdays. However, come weekends, there is nothing more exciting than the sea to lure us to its beaches. My favorite spot is a secluded one not far from my house. Nestled among tall coconut trees, it offers an impressive view of the beach. Here, I will spend hours sunbathing on the dazzling, white sand.

The waves race towards the shore with its frothy white foam. It is a beautiful sigh to behold. I am reminded of the splendor of nature. The lapping of the waves and the sounds they make upon reaching the shore remind me of the swishing of skirts by a row of dancing maidens. It sounds like an orchestra in performance.

I am always in awe of the different sounds made by the tireless wind. Sometimes, it is a gentle breeze that caresses my skin and ruffles my hair. Sometimes, it sounds like a beloved's soft murmur. At other times, however, the wind sounds disgruntled as it shrieks and howls. Then, I can feel its sting as it blows my hair onto my face.

However, I am not alone on the beach. Along the edge of the water, I can see tiny hermit crabs scurrying about aimlessly on the sandy beach. Once in a while, a flock of birds will soar above me, flapping their wings gracefully as if they do not have a care in the world.

I am content to spend hours at length at the beach. However, as the aroma of Mum's cooking wafts in the air, I am suddenly aware of my hunger pangs. I head for home, knowing that the beach will still be there tomorrow.
News headlines about heinous criminal acts against children such as kidnapping, abuse, assault, murder and rape are more than just disturbing. They are shocking. It is right that we condemn these despicable acts. While our hearts go out to the aggrieved parents who may never see their children again, we must realize that we live in a time and age where it is no longer safe for children to roam about freely. Protecting children from harm and violence is not just the duty of parents and the authorities concerned. Society has to play its part as well.

For starters, action needs to begin with parents and the family. Parents must be vigilant and know the whereabouts of their children all the time. They nee to watch out for their children especially when they are outside, be it in the playground or while shopping. Moreover, they need to chaperone their children constantly, even if the distance traveled is short. Leaving a child unsupervised and assuming that a child will ultimately return home safely is unwise. Parents should set boundaries about places that children may go, people they may see and things they may do. Children should also be taught to say 'no' to strangers offering lifts and gifts.

The authorities, including the police, can ensure better protection for children by implementing several measures, for example increasing patrols in high-risk areas such as shopping malls and playgrounds. They can also carryout awareness campaigns on child safety. Installing CCTVs in areas frequented by children ill also go a long way towards ensuring child safety.

Schools should place special emphasis on child safety education. As young children are the most vulnerable, child safety education should start in primary schools so that children can learn how to be safe from strangers. Children should also be taught to trust their instincts and seek help whenever they feel threatened.

It is a harsh but true fact that the world is no longer a safe place for innocent children as sexual predators lurk in every nook and cranny. A safe environment for children to live and grow can only be realized when all parties, including parents, schools, communities and the authorities work together.
City or Countryside

 
Before townships and cities developed, people lived in villages in the countryside. Facilities are, no doubt, better in cities, but city life has become associated with stress, crime and pollution.
Life in the city is very hectic. Traffic congestion is a perpetual problem. At work, fierce competition, deadlines and meetings await the city dweller. Always in a hurry to avoid the rush hour traffic jams, to be time for appointments or to stay one step ahead of other, people in cities have little time to relax. In the countryside, life is much more relaxed, there is little hassle and no point in competing. Villagers go abut their tasks during the day and rest in the evenings.

Living in towns and cities is also becoming dangerous. Houses in cities are fenced in and many house owners also install grilles and alarm systems to safeguard their homes. With the rising crime rate in cities, a woman walking alone at night or displaying jewellery is courting danger. In the countryside, houses may not even be locked or have fences. People there usually know one another and outsides are easily spotted. Any villager who commits a crime will be ostracized or punished, or both. Furthermore, villagers help each other.

At the same time, pollution has become a household word in cities. Exhaust fumes from motor vehicles pollute the air, and there is always the noise of the traffic. Anyone who has lived in one of the crowded housing areas in the city also knows that residents are often involuntary eavesdroppers to a neighbor's family quarrel or are forced to listen to music from somebody else's radio. In the countryside, houses are further apart but there is close rapport between villagers or townspeople as they meet frequently. Furthermore, the countryside is known for its fresh air and quiet surroundings, which is good for one's physical and mental health. The countryside, ahs, unfortunately, a few job opportunities and places for leisure. It also has an inadequate public transportation system.

If I could live in the countryside and yet have the same opportunities as I have in the city, I would definitely prefer the countryside because life there is not as stressful as that in the city and yet is much safe and healthier.
An incident I would like to forget

 
There are many incidents in our lives that make us happy or sad. I was recently the victim of a snatch thief. This is one incident that I cannot forget. It was an incident that changed my life forever.

It was a Saturday morning, like any other weekend and I was on the way to school for extra classes. I had to take the city bus to school. As I walked down the street from my house I noticed that the road was very crowded. Buses, cars, taxis, motorcyclists and pedestrians created a hustle and bustle that would easily unnerve anyone. I kept my cool as I walked down the pedestrian path towards the bus stop. My thoughts were however far away, as I was preoccupied with the mid-term exam that was just around the corner. Suddenly, like a bolt from the blue, a motorcyclist who was just passing beside me, tugged at my bag, which was dangling from my shoulder.

I spun around and reeled from the force of the moving vehicle. I felt a harsh pull. Within a split second I was sprawled on the pavement. I felt numb and everything around me became blur. I heard people shouting, but I was too dazed to talk and too shocked to even get up. I did not remember anything after that. When I regained consciousness. I was in the hospital and my legs and arms were bandaged. Yet I felt no sensation or pain. I was just too weak to even move.

'What happened ?' I kept asking myself. How could this have happened to me, I thought ? My parents, my sister and my brother were there and their grim faces told me that things were not right. The doctor finally broke the sad news to me. I was now paralyzed and would not be able to walk again. I was shocked and did not know what to say. there was a lump in my throat. The tears that rolled down from my eyes slowly wet my pillow.

I am now stronger but must learn to be more confident of myself. I have learnt to pray and hope that I will be able to move around in my wheelchair. It is one incident that has changed my life and I will never be able to forget.
Wetlands

 
Wetlands are areas of marsh or peat land with water that is static or flowing. They are ecosystems whose formation and characteristics are determined by water. The major types of wetlands in Asia are mangroves, freshwater swamp forests, peat swamp forests, lakes and river systems.
Until recently, people thought that wetlands were soggy, useless land that would only be valuable if they were drained and developed fro agriculture, housing or infrastructure projects. Besides the direct physical destruction, wetlands are also threatened by chemical contamination and other pollutants.

Wetlands prevent flooding by holding water like a large sponge. Water moves slowly and this prevents flooding. Wetlands store water during storms when water levels are high. Then, when water levels are low, wetlands release water. Wetland plants have roots planted firmly in the muddy bottom, but with stalks that rise high above the water surface. This can slow down the flow of water. By doing this, they counter the water's erosive forces.

Wetlands clean the water by filtering out the sedimentation. Because of this, wetlands have been referred to as the 'kidneys' of the ecosystem. Even harmful chemicals are converted into useable forms in this cleansing process. Many government are now converting lands into artificial wetlands to filter out pollution.

Wetlands are the habitats for a very large variety of plant and animal life. Wetlands provide the breeding, nesting and feeding grounds for may endangered species. Even animals that live in other habitats use wetlands for migration and reproduction. The plant diversity of wetlands provide a breeding site for crabs, prawns and fish.

The many diverse products of wetlands generate numerous socio-economic benefits that are important for the livelihood of local communities. Among the many products that are obtained from wetlands are water supply for domestic us, fisheries, forage resources, craft materials and medicinal plants.

Wetlands are also treasured for their aesthetic value. They are wonderful places to visit. Their intrinsic natural beauty make them the favorite haunt of tourists, where opportunities for activities like boating, fishing and bird-watching exist.

The many benefits of wetlands is reason enough for conserving them. Reclamation of wetlands for development robs many types of flora and fauna of their habitats and ultimately leads to their extinction. Conservation efforts must therefore be taken before our natural wealth is lost through the selfish pursuits of man.
The Dangers of Smoking

You find that many of your friends have taken up smoking. It is affecting their health. Write an article for your school newsletter on the dangers of smoking.
 
Smoke that kills

A smoker can easily be identified in any group. Not only does he reek of stale smoke, he also has bad breath, much to the dread of non-smokers. However, the effects of smoking are far more insidious than the offensive smell associated with smokers.
Cigarette smoke contains many toxic substances like carbon monoxide, nicotine and carcinogens that not only cause irreparable damage to the smoker, but also to those around him who inhale the smoke.

Carbon monoxide reduces blood capacity to carry oxygen, thus causing fatigue and panting even with the slightest physical exertion. The lack of oxygen in the body acts as a catalyst that accelerates the aging process, causing wrinkles.

Nicotine contained in cigarette smoke reduces the activity of the brain and nervous system. It also raises the risk of high blood pressure. Nicotine causes the contraction of blood vessels and decrease of blood supply. This ultimately leads to heart attacks.

Smokers are at a higher risk of developing certain kinds of cancers because cigarette smoke contains carcinogens. Long-time smokers often develop cancers of the mouth, larynx and lungs.

Smoking not only endangers the smoker himself but also those who inhale secondary smoke -- smoke exhaled y smokers. In view of the many dangers of smoking, more smoking cessation programs should be introduced to smokers.

The benefits of exercise

 
As students, most of us lead sedentary lifestyles. We spend most of our time in claustrophobic classrooms and homes. With loads of homework, assignments and exams, exercise seems to be a monotonous chore. The increasing demands made upon us by our studies, exams and the high expectations of our parents and teachers leave us with little time for pleasure and leisure. The need to exercise becomes a bitter pill to swallow. Nonetheless, health experts prescribe exercise as a prerequisite for  along, healthy life -- a life free from diseases and ailments.

Physical exercise not only stimulates and develops muscles, it has a host of other benefits. Regular exercise can prevent obesity. When we exercise, our bodies burn up all the extra calories which would otherwise be converted into fat and lead to unwanted bulges. Being overweight also carries with it a number of other health problems, so, exercising not only keeps us trim, it also keeps away weight-related problems.

Exercise improves blood circulation which, in turn, provides constant nourishment to the millions of cells in our body. When physical exertion takes place, the rate of breathing increases. Thus, the capacity of blood to carry oxygen is increased. At the same time, it helps the body to get rid of harmful carbon dioxide.

Vigorous exercise also eliminates modern-day stress. The number of people suffering from insomnia is on the rise. The increasing pressure and nagging worries of work and study often keep us awake at night. For many of us, the dawn of a new day brings no cheer. Exercise can be instrumental in helping a person obtain a more relaxed sleep. A tired person will be refreshed and high-spirited after a good night's sleep. A few hours of exercise will help in getting sound sleep and is the perfect, soothing balm for a tired body and a restless mind.

Increasing affluence has caused changes in our eating habits. we indulge in rich food, high in calories and cholesterol. Medical evidence substantiates the fact that exercise can significantly lower the levels of sugar and cholesterol in our bodies. In other words, consistent physical activity can actually provide relief from ailments such as hypertension, diabetes and heart disease.

There are many benefits to be gained from exercise. A person who exercises regularly has good health and more vitality compared to someone who does not exercise.
A happy day at school

 
It was a most trying period. Things at home were getting from bad to worse. Dad's alcoholism had become worse, especially after his retrenchment. Mum was always temperamental as she could not make ends meet with her meager income as a factory operator. I had been an above-average student, but now I was doing poorly in school.

I dreaded coming home after school. Dad would come home late and shout abuse at Mum. When he fell asleep, I would often hear Mum's stifled sobs. I could do nothing to ease the situation at home and this realization caused me a great deal of anguish and frustration.

It was at this point that Mrs Justin entered my life. A soft-spoken woman in her late forties, she was my class teacher. an alert woman, she was quick to notice the change that had come over me. One day, during recess, I was standing alone in one corner of the canteen when Mrs Justin spotted me. She gestured for me to follow her. We headed for the library where she beckoned me to take a seat next to her. I sat with my head bent. 'Helen,' she called. I lifted my head and looked at her. I saw the warmth, the love and the compassion in her lovely eyes. Tears welled up in my eyes and I tried my best to hold them back. However, I could not. They started flowing down my cheeks. She held my hands and waited. when I had finished, she asked me if I wanted to confide in her and tell her my problem. I told her. she listened intently with the patience of a saint. At the end of my story, she gave me a lesson on life and its ups and downs. As I heard her talk, my admiration for this woman grew. My perception changed. before this meeting, I had felt I was a nonentity. However, as the meeting progressed, If felt different. I knew Mrs Justin cared for me.

In the days that followed, Mrs Justin made it a point to discuss my work at school with me. For the first time in that year, I felt I was worthy of being loved. Things at home remained quite the same but there was a profound change in me. The end-of-year examination approached. Two weeks after the exam. Mrs Justin announced to the class that I was the top student in the class. As I looked at her, I felt a sudden surge of happiness. It was one of the happiest days I had in school for a very long time.
A visit to the dentist

 
It was the festive season. Mum had baked some delicious cookies. Jam tarts were always my favorite and I had indulged myself. Moreover, the refrigerator was well-stocked with chocolates and ice-cream so I helped myself to all the goodies. That night, I woke up with an excruciating toothache. No amount of aspirin could stop the pain.
When morning arrived, I had to do the inevitable -- make an appointment with the dentist. My dental appointment was at 2 p.m. that afternoon, which was just another four hours away. The thought was enough to kill my interest in everything else. I had butterflies in my stomach. I arrived at the dental clinic an hour before the appointment. After registering, I walked unenthusiastically towards a chair. I did not even bother to look at the other patients. Picking up a few magazines, I tried to read, but I could not concentrate. All I was aware of was the terrible pain. The sight of patients coming out from the treatment room, with large pieces of gauze sticking out from their mouths, only seemed to worsen my pain. One o my New Year resolutions was made while I was fidgeting in my seat. I vowed never to taste another jam tart or take a chunky bite of chocolate in future.

When my name was finally called, I staggered into the treatment room. I heard the dentist greeting me, but I could not bring myself to respond to his greeting. The sight of the drilling equipment and the hypodermic syringes only increased my feelings of nausea. When the dentist summoned me to take my seat and asked me to open my mouth, I felt my heart pounding very fast. I was sure that I was going to get a heart attack. The dentist probed the offending tooth with various instruments. He informed me that it was best to extract the tooth. I nodded and closed my eyes and tried to think of other thing. the next minute or so was one of the most terrifying moments of my life. I grabbed the dentist's hands more than once. At first he was quite taken aback and eyed me suspiciously. Then he warned me that I would have my hands tied if I were to repeat my antics. I did not think that he was joking !

Soon the pain gave way to a soothing sensation. When the dentist told me that it was all over, I could hardly believe my ears. After paying for the extraction, I walked out of the clinic confidently and headed for the nearest bus stop. I swore that this would be the first and the last time I stepped into a dental clinic.
Obesity - a growing problem

 
The accelerating rate of obesity among Asians, especially children, is indeed alarming. If left unchecked, it will soon become the major cause of preventable death. Once obesity develops in childhood or adolescence, there is an increased chance that it will persist into adult life, and that is why it is important for overweight people to lose weight.
The phenomenal increase in the levels of obesity among children can be attributed to unhealthy eating habits. The food we eat is extremely high in calories and fat, and more often than not, children tend to prefer processed foods over fresh foods. Moreover, more and more people tend to eat out at restaurants and fast food outlets nowadays. Fast food contains more calories and a single meal at a fast food outlet provides a person with the total number of calories he needs of an entire day. There are numerous vending machines in many schools selling carbonated drinks, while school canteens offer students unhealthy food choices.

Today, as a result of technological advancements and conveniences, we tend to be inactive and lead sedentary lifestyles. Children spend hours in front of televisions and play computer games. Many children are not active enough to use up the energy provided by the food they consume. The many conveniences which are available such as elevators, cars and the Internet reduce the level of physical activity. The lack of physical activity means fewer calories are being burned, leading to weight gain and obesity. The lack of physical education classes in schools for children further compounds the problem.

Obesity has many attendant risks and effects. If you think that the bulging mass of fat under your arms or in your belly, thighs and other parts of your anatomy is the only effect of obesity, then you are sadly mistaken. Obesity is not merely a cosmetic problem that denies you the pleasure of looking smart and fit. It is a health hazard that puts you at risk of developing various life-threatening diseases. Many serious medical condition have been linked with obesity, including heart disease, high blood pressure, diabetes, cancer and stroke. Obese people are also likely to feel depressed as they often become objects of ridicule.

The best way to avoid obesity and its effects is to maintain a healthy weight through healthy eating habits and regular exercise. Children should avoid eating fast food and junk food. They should also exercise regularly and be active throughout the day. At the same time, they should avoid watching too much television or using the computer for hours at a stretch.

Children must realize that if they take in more calories than they burn, they will gain weight. On the other hand, if they burn more calories than they ingest, they will lose weight.
Laughter is the best medicine

 
'Laughter is the best medicine'. No one can attest to the fact better than my grandfather. At the ripe old age of 92, Grandpa is a picture of health. Even though Grandpa's life was often filled with misfortune, he never lost his zest for life.

Having lost both his parents at the tender age of five, Grandpa was brought up in an orphanage. Despite this, Grandpa was always in high spirits. He started working at the young age of 16. He started work as a laborer and later, a gardener. His honesty and diligence got the attention of his employer who soon asked him to take care of his large orchard. Grandpa saved whatever little he could. Then, when he had accumulated enough money, he bought a piece of land and planted rubber trees.

When rubber prices dropped during the economic slump, he was force to sell his land. He became an odd-job laborer. He took up one job after another. Little wonder then that he became a jack-of-all-trades. Realizing that a rolling stone gathers no moss, he sought greener pastures.

He moved to LA and worked as a restaurant helper. Today, he is the owner of the very restaurant he worked for.

Grandpa has a fine sense of humor. He is always the first one to break the ice on any occasion. His witty remarks and jokes would have everyone in stitches. Anyone else in Grandpa's shoes would have many reasons to moan and groan about how unfair life has been. Even when fate dealt heavy blows, Grandpa was one who never gave up. 'Give life everything you have got and life will give its bet back to you,' he would always say.

Apart from the occasional bouts of flu and fever, grandpa never suffered from any major ailment. Laughter, he would attest, is the elixir of life. Whenever I got to him with a problem, he would just laugh. his laughter is so infectious that I would soon join in. If anyone were to ask him why he laughs so much, his answer must surely be, 'Why ? Because laughter is the best medicine !
Write a story ending with 'I was glad the day had come to an end.'

 
The landslide occurred at 6 a.m. just as we were getting ready for school. We heard a loud rumbling sound coming from the direction of the hill slopes. Although we rushed to the balcony of our apartment on the tenth floor, we could not see anything. The whole area was enveloped in bleak darkness. I knew that the heavy rain during the past week must have taken its toll on the hill slopes. I pushed the thought to the back of my mind and went about having my breakfast.
By the time we got ready for school, Dad called out to us. We rushed to the balcony where Dad was standing. The sun was already up and in the dazzling brightness, we could see boulders the size of bulldozers resting at the foot of the slopes. A neighbor informed us that a major landslide had occurred. We rushed to the basement. We saw that rescue workers were already there and were removing buried vehicles from the rubble. The landslide had also cut off the only road to town.

Office workers and school children were left stranded. We were not allowed to go anywhere near the area where the rescue work was in progress. We could not do anything but stand and watch helplessly. There was also a power failure which meant that we had to suffer the heat and on top of it, could not watch television.

During the initial stages, we were told that the residents from the two apartment blocks may have to be evacuated. This caused residents a great deal of anxiety. Later, when the police, firemen and various authorities met, they decided against the evacuation. Everyone was relieved.

We spent the whole day just watching the rescue workers at work. We prayed silently that the whole episode would soon be over. We were told to go back to our apartments and remain there until further notice. Later that night, we were told that the access road had been cleared and that there were no casualties or massive damage to property. We all heaved sighs of relief when we heard this. Mum led us in saying a thanksgiving prayer. We had a lot to be thankful for. As I got ready to go to bed that night, I recollected the events that occurred that day. I was glad the day had come to an end.
Write a story ending with 'I promised my parents that I would turn over a new leaf.'

 
I could feel the excitement rising in me as I held the beautifully wrapped present in my hands. I fumbled with the string and then, unable to contain my curiosity nay longer, I ripped it open. It was a sleek, brand new laptop. I had scored straight As for my O level examination and this was my reward. I had always envied my friends who were exchanging news about 'chat rooms', 'instant messaging' and e-mailing', all of which I knew nothing about. Now I was going to find out.
It started out simply enough. I was searching for some information online when I stumbled upon a social networking site. Soon I became glued to my new-found electronic friend. I began to spend more and more time on YouTube and became enslaved by Facebook and Twitter. I had never imagined that the day would come when I would be transfixed by the glowing screen before me. Whenever I was not glued to these social networking sites, I would be going through gossip or fashion websites.

As time passed, I realized that I was hooked on the Internet. During weekends, when I had more time on my hands, I could easily spend a few hours on my laptop. It came to a point where I chose to lock myself in my room, refusing to come out and take part in family discussions. I preferred to stay connected to the people I befriended in cyberspace although I had never met them. Soon I was spending the wee hours of the morning glued to the Internet. sleep was relegated to scattered naps and my grades at school also began deteriorating.

It was about this time that my parents started voicing their disapproval. It became obvious to them that I was spending too much time on the Internet. I was asked to tone down my usage of the Internet. Yet, however hard I tried. I was unable to pull myself away, unable to terminate my chat sessions and unable to concentrate on my lessons. I was desperate for just another click, just another look at my e-mail or message board. Then one day, my father took away my laptop. I sputtered and fumed but to no avail. Dad had made up his mind. Over time, I realized that Dad and Mum had always wanted the best for me. that was when I decided to take the big step -- to conquer my internet addiction. Quitting was harder than I expected. But with dogged determination I knew that I would be able to do it. I promised my parents that I would turn over a new leaf.
Preventing truancy

 
Truancy tops the list of misdemeanors by our students. Almost every day, students are caught playing truant. Although it is not a serious problem, it must be nipped in the bud.
Truancy means being absent from school without a valid reason. Students play truant for  number of reasons. Most of them play truant because of negative peer influence. they follow their friends who skip school. Financial problems can also cause a student  to stay away from school. This explains why students who play truant are mainly from the lower income groups. Learning problems is another cause of truancy. Students who find academic subjects difficult or boring would prefer to play truant. Some students who are addicted to drugs or alcohol will frequently be absent. The fear of bullying or harassment may also cause timid students to play truant.

If left unchecked, truancy can lead to juvenile delinquency and numerous other negative outcomes. Youths who play truant have an increased risk of dropping out of school. School dropouts are more likely to be unemployed as prospective employers are concerned about attendance of their potential employees. Regular school attendance is also important for academic success. If a student often plays truant, he may fail in his examinations. Students who play truant also have low self-esteem and become social misfits.

To curb truancy, initiatives must be taken. Prevention is the key. Early intervention can tackle the problem. Students who often skip classes should be given counseling. Parents should check with teachers and school authorities periodically to monitor students' attendance. Police patrols will also deter repeat offenders.
Advertisements

 
The mass media is flooded with advertisements of every kind. One only has to flip through the pages of magazines or newspapers or sit through a television program to see the wide coverage that advertisements receive in terms of space and time. Companies fork out large amounts of money just to advertise their products or services.
What, the, are the benefits of advertisements ? Advertisements offer a wide variety of options to both potential buyers and sellers. Through advertisements, employers can recruit workers. People who wish to put up their properties for sale can find buyers or vice versa.

Although there are grouses about advertisements, the numerous benefits of advertisements remain undisputed. Advertisements are the lifeblood of many television and radio stations. Many companies build a reputation for their products through advertisements. Sometimes companies sponsor major sporting events and help in the development of sports in the country.

Advertisements inform the public about the wide array of products that are available in the market an dhow much they cost. Customers can compare the prices and merits of the different products and then decide which product to buy. Advertisements help increase the sales volume of products. In this way, companies expand their business and enjoy economies of scale.

As with most things in life, advertisements can be both a bane or a boon. Nevertheless, in my opinion, the advantages of advertisements far outweigh the disadvantages and it is up to the discerning public to discard the advertisements which do not profess the truth.
Keeping fit

 
A recent health survey indicates that lifestyle diseases such as diabetes, heart attacks, strokes and certain types of cancers are on the rise. Bulging waistlines, obesity and clogged arteries are becoming more common as the Chinese continue with their unhealthy lifestyles. Our preoccupation with tasty but unhealthy meals as well as our increasingly inactive or sedentary lifestyles have taken a toll on our health. The government's call for the Chinese to live healthy lifestyles have fallen on deaf ears. As a result, we have a growing generation of couch potatoes.
The Chinese have to give top priority to ways of keeping fit if they wish to live a disease-free life. Keeping fit requires sacrifice, determination and discipline.

Our exotic cuisines are enough to whet anyone's appetite. Our choice of food almost always includes food that appeal to the taste buds regardless of whether they have nutritional value or otherwise. As a result, we gorge ourselves on food that has a high oil content such as fried chicken and french fries. To make matters worse, many of us have a sweet tooth. When calorie intake exceeds output, the inevitable is bound to occur -- obesity and an inactive lifestyle.

What we need to do is shed all the extra weight by reducing our calorie intake and by exercising. Choosing nutritious food that is relatively low in calories is a move in the right direction. If we need to go on a diet o weight reduction program, then it is best we consult a qualified nutritionist or dietician.

When buying food, choose products with healthier ingredients. When you eat out, choose dishes that have less fat or oil content.

Exercise is an integral part of keeping fit. Regular exercise not only helps to manage weight, but also increases fitness levels. A person need not have vigorous workouts in the gym to keep himself fit. Brisk walking or even walking up the stairs instead of using the life are good forms of exercise. Health experts recommend that an individual exercise at least three times a week with each session lasting for about 20 to 30 minutes.

Keeping fit also requires changes in other aspects of our lifestyles. Smoking and drinking alcohol can wreak havoc on our health. Smoking increases the risks of developing certain types of cancers while heavy drinking can lead to liver damage. A chain-smoker and a heavy drinker cannot hope to live a long, disease-free life. Habitual smokers and drinkers not only have to fork out large amounts of money for cigarettes and alcohol, but also for higher medical bills.

Life is a precious gift from God. It is the duty of every individual to value this gift. Keeping fit is therefore our responsibility. Shirking from our responsibility indicates either ignorance of indifference. We have to get our priorities right before we become victims of our own careless habits.
Crime does not pay

 
As the only child in the family, Billy was the apple of his parents' eyes. Born with a silver spoon in his mouth, Billy could have anything he wanted. His father was a successful entrepreneur while his mother was a consultant. Their busy careers left them with little time to spend at home. As a result, Billy was lonely and bored.
Billy craved attention. He mixed with the wrong group of friends and started playing truant. Soon, he started taking drugs. When his parents came to know about Billy's behavior, they tried to make Billy turn over a new leaf. However, their efforts proved futile.

Soon, Billy was on the wrong side of the law. He was hauled up by the police at a nightclub. Billy was caught for being an underage nightclub patron and also for taking drugs. Billy's devastated parents took him to a doctor. On the doctor's advice, he was enrolled for counseling sessions. All their attempts to reform Billy were to no avail.

Billy ran away from home at the age of 17. To support his expensive drug habit, he became a drug pusher. Soon, Billy became a hardcore addict. His impoverished appearance and dirty attire became telltale signs that gave him away. His heavy dependence on drugs took a toll on his health.

One day, Billy became very ill and had to be rushed to hospital. After several tests, he was diagnosed with AIDS. Billy knew that his days were numbered. On the spur of the moment, he wanted to go home and apologize to his parents. He knew it would break their hearts to see him in the condition he was in. However, he could not find the willpower to break away from his life of crime despite his parents' pain.

As his dependence on drugs grew, he fell deeper into crime. Robbery, housebreaking and extortion were added to his list of crimes. High on the wanted list, Billy began a hide-and-seek game with the authorities.

One day, Billy was waiting for a potential client. He was in possession of dangerous drugs. Acting on a tip-off, a police team arrived and arrested Billy. The High court imposed the capital punishment. Before he was sent to the gallows, Billy met his parents. As he said his final farewell, his last words to them were 'crime does not pay'.
 	
A narrow escape

 
There was a huge three-acre pond just a few kilometers from where we stayed. Since moving into our new home in the countryside, my brother, Jim and I used to often sneak out to the pond where we would meet another friend. Dad had warned us not to venture anywhere near the pond area, especially after a friend informed him that an alligator had been spotted there. We took no heed of his advice though. This was our favorite hideout and we were certainly not going to give it up.

On this particular afternoon, the three of us had just finished swimming. Jim and Syed were reluctantly making their way towards the spot where they had left their clothes. I stayed back and was bathing in the waist-deep water when I suddenly became aware of ripples forming in the surface of the water. I cocked my head and looked at the ripples. My eyes caught a motion in the water. A log, I thought. Then I saw it -- its snout and its two reptilian eyes. 'Jim ..." I whimpered. Then I screamed with all my might.

Jim turned his head in my direction and immediately recognized the danger. 'Get out of the water, Jeff. Hurry ! It's just behind you.'

I waded clumsily in the water. After a few stumbles and fumbles, I reached the edge of the pond. I looked over my shoulder. Moving swiftly towards me was an enormous alligator. I froze. Then suddenly I felt a searing pain in my leg. Meanwhile, Jim and Syed screamed and started throwing stones at the alligator and managed to distract it. The alligator went for them now. As it opened its jaws, I could see its jagged teeth. I tried to move but a stabbing pain shot through me. I slumped onto the ground, sprawled in a pool of blood.

Meanwhile our screams were heard by two hunters who were in the vicinity. On seeing the alligator, one of them fired a shot in the air. It had the desired effect. The alligator stopped in his tracks, retreated a few steps and slithered hurriedly into the water. Then, I passed out.

When I regained consciousness, I found myself in a totally unfamiliar environment. The smell of antiseptic told me that I was in the hospital. I later learnt from my mother that I was rushed to the casualty ward. I was treated for puncture wounds on my right ankle and a long gash which required fifty-six stitches. Mum reminded me how fortunate I was to have escaped from the jaws of the alligator. It was a narrow escape.
Natural disasters

 
Natural disasters are natural events that cause the loss of lives and property. Sometimes hundreds and thousands are killed, and millions of dollars of property are destroyed. What are these events and what causes them ?
The earth is a dynamic entity that is undergoing changes all the time. Normal changes such as those occurring to the weather and the seasons are part and parcel of living. We live our lives according to these changes regardless of whether we like it or not. However, sometimes the forces of nature cause great and drastic changes, and for us puny human beings, the effect can be disastrous.

There are many types of natural events that can spell disaster for us. They include earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, tornadoes, hurricanes, floods, droughts, tidal waves, tsunamis, fires, landslides, and avalanches.

The earth crust is made up of a number of plates that sit on a sea of lava beneath. At some places on the crust, lava, ash, smoke etc breaks through and the result is volcanic eruptions. Sometimes the eruption is so violent that it destroys living things that are near it. The eruption of Vesuvius in 79 AD destroyed the towns of Pompeii and Herculaneum. In 1883, the catastrophic explosion of Krakatoa off the west coast of Java generated tsunamis that killed hundreds of thousands of people in Indonesia. In 2004, underwater volcanic eruptions in the Indian Ocean caused tsunamis that again killed hundreds of thousands living nearby.

The plates of the earth crust are not static. They push and grind against one another producing earthquakes that sometimes cause widespread destruction to the affected area.

In addition to volcanic eruptions and earthquakes, other natural phenomena also brings destruction. In Malaysia, the Northeast monsoon rains that come around December bring floods to the east coast of the peninsula. In Australia, bushfires in summer destroy vast tracts of land. Snowstorms in the polar regions of the earth cut the residents from the rest of the world. Droughts in parts of India and Africa cause famine and tragedy.

No place on earth is totally free from disaster-causing events. We can only do our best to deal with these events when they occur. People and property are inevitably destroyed. Those who survive pick up the pieces and continue living.
 	
Describe a situation in which you did not know what to do

 
I entered the restaurant, ordered some noodles from one of the vendors there and sat down at a table near the vendor. The restaurant was about half full.

Directly in my line of view were several other customers, but I noticed one man in particular who was sitting with his back to me. He was seated in an awkward position, hands on the table but with the top half of his body slowly but surely leaning more and more to one side, as if he was about to fall off the chair. Just as I thought he would surely fall off, his body pulled itself upright. Wow, he must either be very sleepy or very drunk. Judging the beer bottles in front of him, it must be the latter.

My food came and I started eating, but I could not help but notice that the man in front was again leaning more and more to one side. And once again he pulled himself upright at the last moment.

I took my eyes off him and concentrated on eating my food. Suddenly my attention was broken when I heard a loud crash like something falling onto the floor. I looked up and saw the man lying in a heap on the floor. This time he had actually fallen off his chair. Miraculously the beer bottles were still on the table.

My first reaction was to go and help him up but I noticed that no one in the restaurant had moved. In fact they were behaving as though it was small matter. Most of them took one look and continued their meal. Strange, I thought. This made me hesitate. I did not know what to do.

For a minute I just sat there looking at the prostrate figure wondering if he was still alive or merely sleeping, should I help or should I do something. Not knowing what to do is a terrible feeling. Finally, the restaurant owner appeared and muttered in Chinese, "This useless fellow." He then got hold the man's hands and dragged him out of the restaurant onto the five-foot way and out of sight of the customers.

After finishing my meal, I stepped out of the restaurant. I saw the drunk lying next to a pillar, sleeping and oblivious to everything around him. What a pathetic sight.
A gift I treasure

 
It was just a week before my seventeenth birthday. Party preparations had started. My family never celebrated birthdays on a grand scale. However, this was a double celebration. I had passed my A level examination with flying colors and my parents thought this was an occasion to celebrate.

The whole house was a hive of activity. Spring-cleaning started a week before. There was a continuous hustle and bustle as everyone went about doing their share of the work. Mama, who was the chief event organizer, was busy planning the budget and the menu. Papa was in charge of paying for the different purchases. My siblings were busy sending out the invitations. Even Grandpa, who enjoys watching his favorite Cable TV from the comfort of his armchair, did not want to be left out. He made numerous trips to town to run errands for Mama.

Grandpa and I shared a special bond. Perhaps it was because I was his oldest grandchild. He was always there for me and he would offer me his shoulder to cry on whenever I was depressed.

Two days before my birthday, Grandpa complained of chest pains. We rushed him to the hospital but he refused to be admitted. He was given a lot of medicine instead. When he came home, he remained in his room. Whenever I went into his room, he managed a smile. I could see that he was very tired. the corners of his mouth and eyes had numerous wrinkles while the skin on his skinny limbs had shriveled. I felt a stab o pain in my heart each time I saw him.

It was during the early hours of my birthday when I was awakened by my mother's loud sobbing. I knew something was wrong. I rushed to Grandpa's room only to see him lying motionless. Grandpa had died in his sleep. the realization hit me like a bolt of lightning. Beside him, there was a parcel with a birthday card stuck to it.

I only opened the present two days after Grandpa's funeral. It was a laptop. Grandpa had withdrawn all his savings to buy the laptop for me. It is the gift I treasure most in my life. Whenever I sue it, I will always think of grandpa.
The destruction of the rainforest

 
Rainforests make up some of the most valuable resources we have, yet they are being destroyed in massive proportions. Many medicines, foods, natural insecticides and oil producing trees are found in the rainforest.
The rainforest also holds endless possibilities for useful, undiscovered resources. These could include cures for disease and new food crops that will be wiped out before they are found because of the destruction of the rainforests.

The rainforest is also home to millions of species of animals, plants and insects as well. It is estimated that five out of six rainforest species have never been seen. This adds up to millions of organisms that have never before been encountered. This demonstrates that more species live in the rainforest than any other ecosystem on earth, and we are obliterating their on habitat.

The rainforest is also a big producer of the world's oxygen supply. When we destroy the rainforest, we are destroying our own oxygen supply. Massive destruction of our precious rainforests is caused by logging, colonization due to overpopulation, and cattle ranching.

The first major cause of mass destruction of the rainforest is logging. There can be as many as 200 different species of trees on one acre of land.

This high number of different species of trees means there is only a few commercially valuable trees per acre. Trees considered commercially valuable are mahogany and tropical cedar. These trees and used for panelling, and building boats an furniture.

Loggers must bulldoze roads through the forest to find enough of these valuable trees to make a profit. This consumes many other trees that are in the way of the road. The trees in the rainforest are connected a the top with vines, so when one commercially valuable tree gets cut down, on average 17 other non-commercially valuable trees fall down with t. Because of these practices, the logging industry can eradicate 30 percent of a rainforest where only a few commercially valuable trees were cut down. At this rat, they will be able to clear out whole rainforest sin a few years. After the loges themselves destroy so much rainforest, the roads they leave behind induce the next phase of rainforest destruction: colonization.

Another major cause of mass rainforest destruction is colonization. Roads left behind by loggers make the rainforest accessible to farmers looking for a place to live and grow crops. Farm families clear and burn the remains of the forest to plant crops to keep and sell. These families clear more land than they need to show others that they own it and have "developed" it. These colonists are forced to move to the rainforest because there is no room anywhere else for them to live.

Most of the land is owned by large corporations, so families feel lucky if they are fortunate enough to have their own land in the rainforest. Population growth forces the people to move to the rainforest. Even if farm families can get their own plot of rainforest land, it is not long before they have to move again and clear out more rainforest. Rainforest land loses nutrients quickly after it has been cleared, and it soon becomes eroded and infertile. Since crops won't grow after this happens, farm families willingly sell the bad land to commercial companies. These companies then use the acquired land to form large produce export plantations or cattle ranching: the most destructive form of land use.

The final major cause of mass rainforest destruction is cattle ranching. Cattle ranching in the rainforest yields very low amounts of beef, but it is replacing farming that was more productive.

Cattle ranching yields 91 pounds of beef per acre per year, where as corn yields 5,000 pounds per acre per year. This is a very inefficient use of the land, and is also bad for the economy. After five to ten years of mediocre beef yields; erosion, weeds and loss of fertility force the ranchers to look for more land. The ranchers keep moving farther into the rainforest and clearing more land in a big cycle. Also, raising cattle requires less labor, so there are fewer jobs. The people without jobs are just more people who wan to move to the rainforest. The land just keeps getting cleared and burned until there is no rainforest left.

The rainforest gives us so much, and has so many possibilities, yet we are clearing and burning it down. Animals, plants and insects are being eradicated at the rate of 1,000 species per year. If the rainforest keeps being destroyed at the current rate, it is 10,000 species will be wiped out per year. If we want to save the earth, we must start with the rainforests. They are the connection between man and nature, and if the human race wants to save the planet, the first step is saving the rainforest. The rainforests are the most valuable resources we have.
A flash flood

Describe how bad weather conditions affected the people living in your area.
 
It was the worst rainy weather I had seen. The skies remained overcast as sheets of rain poured down without stopping. In the evenings, the rain was usually accompanied by blinding flashes of lightning and deafening peals of thunder. Most of the residents in my area remained confined indoors. Apart from people scurrying to and from work and school, there was little outdoor activity.
The town where I live, Kuantan, faces the Pahang River. After three days of incessant rain, the swollen river burst its banks and unleashed its fury on the residents. Many of the residents ere caught off-guard. As the floodwaters rose, many of the residents were forced to flee their homes.

Although our area was a flood-prone area, many were caught by surprise as this was not the monsoon season. Every year, the north-east monsoon would bring heavy rains to the east coast at the end of each year. However, the sudden floods in the middle of the year caused jitters among the residents.

Houses were inundated. The heavy downpour also triggered landslides, causing further damage to houses. The heavy rain caused traffic woes as many vehicles were stalled. Some motorists were seen pushing their stalled vehicles while others were stranded.

When the rain did not abate after two consecutive days, people began to be evacuated to higher ground. Many took shelter in a secondary school nearby which was turned into a temporary relief center. Most of the residents did not have time to salvage their belongings. Several residents from nearby villages were marooned in the area after road links were cut off by the floodwaters.

Various authorities were deployed to help evacuate and supply food to the flood victims. Strong winds aggravated the situation as several trees were uprooted. Roofs of houses were ripped off and went hurtling away n the fierce winds.

After a week of continuous downpour, the rain finally showed signs of abating. The overcast skies finally cleared. The faint glow of the sun's rays brought cheer and relief to the people affected by the floods. People started to return to their homes. After a week of uncertainty and chaos, life returned to normal.
Bullying

As the Head Prefect of your school, you are asked to write an article on bullying.
 
Statistics provided by the school's Disciplinary Board show that cases of bullying are on the rise. There were only 12 cases of bullying in 2010. The number increased to 18 cases in 2009, 20 cases in 2011 and 25 cases this year. This is an unhealthy trend and if left unchecked, it can become a problem.
Verbal bullying, which includes name-calling and insulting remarks, accounted for 45 per cent of bullying cases. This was followed by indirect bullying, which includes spreading nasty and malicious stories. It accounted for 35 per cent of all bullying cases. Physical bullying accounted for one-fifth of the cases.

Bullying occurs for a number of reasons. Often, bullying behavior develops in response to the environment, whether it is at home, school or within a peer group. Bullies usually come from homes where physical punishment i used. In such a scenario, physical punishment is seen as a way to handle problems. The child then resorts to aggressive behavior. Negative peer influence can further aggravate the problem. With the absence of a proper role model both at home and in school, children have no opportunity to learn behavior skills. As a result, bullies tend to derive satisfaction from inflicting injury or suffering to others without feeling empathy for their victims.

Close monitoring by parents and school authorities can curb bullying. Parents must monitor their children's activities. Those who are at the receiving end and bystanders must report all incidents of bullying. The school must enlist the help of parents when dealing with such cases. Schools must have clear rules against bullying. Repeat offenders must face the music. If the offender does not turn over a new leaf, he should be suspended or expelled from school. The use of deterrents sends a clear and strong message to perpetrators that bullying is unacceptable.
Waste management is our responsibility

Write an article for your school newsletter on the various waste disposal methods and their pros and cons.
 
Hong Kongers generate about 15,000 tons of waste daily. If this mountain of waste is disposed of properly, then we have little to worry about. Unfortunately, that is not the case. Litter is strewn all over the country -- in car parks, empty lots, back lanes, drains, rivers -- practically everywhere. the sights are all so familiar, the stench is overpowering, yet we display our indifference. The crux of the problem is attitude.

In response to this, the government has begun a recycling campaign as a long-term measure to ensure the efficient management of waste. Recycling involves the separating of rubbish -- metal, glass, plastic and paper. the waste is then taken to collection centers which turn the waste materials into reusable products. Recycling is an efficient method of reducing waste without polluting the environment. It also cuts down the use of raw materials and energy required to produce new products.

Other waste disposal methods come with attendant risks to health and the environment. One of the most common methods of waste disposal is landfills where waste is dumped and left to decompose. While landfills are convenient and cheap, they release toxic gases. Landfill gas can kill vegetation. Methane, a greenhouse gas, is released when landfill waste decomposes and this also contributes to global warming. Besides, decaying waste also attracts pests such as rats and carrion-eating birds.

Waste materials can be burned in incinerators. When waste in burned, carbon dioxide and other hazardous air pollutants are released into the atmosphere. Thus, although this method is a convenient and quick way of getting rid of waste, it has its disadvantages as well.

Now that we all realize the environmental degradation that ensues from the country's waste, let us be more responsible citizens. The more waste we generate, the more we have to dispose of and the more waste we dispose of, the more money we will have to pay. We have no choice but to heed the government's call to reduce, reuse and recycle.
Social ills among teenagers

Make a speech in the topic of the contest 'Social ills among teenagers'.
 
Good evening, honorable judges, teachers and friends.

I am glad to have been given this opportunity to talk to you today. The title of my speech is 'Social ills among teenagers'. A lot has been said about the deviant behavior of teenagers. Our education system, the media, teenagers themselves and their parents have been blamed. here is no need to point an accusing finger at any particular group, but keeping mum over the issue is tantamount to condoning it. Our youths are our most valuable assets. They are the future leaders of the nation. The harm has already been done and it is now up to us to undo it.

One of the main reasons why our youths go astray may be the lack of parental supervision. Nowadays, both parents go out to work. Children are left in the care of foreign maids and child-minders. As a result, they are faced with the threat of the disintegration of the family values and thus, the rising trend in social ills and crimes among teenagers. Parents should closely monitor the activities of their children and be understanding.

When parents are often too busy pursuing their own careers to spare some thought for the welfare of their children, children grow up with little religious or moral guidance. When they do not get love and attention at home, they seek attention from others who may or may not come from similar backgrounds. Thus, the social ills affecting our youth may be a reflection of a much larger problem, such as the disintegration of the family unit.

Ladies and gentlemen, the media may also play a part in the moral degradation among teenagers. Television programs which show violence and sex and glorify other negative aspects should be restricted. There should also be stricter enforcement of the ban on pornographic material.

Teenagers with little or nothing to do during their spare time usually take to the streets. Therefore, recreational facilities such as those found in sports complexes should be available to all youths. at present, existing recreational facilities seem to either be exclusively for the rich or for older people. the establishment of teen clubs and community centers, that do not charge high fees and that specially target teenagers, should be given top priority.

In conclusion, ladies and gentlemen, everyone, including religious, educational and social institutions, as well as individuals and the media, must cooperate with the authorities to combat the social ills afflicting our teenagers. It is important that people, especially youths, do not get into the rut of moral decay. There should be a thorough study of the problem before a proper strategy can be mapped out to channel our youths towards healthier lifestyles.

Thank you for your kind attention and have a nice day.
An environmental problem

Write an article about an environmental problem in your country.
 
Acid rain occurs when harmful gases such as carbon dioxide, sulphur dioxide and nitrogen oxide react with rain. This type of rain damages trees, crops and buildings. Industries and power stations release a lot of sulphur dioxide and nitrogen oxide. Exhaust fumes and open-air burning release carbon dioxide into the atmosphere. When these gases enter the atmosphere, they mix with rain water to form acids like carbonic acid, sulphuric acid and nitric acid. They then form acid rain.

Acid rain occurs as a result of pollution. Acid rain is thus common in large towns like Bangalore, New Delhi, Mumbai. This is attributed to rapid industrialization and urbanization in these areas. However, acid rain is by no means confined to these areas as it may be carried by wind to other areas.

Acid rain has many adverse effects. Lakes and rivers cannot sustain aquatic life if acid rain flows into the water. It will also lead to a reduction in crop yields. There will also be irreparable damage to forests and wildlife. Being corrosive, it can cause extensive damage to buildings. An example of an important building that has been corroded by acid rain is the Taj Mahal of India. Acid rain cal also affect human beings. Skin problems such as rashes and itchiness, hair loss and respiratory problems have been linked to acid rain. Heart and lung problems can also be aggravated by it.

Acid rain affects the biodiversity of the ecosystems. As lakes, streams and other freshwater bodies become more acidic, the number and types of fish and other aquatic plants and animals that live in these waters decrease.

Acid rain causes poisonous metals to seep into underground drinking water sources, thereby making it unfit for human consumption.

When acid rain falls in forest areas, it releases toxic metals such as lead and zinc which cause the stunted growth of trees and plants. In this way, acid rain brings about slower growth and the ultimate death of forests.

Scientists agree that the burning of fossil fuels such as oil and natural gas is a major cause of acid rain. Thus, industries which use fossil fuels such as the automobile, paper and chemical industries should reduce emissions of harmful gases, which will in turn reduce the acidity of rain.
Preventing burglary at home

Write a speech on the topic: preventing burglary at home.
 
Good morning, ladies and gentlemen. Until recently, our residential area had been one of the few residential areas in the country to enjoy a zero-crime rate. However, a spate of break-ins and snatch thefts has occurred in our area in the past three months. If we are not vigilant, there could be an upsurge in such incidents.
In my speech today, I would like to outline several measures that can be taken to reduce the number of break-ins in our area.

Break-ins often occur when the occupants of a house are not at home. They can also occur due to the carelessness of house-owners. So the first thing to do is to fix grilles and to get reliable deadbolt locks. In some isolated cases, there have been reports about burglars prising grilles open. Installing a burglar alarm reduces the risk of forced entry.

The next precaution that should be taken is to avoid providing any telltale signs of your absence. Should you and your family go on holiday or outstation, inform your immediate neighbors. Ask one of your neighbors to collect your newspapers and mail. Uncollected mail and newspapers gives the impression that the house occupants are away. it is always better to inform the police when you are going outstation. The police will then be on the lookout and send police cars to patrol your neighborhood.

Make sure the areas outside your house, especially the porch and the backyard, are well lit. A brightly-lit area deters a burglar from breaking into the house.

Once inside your house, make sure the doors and windows are properly shut. Install peepholes with magnifying lenses to let you see who is at the door without opening it. Have telephones within reach. Place emergency numbers near every phone. Keep your handphones switched on before you go to sleep.

If you can afford it, you can even install a closed-circuit television to monitor activities inside and outside your home.

These are some of the ways to prevent burglaries in your home. If you have not taken any of these measures, then perhaps you should do so now. It is always 'better to be late than never.'
 	
Conservation of wildlife

Write a speech on the measures that should be taken to preserve wildlife
 
Good morning, teachers and friends. Never has a wildlife faced such great threats of extinction as in the last few decades. We bulldoze forests to make way for concrete jungles, depriving many species of the flora and fauna native to their habitats. We dump all types of waste into our rivers and seas, doing irreparable damage to freshwater and marine species. We hunt for sport and use animal parts to cater to our exotic tastes. All our actions are resulting in the dwindling of wildlife. We are losing plant and animal species at an accelerated rate.
Ladies and gentlemen, what can we do to stop this massacre ? Firstly, wildlife trade should be banned. The authorities should strictly prohibit the sale of animals and animal parts whether it is for medicinal or for other purposes. Forests are habitats for numerous species of flora and fauna. Dwindling forests means dwindling wildlife. Therefore, forests should be preserved. Promulgating laws alone will not be an effective deterrent. Offenders should be punished. The authorities should invoke the full weight of the law to make offenders cease their illegal trade.

For wild life species that face the threat of extinction, the authorities should make a concerted effort to conserve them. The creation of forest reserves and animal sanctuaries will prevent animal and plant species from being wiped out. The success of the Sepilok Orangutan rehabilitation Center is Sabah is a clear example of how effective such conservation programs are. Similarly, the establishment of marine parks can protect both marine life and their habitats from being destroyed.

Scientific research can single out threats to flora and fauna species and also discover ways of tackling these threats effectively. Monetary incentives such as grants from the government will encourage scientific research. the mass media and television programs like National Geographic can instil awareness in the public on the need to preserve biodiversity. Coverage of wildlife issues should be increased.

The public, too, should play its part. As green consumers, we can refuse to buy products that make sue of animal parts.

If the authorities, the private sector and the public play their part, we can put a stop to practices that endanger wildlife.
How to reduce pollution

Write a speech on ways of reducing pollution which is to be delivered during assembly on World Environment Day.
 
Good morning teachers and friends. In conjunction with World Environment Day, I would like to give a talk on the ways of reducing pollution.
Pollution was once thought to be the inevitable price of modernization and industrialization. Today, efforts to reduce environmental pollution are slowly gaining momentum.

First of all, existing laws and regulations aimed at reducing pollution should be strictly enforced. Toxic waste and fumes from industries are among the major causes of pollution. Instead of indiscriminate dumping of waste and unchecked emission of toxic fumes, industries should be equipped with proper waste-treatment systems. The move towards installing catalytic converters and using lead-free petrol is also commendable, as exhaust fumes from vehicles contribute greatly to air pollution. The Department of Environment and the Road Transport Department, respectively, should ensure that industries and vehicle owner comply with environmental regulations.

Another important step to curb pollution is to educate the public on the effects of pollution and how they can help protect the environment. Many people are still ignorant of the effects on the environment due to the use of materials such as aerosol sprays with cholorofluorocarbons, which destroy the ozone layer, or disposable plastic products, which are virtually indestructible. Many people also do not know that plastic, glass and paper can be recycled and thus prevent pollution by reducing waste. when the public is better informed, efforts to reduce pollution will be more effective.

Lastly, we should buy environmentally safe products and these should be reasonably priced to be attractive to the average consumer. For example, not many consumers are aware of the existence of biodegradable products and their benefits in cutting down environmental pollution. furthermore, many consumers who would be interested in buying recycled or environmentally friendly products are put off by the high prices charged for them. As such, there should be more encouragement for consumers to buy environmentally friendly products.

Reducing pollution requires efforts by all parties concerned -- the government, industries and consumers. Stricter control, more public awareness and reasonable pricing for 'green' products will all help in reducing pollution in the country. So ladies and gentlemen, let us do our part in reducing pollution.

Thank you
"I could tell by her face that she was very distressed." Continue the story

 
I could tell by her face that she was very distressed. 'Mars Lim, is something wrong ?' I asked as I glanced at the wall clock. It was almost 1 a.m. Mrs Lim was one of my neighbors who lived down the street with her old, invalid husband. My instincts told me that Mrs Lim needed help.
'It 's my husband. I think he's having a heart attack. Can you help me ?' she blurted out, in between sobs. With lightning speed, I changed my clothes. Then, I followed Mrs Lim to her house. The whole house was a little musty. As this was my first visit to the Lims' residence, I had a quick glance around the living room. There were wall panels covered with watercolor landscapes, engravings and cross-stitch pieces. Along the corridor leading to the kitchen was Mr Lim, slumped in an armchair. He appeared to be gasping for breath. With Mrs Lim's help, I managed to carry him to the porch where their car was parked. when we finally managed to get him inside the car, I drove to the hospital.

We rushed him to the emergency and casualty ward. The doctor on duty informed us that Mr Lim had suffered a mild stroke. Mr Lim was admitted tot eh intensive care unit. Mrs Lim and I kept an all-night vigil. It was then that Mrs Lim asked me to contact her son and convey the news. I never knew that Mr and Mrs Lim had children. All this while, I thought that the Lims had no children. I could not recall a time when they ever mentioned a son. I tried to contact the son at the given address, but I was told that he had moved to another town with his wife and children I could see the pain in Mrs Lim's face as I told her the news.

As I was driving home, I told myself that I would call my own parents. I had not contacted them for almost a month and my conscience haunted me. They had looked after me for a good part of their lives. I was sobbing terribly all the way home, ashamed of my neglect.

Mr Lim was discharged after ten days. He made a speedy recovery. Apart from his slurred speech, he appeared hale and hearty a month after the incident.

The incident has helped me to get my priorities right. It has also made me realize that when we give a helping hand to those who need our assistance, the world will be a better place to live in.
Tuition

 
Tuition centers have become a booming industry, raking in hundreds of thousands of dollars. On the average, parents fork out about $100 to $200 for each child per month. Today, more and more teachers are giving tuition as it has become a major money-spinner for them. What has triggered this phenomenon ? Are schoolteachers shirking their duties or are parents just afraid that their children will be left behind in the paper chase ?
The rationale in sending students for tuition is to help them better understand what has been taught in school. Students who are slow in grasping what is taught in schools can attend tuition classes to catch up and improve their performance.

Moreover, in schools, teachers have a limited time to teach students. There are only about five to six lessons a week for most subjects, including English, Mathematics and science. The time allotted is clearly insufficient for weak students to understand a particular subject. A the same time, teachers have less teaching time due to increasing paperwork and other duties. Teachers are forced to rush through the syllabus because of time constraints, thus leaving students in the lurch.

Classes in school are too big and teachers do not have enough time to give personal attention to teach and every student. On the other hand, tuition classes have a smaller number of students, making personal attention possible. Thriving on the education system's weaknesses, tuition centers have gained popularity among both students and parents.

Parents, too, prefer to send their children for tuition. Parents who want their children to excel in their studies are willing to spend large amounts of money on tuition fees. Nowadays, due to work commitments, parents are away from home for the greater part of the day. Parents would prefer to send their children for tuition just to keep their offspring from getting involved in undesirable activities or from idling their time away. At the same time, parents who are not highly educated prefer to send their children for tuition.

For students who are unable to get personal attention in school and for those who have difficulty assimilating what is taught in schools, tuition is definitely a must, as the gain is more than the cost. Teachers should be allowed to give tuition to improve students' performances.
Capital punishment

The death penalty should be abolished. Do you agree ?
 
The death penalty or capital punishment is still being practiced in many countries. Criminals who are put on the death row include those who are arrested for drug trafficking and those who commit murders.
In Asia, death by hanging is the most common method of capital punishment. Among the countries, lethal injections, electrocution and death by a firing squad are more common.

Should the death penalty be abolished ? The proponents for the death penalty feel that the punishment meted out to a criminal should reflect the seriousness of the crime. If this line of argument is followed, then a person who kills deserves to die. In other words, a person who takes another person's life, forfeits his won right to live.

Another argument is that the death penalty is an effective deterrent to crime. If murderers and drug dealers know that they will be punished by death, they will be less likely to commit the crimes.

The main purpose of capital punishment is to isolate criminals from society so that they will not have the opportunity to repeat their crimes.

Whatever the reasons are for defending the death penalty, I feel that it is an archaic form of punishment that has no place in a modern, civilized world.

It is true that crimes of a serious nature deserve severe punishment. But taking a person's life in return is equivalent to taking revenge or 'an eye for an eye'. Two wrongs do not make a right. Hence, when we put criminals on death row, we are stooping to their level. Instead, if a serious crime is committed, the criminal should be sentenced to life imprisonment. By spending the rest of their lives in prison, these criminals would have time to reflect on their misdeeds and repent.

No matter how careful and fair the judicial system is, the possibility of perjured testimony and human error always remains too real a threat to be brushed aside. If a member of the jury makes a mistake, a person can be falsely accused of a crime. If the death penalty is meted out to a person who did not commit the crime, then the sentence cannot be revoked.

It is not true that the threat of capital punishment reduces the number of violent crimes because most crimes are committed on the spur of the moment or under the influence of drugs or alcohol. Many offenders, therefore, do not think about the consequences of their crimes.

Preventing crimes from happening is the most effective way to deter crime. Increased surveillance or police patrols, an increase in the number of police officers and a strict control on the availability of weapons are more practical alternatives in the practice of crime prevention.

For these reasons, capital punishment should be abolished.
Is it better for mothers to stay at home ?

Why is it better for mothers to stay at home and not work ?
 
Governments all over the world are encouraging education and are trying to remove barriers to education. As more and more women are also getting an education there are greater employment opportunities for them.

In spite of this, there is a greater need for women to stay home and be homemakers. Young children and growing families require the attention of mothers. If women are to spend eight hours each day at work, then the children, especially the very young ones, would have to be left at day care centers, nurseries, with maids, grandparents or relatives.

It cannot be denied that mothers are the pillars of strength in any family. If they give up their role as homemakers and thrust it onto others, such as maids, then there may be some unpleasant consequences. In some cases, children have been abused and in other cases, they have been greatly influenced by the maids, who are usually foreigners. The children would not only have to learn the language of the maids, but would also be susceptible to the mannerisms, customs and practices that do not belong to their own cultural background.

As it is expensive to hire maids, in some cases children are left in the care of others who may exert a negative influence on the children's upbringing. It is therefore imperative that mothers should stay at home to care for their children, especially during the crucial period of their growth. Furthermore, mothers would be able to guide and supervise their children in their daily routines and therefore act as role models for their children. When mothers stay at home, they will be able to mould their children better.

It is said that the generation of tomorrow depends on the mothers of today. Social ills and other socio-cultural problems, faced by both young children and teenagers, could be eradicated if mothers stay at home and not go to work. They will be able to devote more time to caring for their families.
Fighting crime

Everyone should be involved in the fight against crime.' Do you agree ?
 
The rise in criminal activities has always been a matter of grave concern among Asians. Gone are the good old days when we could roam the streets freely and safely without fear of being robbed, assaulted, kidnapped, raped or even murdered. There have been comments that the authorities have not done enough to fight crime. What people fail to realize is that crime prevention is a shared responsibility. Crime prevention should include the authorities, such as the relevant ministries and government departments, the police, as well as the various NGOs and the public.
For their part, the authorities have beefed up the police force and put more police officers on the streets. Non-uniformed personnel have been assigned crime-prevention duties. Moreover, Mobile Police stations and Mobile Police Vehicles have been placed in crime-prone areas. Law enforcement alone is not enough. Law enforcers can only patrol areas periodically. They cannot possibly be everywhere all the time. It is the members of the public who can provide the police with relevant information, report the dangers that lurk in their neighborhoods or report suspicious characters. We have to be the eyes and ears of the police if we wish to eradicate crime.

We can also play our part in fighting crime by organizing neighborhood patrols. Residents can form their own residents' associations and link up with police stations nearby. It is only when the public become more vigilant and work hand-in-hand with the police that we see a significant reduction in crime.

More crime prevention campaigns should be organized to reinforce public awareness on the need to act together to combat crime. The media should not only report sensational news, such as brutal killings and grisly murders. It should educate the public on crime prevention. With responsible reporting, the media can help to create awareness and make the public more safety conscious.

Crime prevention is a collective responsibility. Although police presence has a strong impact on fighting crime, the public too can play its role by improving security on the streets and our neighborhoods. Only then can we help to mitigate crime. We must come together in a true spirit and be resolved to fight crime.
Happiness

 
Many people today are not as happy as they wish to be. Technological advancements have made our lives easier and more comfortable. We enjoy higher incomes and better standards of living as a result of progress and development, but happiness has remained a rather elusive goal for many of us. Our pursuit of material wealth and worldly possessions has robbed us of the contentment that we long for.
What is happiness and how can we obtain it ? Happiness can be defined as a state of mind characterized by feelings of contentment, satisfaction and pleasure. People always think that their achievements, education, career, family and financial security can make them happy but later find that happiness is not always the end result. We can own and live in a beautiful home, afford a lavish lifestyle, wear designer clothes or drive expensive cars and yet we may be unhappy. It is a misconception to think that having lots of money can make a person happy. What then can provide lasting happiness ?

Abraham Lincoln once said, 'You are as happy as you make up your mind to be.' Happiness is a matter of choice. We can make a choice to be either happy or sad. Being satisfied with who we are and what we have can make us happy. Unfortunately, there is no short cut to happiness. we should first set our goals and determine the areas in our lives that are important to us. Then we should strive to attain these goals. we should make a conscious attempt to change what we can and accept what we cannot.

Being optimistic can aid in creasing our happiness. Always think that life is going to get better. It helps to have a positive outlook. Dwelling in the past and ruminating about something that went wrong can lead to depression. At the same time, we should never try to compare ourselves with others. It will only lead to unhappiness. Instead, we should count our blessings and be thankful for all the good things we have -- good health, family, friends and education. Happiness starts at home. Therefore, we should all try to improve our relationship with our parents and siblings.

Research ha shown that happy people live longer, are healthier and are more successful. they also enjoy more fulfilling relationships and are respected by others. Therefore, instead of brooding over our pains and sorrows, we should always keep ourselves busy and find pleasure in small things.
Preventing snatch thefts

Write an article for your school magazine and give your suggestions.
 
The local media, especially the local dailies, have been replete with reports of snatch thefts. The barrage of media reports has caused more than a sense of anxiety, it has caused fear and panic among residents. Recently, there has been a spate of snatch thefts in our area. Snatch thefts tend to escalate during festive seasons and holidays. Hotspots of snatch thefts are quiet and deserted areas such as residential areas, by the roadside, in lifts and around the bank.
Snatch thieves choose their targets carefully. They often strike when people are off guard. They home in on people who are alone and those who are distracted. Women and senior citizens are especially susceptible as they may be unable to defend themselves. Often the victims are seriously injured or even killed. To avoid becoming potential victims, we should take simple crime prevention measures.

Do not walk alone especially in dark and deserted areas. Take your handbag only if necessary. It is better to carry your purse. Always hold handbags and personal belongings close to the body. If a snatch thief tugs at your handbag, do not hold on to it. Just let it go. Although you may never be able to retrieve your belongings, it is better than to hang on to it and suffer injuries inflicted by the perpetrators. Keep important or valuable items out of sight and be careful of suspicious-looking motorists or persons. Always be alert and attentive to your surroundings. If you suspect that you are being targeted, walk to a crowded area. Walk against the flow of traffic and hold on to your handbag on the side away from passing motorists.

Be careful of suspicious-looking motorists or persons. Snatch thieves often approach potential victims on the pretext of striking up a conversation or asking for directions. If someone approaches you, always keep a safe but polite distance. avoid wearing excessive jewellery or carrying large amounts of cash. Do not flaunt cash and valuables in public. Instead, you should always be observant of your surroundings.

Snatch thefts are crimes of opportunity. they occur because people do not take the preventive measures mentioned. Snatch thefts can be prevented if people are vigilant at all times.
Absenteeism in school

Write a report to your Principal about why students are absent and provide suggestions on how to overcome the problem.
 
Absenteeism has long been a vexatious issue for school authorities. Students are absent from school every day without a bona fide excuse. The Counseling Club of our school carried out a survey to find out the reasons why the students are absent.
Most of the students who are absent say that they find the lessons boring. In the light of this revelation, teachers should try and explore creative technologies and teaching ideas to increase student attendance. Obtaining poor grades was another reason for frequent absenteeism. If the school becomes a place where students feel unsuccessful, then they want to avoid it. Therefore, special tutorial programs should be initiated to equip students with adequate academic skills.

Peer influence also has a significant bearing on student attendance. Students often miss class to be in the company of friends. Students who associate with delinquent peer groups are at risk. Student absenteeism may also be a red flag for a more serious problem such as anxiety, loneliness and stress. These students should be sent for counseling sessions. In addition, after school sports and other programs will enable students to make new friends and experience a positive environment. Results of the survey show that lack of parental supervision may also lead to absenteeism among students. As parental involvement relates closely to student attendance and academic progress, parents should be reminded of their responsibilities. School authorities should liaise with police and the local community to patrol neighborhoods where truant students are likely to spend school hours.

Occasional absenteeism among students can be excused. However, frequent absenteeism is a cause for concern as it has often been linked to serious problems such as violence, substance abuse, gang involvement and criminal activity such as burglary and vandalism. Left unaddressed, absenteeism can have significant negative effects on students, the school and on society. Therefore, it is critical to determine the reasons fro absenteeism and identify strategies to tackle the problem.
Talk on road safety

As chairperson of the school's organizing committee, you have been asked to give a talk to other students on road safety.
 
Boys and girls, a very good morning to you. In conjunction with 'Road Safety Week,' I wish to give a talk on why road accidents occur and the ways to reduce them.

News about road accidents and road accident fatalities always appear in printed and electronic media. In many cases, schoolchildren are the victims. It is for this reason that our school has decided to launch a 'Road Safety Week' campaign with the aim of raising awareness among the students on the need to be more responsible and cautions while on the road.

Why do road accidents occur ? According to police statistics, much of the carnage on the roads could have been avoided if road users had exercised patience and caution. Instead, drivers tend to speed, drive recklessly and race on the roads. Motorists are responsible for various other misdemeanors such as weaving in and out of traffic and not paying heed to road conditions. Sometimes road conditions such as the existence of potholes can cause accidents. Another major cause of accidents is the poor maintenance of vehicles. Vehicles with brakes and lights that do not function properly are potential hazards to other road users. Long-distance public transportation drivers can also cause accidents if they drive for long periods and are tired.

Summonses and penalties are ineffective in curbing road accidents. Stiffer penalties such as increasing fines and suspending driving licenses of offenders should be introduced. If a motorist causes an accident, the authorities should confiscate his driving license and suspend him from driving for a certain period of time. Stricter enforcement of traffic rules by the authorities will reduce the number of accidents.

Only roadworthy vehicles should be allowed on the roads. Vehicles which break down often should be taken off the roads. There is also a clarion call from many quarters to increase the age limit for new drivers. This is one way of getting young motorists off the roads.

If we do not want accidents to happen, then it is time we changed our driving and riding attitudes. Motorists must ensure that they are courteous on the road and that their vehicles are roadworthy. There should be more awareness campaigns aimed at inculcating good driving habits, especially among schoolchildren.

When road users ensure their vehicles are roadworthy, respect the law and think about their safety as well as that of others, then the number of fatalities can be reduced.

Thank you
Yes and No to condominium living
What are your views on condominium living ? Are you in favor of it or not ? State your view
 
The increasing number of unsolved home burglaries and the horrendous tales of snatch attacks at entrances has made condominium living attractive.
Firstly, a condominium complex provides security twenty-four hours a day. The guard house at the main entrance with uniformed personnel doing shift work provides an aura of safety. Residents know that any visitor especially strangers have to identify themselves, produce identification and convey information about unit or people they are visiting. Visitor and vehicle screening is very comforting. Patrols are undertaken around the complex to ensure a fair amount of defense.

However, not all security firms provide top-rate service. The employees may have a suspicious background, all unknown or unrevealed to the employer. Trusting security personnel to carry out their work without checking into the background can prove to be very damaging to the residents.

Secondly, there are certain facilities which are provided at the condominium. There is normally a swimming pool, an outdoor park and playground, tennis and squash courts. Sometimes, some come with golfing facilities or even subsidized affiliation to golf clubs which come under the flagship of the developer.

The maintenance of all exterior premises and facilities and the facade of the building is under the condominium management. They ensure that the parking bays, the gardens, the common corridors, the lifts, the facilities (eg. the swimming pool, games courts) and the exterior walls are properly maintained.

However, maintenance is more often than not efficiently done and the work is not up to par. To add insult to injury, all residents including owners have to pay monthly maintenance fees which can come up to a princely amount annually. If the maintenance is well done, then it is worth doling out the payment but not otherwise. Then maintenance of the interior is the onus of the resident or owner. This in itself can be quite an arduous task.

Thirdly, the management advocates a uniformity in certain aspects of condominium living. Flower beds are to be planted with the same variety of flowers and plants. Curtains have to be of a certain material and color. It does take away the tedium of selection and doing all the tedious humdrum tasks and makes life less of a chore.

On the other hand, such uniformity can be dictatorial and takes away the versatility of tenants and owners. There is no freedom of choice. Everyone has to kowtow to a regime.

In the final analysis, condominium living has more plus factors. Security exists which does not exist in non-gated communities. Facilities are provided at a fee with certain perks thrown in without having to pay an astronomical entrance fee to certain "royal" clubs. Maintenance is a "stressfree" affair with the condo management getting all the headaches.

In conclusion, if I have the money, I think I would opt for an apartment in a condominium. All my troubles are over ! I can sleep in peace, without being awakened from sleep staring at a stranger's face !
The environment through my eyes
How far has the environment helped you in becoming the person you are now ? Discuss the benefits and the drawbacks of the environment on an individual
 
The environment is the surroundings and conditions one is brought up in. Does nurturing an individual in the "correct" surroundings produce a "superior" human being ?
Let us examine the evidence. I am going to use myself as the "guinea pig", the subject of the "test".

The first evidence to my advantage is my home environment. I was not born into a rich family. You could say it is lower middle class but my parents manage to put food on the table, send us to school, pay the fees and occasionally treat us to "cheap" school outings [which actually are school sponsored] or an annual fast-food treat (yummy KFC). We are happy, united and able to laugh at our lack of nature comforts. Being able to accept our lot make us more determined to create opportunities. The environment is our teacher.

However, when I look at some of my schoolmates who come from broken homes and are traumatized by their conditions, I realize the environment can have a negative effect on the child.

My first conclusion is that the environment is important to the extent that the individual can cope with the lack or the excesses.

My second evidence stems from my entry into the residential school system. I was plucked out from my 'stable' home environment and thrown into the wilderness, a completely alien world to join 13-year old girls and boys in a boarding school. Here, we have wardens to keep a vigilant eye on us and the school has rules and regulations which cover the whole gamut of our life for the days we are in school. Occasionally during weekends, term breaks and holidays, we make the journey home but we come to regard the school as our first home. we learn discipline and time management.

I find that many take to the system like a duck to water but there are some who could not adapt to it. Some of them come from good homes, rich background with some from marginally deprived situations. The figures show that from within each group, there are a few dropouts or some who manage to swim and not drown. some from poor homes made fantastic improvements, some ho were high achievers did not succeed eventually. To some the environment spurs them to excel, to some the environment is a hindrance.

The second conclusion is a mixture of the environment and heredity working in tandem so it really boils down to the individual to utilise all that he possesses to achieve his dreams.

My last evidence is when I compare my abilities with those of my siblings. I am good at languages, science and mathematics but a fumbler when it comes to nuts and bolts and art. My younger brother could dismantle a bicycle and put I all together again in a jiffy. My demure quiet sister draws and colors "dreams". My brother repairs my bicycle, my sister puts the finishing touches to my artistic goofs while I coach all in languages and Mathematics. I could not put our "achievements" to the environment but to the genes inherited from both parents.

The third conclusion leans towards heredity as the "element" responsible for the latent talent which only needs to be nurtured by the environment to flower and bloom.

Looking back in retrospect, I believe that the environment fine tunes the inherited characteristics and makes room for latent talents to emerge. Added to these two elements is the inherent nature of the individual who nurtures his dreams into reality and realization.

The evidences and the conclusions point towards the fusion of the two: in some cases the environment determines the future and in other cases heredity dominates. Which reigns falls solely on the individual; he charts his own course in life.